  This position starts as a remote role and should be commutable to Brooklyn, NY, in 2021.  <h6 class="jobSectionHeader">    Job Description:   </h6>  Datacubed Health is seeking an Quality Assurance Engineer  Intern  to help increase the quality of our cutting-edge web and mobile apps that support clinical research for healthcare, pharma, and academic institutions. Our tools leverage novel techniques for data collection and analysis and our engineering team is growing to support our expanding SaaS platform.     The Intern QA engineer will collaborate with the development teams to ensure test cases are clearly defined, improve automation processes, and support new features and releases. Main responsibilities include designing, implementing, and automating tests and defining corrective actions.   This intern position will report to the Sr. QA Engineer and has the opportunity to be renewed. Sponsorship is not currently offered for this position and employees must be authorized to work in the US.     The qualified candidate can think critically, act quickly, communicate effectively at all levels, and is a team player willing to fill in wherever an extra hand is needed.    Datacubed Health was founded by world-class researchers from NYU and MIT, and uses gaming, big data and social activation to engage users, capture real world data &amp; improve patient retention in everything from patient support to clinical trials.      We offer a competitive salary, benefits and equity. Compensation will be commensurate with experience (see requirements below). <h6 class="jobSectionHeader">  Key Duties and Job Responsibilities: </h6>   The QA Engineer Intern&rsquo;s main responsibilities will include designing, implementing, and automating tests and defining corrective actions. <h6 class="jobSectionHeader">  Key responsibilities: </h6> Create global test plans and automated test cases.   Review user interfaces for conformity and functionality.   Efficiently execute test cases across all functional and UI areas of our products.   Define test plans, test suites, test cases as well as utilize automated tools to optimize the STLC.   Estimate, prioritize, plan and coordinate testing activities.   Design, develop and execute automation frameworks(Data driven framework).   Identify, record, document and track bugs.   Perform in-depth regression testing.   Develop and apply testing processes for new and existing products to meet client needs.   Liaise with internal teams (e.g. developers and product managers) to identify system requirements.   Monitor debugging process results.      Requirements:    BSc in Computer Science or equivalent   Hands-on experience with automated UI testing tools for web and mobile applications (Selenium, Appium etc.)   Hands-on experience with white box, black box testing, Smoke Testing, Regression Testing   Knowledge with API testing (postman) and automated API testing frameworks (REST Assured etc)   Familiar with JIRA, Confluence and/or any similar defect/issue tracking and requirement tracking tools.   Experience with test management tools (Quality center, Zephyr, etc)   Knowledge of software QA methodologies, tools and processes   Experience working in an Agile/Scrum software development methodology   Experience testing web and mobile applications   Understanding of regression, functional, UI/UX testing     Preferred/bonus Talents:    Master&rsquo;s Degree in Computer Science or equivalent.   Professional experience with performance, load and stress testing (Loadrunner, Blazemeter etc.)   Working knowledge of security / vulnerability testing tools (Waitipi, Vega etc.)   Experience with Mobile automation with Appium.   Experience creating and architecting test frameworks and have working knowledge about test framework design patterns (Page Object Model, Page factory model etc.)   Have used Browserstack, sauce labs or script wise parallel testing (or selenium grid) for cross browser / cross device testing   Knowledge about CI/CD process (Jenkins,TeamCity)      Given the civic mission of the company and project, it is especially important that employees uphold the business&rsquo; principles honestly and ethically; strive to improve the quality of our services, products, and operations and maintain a reputation for privacy, honesty, fairness, respect, responsibility, integrity, philanthropy, trust, innovation, exploration and sound judgment; and adhere to high standards of business and personal integrity as a representation of our business practice. 

  Start Here, Go Anywhere! Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world? <br><br> During your internship at Arup, you&rsquo;ll have the chance to work with some of the most highly respected engineers and specialists in the world. You&rsquo;ll also get the opportunity to work on exciting and significant projects, delivering quality work that has a positive and lasting influence on the community and the environment.<br><br><br>   Responsibilities of this specific role will include, but not be limited to the following: 

  Summary:    Responsible for assisting the Manufacturing Engineering &amp; Production / Operations teams with developing work standards, evaluating manufacturing methods, track productivity and help identify / implement improvements in the production floor. <br>     Responsibilities:   Work with the manufacturing engineering &amp; production teams in the development of standardized work instructions (AI's) and setup sheets from existing assemblies  Create / design new 2D and 3D tools and holders using CAD software  Create / modify 2D and 3D representations of tools, components and assemblies    Ability to mine and analyze large datasets (Excel, Access, SQL)   Develop standards for tracking productivity and efficiency indicators / metrics in the production floor   Develop MS project schedules to identify and track timing of critical tasks for projects   Support the implementation of general housekeeping, 5S, TPM &amp; visual management programs in the production floor  Update manufacturing methods / routings at the request of Process Designers and ME's  Evaluate manufacturing processing times &amp; identify opportunities for optimization (through line balancing, time + motion studies, etc.)  <br>      Qualifications:   Completion of two years or more in an Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or Manufacturing Engineering undergraduate degree  Proficient in use of MS Office software (Excel, Word, PPT, Project)  CAD software Autodesk Inventor, TDM graphic generator, AutoCAD  Familiarity with continuous improvement methodologies highly desirable  Good verbal and written communication skills  Hands-on and proactive, self-motivated with a desire to achieve results  Ability to set goals and meet time commitments  

  C&amp;A is looking to hire 2-3 summer interns to help with our workload. Local engineering students. 

 Overview:   Calspan takes great pride in our ability to attract, recruit, and develop extraordinary talent. We are currently looking for exceptional students to fill our 2021 Summer Internship Program. Calspan&rsquo;s interns will contribute to exciting projects in both the aerospace and automotive industries and have the opportunity to participate in professional development sessions led by subject matter industry leaders.

 Why Crestron?:   At Crestron Electronics, Inc we build the technology that integrates technology.<br><br> We are proud to be the largest and most recognized brand in automation and control solutions, and the premier technology partner for fortune 500 businesses globally.

   Position:  NLP Data Scientist Intern (REMOTE)    Reports to:  CTO    Location:  Remote <br>     Are you passionate about exploring where, how, and why data can drive business decisions? Interested in how organizations use analytics and data to innovate, grow and transform? Driven to help establish, define, and evangelize how data science can help drive a strategy?<br>      Company Overview    Vee inspires people to align on Purpose so they can unlock their individual and collective human potential. We are an early stage startup poised for dramatic growth. We specialize in developing ways to drive greater strategic alignment to unlock enterprise innovation and growth. After spending considerable time exploring the need for better alignment models across diverse organizations, we have developed a framework and methodology based on insights from extensive research. We are building products to assess gaps and are offering our consulting services to help 21st century leaders develop and implement their organizational and people strategies, along with the capabilities required to operationalize their Purpose as they transform. <br>     Position Overview    Join our fast-growing team! You will help drive intelligent, insightful, and predictive business results to help Vee and Vee's clients drive value in the realms of people, purpose, and performance. You will help build Vee's data capability and data strategy. <br>     General Responsibilities   Design and execute  Natural Language Processing  experiments to help advance Vee's strategy  Research and run topic analysis on targeted content  Scrape targeted content from social media and open Web sources  Collaborate with Data Engineering, People Science, business partners, and Chief Technology Officer to create robust  NLP  pipelines using  AWS Comprehend   Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders at Vee    Core Experience &amp; Requirements   Masters degree in Computer Science, Applied Statistics, Applied math, Data Science, or a related field   Previous experience running NLP  projects, ideally in a corporate or startup context  Practical experience with multiple statistical languages (SAS, R, Pandas), data processing, database programming, and data analytics  Solid background in data mining and statistical analysis  Experience with programming languages such as Python and R  Knowledge of data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)  Strong collaboration skills - you partner well with others to solve problems and actively incorporate input from various sources  Excellent oral and written communication skills  Working with key stakeholders to drive business results    Profile    Purpose is what drives you. Your passion for your work has led you here. You are ready to combine your experience with ours to help our client companies gain competitive advantage. You bring strong creative thinking skills in addition to superior communication skills, allowing you to develop creative solutions for any challenge that comes your way.    You:  Love what you do, love to be busy, and love to produce by being organized and methodical  Work with a sense of urgency and have a strong drive for results  Have the resilience and agility to adapt quickly in a fast-paced environment  Work independently as well as collaboratively to stretch thinking into creative solutions  Have strong verbal and written communication skills  Are excited about and suited for a startup, where you'll be wearing a few hats  Are smart and fun with an empathetic nature, which will add to our culture <br>      About Vee    Our founders and team have deep expertise in branding, innovation, design, I/O psychology, organization design, digital &amp; data product development, enterprise software and application development complemented by experience with clients ranging from emerging Silicon Valley unicorns to established leaders in government and the public and private sectors including American Express, Bank of America, BMW, Box, HP, Lowe's, Mastercard, Microsoft, Nissan, Pepsico, Procter &amp; Gamble, SAP and The Clorox Company, among others. For more information, check out our website in transition at https://www.letsvee.com/. 

    The New York Times is seeking a creative and motivated software engineering intern to join the Research and Development team this spring. In this role, you will be embedded on a team of engineers, designers, journalists and creative technologists and contribute to the work of one of our research areas.     This internship is for currently enrolled undergraduate and graduate students, or those who graduated Spring of 2020 or later.     To Apply: Please include links to a portfolio of related work and a code sample on your resume.      About Our Team:      Every day, journalists at the New York Times report more than 200 stories from dozens of countries around the world on topics ranging from major international events to the best way to roast a chicken. Those stories are read, listened to and watched by millions of users across our web and mobile products.     The New York Times R&amp;D team explores the near future of news and information by identifying emerging technologies and shifting user behaviors that may influence journalism. Exploration areas include machine learning (like natural language processing and computer vision), spatial computing (like 3D graphics and AR/VR), and media transmission (like capture and transmission of audio, video, or 3D content) for journalism.     We explore potential scenarios and identify opportunities for taking action, using a mix of strategic forecasting, human-centered design, and speculative prototyping. With these insights, we develop new technical capabilities that can be employed in the service of journalism.      During the Internship, You Will:     Have the opportunity to focus on one engineering project for the duration of the internship. Recent R&amp;D intern projects have included exploring new ways to navigate travel content using NLP, building augmented reality story formats, designing the interface for an AI-assisted newsroom tool, and using computer vision to more accurately search The Times&rsquo; archives.     Join an interdisciplinary team of engineers, designers, journalists and creative technologists.     Be matched with a teammate to guide you throughout the summer.        About You:     You have a portfolio of school and personal projects in topics related to the R&amp;D team&rsquo;s research areas.     You have hands-on experience with at least one specialized technology relevant to R&amp;D research areas such as: WebGL, gaming engines (Unity, Unreal), or machine learning frameworks (pytorch/Tensorflow/Caffe).     You have a solid grasp of basic web development, and know how to deploy apps to the cloud.     You enjoy finding creative solutions to technical challenges.     You have an interest in journalism and a desire to build amazing, innovative experiences for our readers.     You are entrepreneurial and self-sufficient.     You're a curious person &mdash; you continually seek out additional knowledge and viewpoints.     You have an enthusiasm for The New York Times and its products/experiences.        About Our Summer Internships:     The program is 10 weeks long.     You will work remotely during the summer     Interning at The New York Times is a unique opportunity to work at a historic and innovative global media organization dedicated to enhancing society by creating, collecting and distributing high-quality news and information.     We run a week-long maker event during the summer, where Design, Product, Project, Marketing and Technology come together     You will be helping to power, distribute and expand what is possible for our award-winning journalism.     NYT interns benefit from competitive pay, great perks and influential networking opportunities.        The New York Times is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce, one that reflects the varied global community we serve. Our journalism and the products we build in the service of that journalism greatly benefit from a range of perspectives, which can only come from diversity of all types, across our ranks, at all levels of the organization. Achieving true diversity and inclusion is the right thing to do. It is also the smart thing for our business. So we strongly encourage women, veterans, people with disabilities, people of color and gender nonconforming candidates to apply.       The New York Times Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of an individual's sex, age, race, color, creed, national origin, alienage, religion, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation or affectional preference, gender identity and expression, disability, genetic trait or predisposition, carrier status, citizenship, veteran or military status and other personal characteristics protected by law. All applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to legally protected characteristics. The New York Times Company will consider qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local &quot;Fair Chance&quot; laws.  

  Job Description  Altanova is now actively hiring for open Energy Engineer internship positions in our New York office.   Successful applicants will have the capability to progressively conduct site surveys, perform quantitative analysis to support advanced modeling / computer simulation, research and understand new technologies / processes and prepare reports detailing analytical findings. Also, candidates with the ability to work in a team and to learn quickly in an environment requiring both strong theoretical and analytical background with deep pragmatism are encouraged to apply.   Requirements  Education  A Bachelor's degree in Mechanical Engineering, Physics or equivalent.   A Master's degree or current enrollment in a higher education program is a plus.   Outstanding Bachelor's students in their final year will also be considered.    Skills  Excellent communication, writing, and computer skills are mandatory   Top academic or professional energy efficiency engineering experience with industrial manufacturing operations, commercial building systems or building energy modeling   Experience in at least one of the following areas:   Energy Efficiency and Building Energy Modeling and Simulation (EQuest/DOE2 or EnergyPlus)   Analytical Modeling, Analysis and Comprehensive Energy Assessment   Building Science: Envelope and HVAC System Assessment   High Performance Buildings including LEED, Living Building Challenge, Passive House, Well Building Standard   Industrial Process Efficiency and Productivity   Renewable Energy Technologies (photovoltaics, wind, distributed generation, etc.)   Altanova offers an initial compensation starting at $2,600/month. Depending on qualifications and potential, this pay will evolve quickly. The internship is on a full-time basis (40 hours/week), but a part-time internship may be possible depending on the candidate's availability.   Over time, this internship can become a full time position.   About ALTANOVA:  Altanova is a boutique consulting firm founded in 2006 and based in New York City. We combine strategic and technological analysis to further the sustainable performance of clients' assets, operations and reputation. Our clients are a mix of real estate, corporate clients and investors whom we have worked with on over 300 projects, covering 40,000,000FT2 in 31 countries.   ALTANOVA has a long-standing commitment to providing equal employment opportunity to all qualified applicants regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, veteran status, political belief, or any other basis protected by applicable law. Our staff is a strong illustration of this commitment.  Join our diverse team of engineers, scientists and business experts and help find innovative solutions to pressing sustainability challenges. Further your career in an energetic and collaborative environment where our shared passion is ensuring our clients achieve sustainable growth. For more about us, visit altanova.io. 

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Intern - Corporate Application Developer </h1> Virtual Req #457  

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Description Summary </h1> GE Gas Power works in all areas of the energy industry with a full array of power generation, power conversion, energy delivery, biogas and alternative fuels; coal, oil, natural gas and nuclear energy. We are solving some the most complex challenges across the globe. Candidates will have the opportunity to work with experienced engineers in the following areas: nuclear, gas engines, power generation products, power generation services, aeroderivatives, electrification, grid, and controls.  <h1 class="jobSectionHeader">  Job Description </h1>  Essential Responsibilities :<br> Technical EID assignment categories in GE Power include, but are not limited to:  

  THE PROGRAM <br><br> Network Operations (NetOps) is dedicated to the quality, reliability and integrity of the network systems that allow us to serve our customers. Here you will be working with bright minds that are the power behind the services that Charter provides. It's a great time to join the Charter Communications NetOps team. Jump in and make your mark on high profile projects and plans. Take advantage of access to our online learning platforms and mentorship program to grow your skills exponentially.<br><br> The program is 10 weeks in length and will run from June through August 2021 <br><br> INSIDE PLANT <br><br> Inside Plant (ISP) operates in the space where cutting-edge technology meets impeccable customer support. As liaison between hardware and network, ISP working groups handles the concrete and the abstract, maintaining connecting at headends, hubs, and networking facilities to enable smooth, continuous data flow. As troubleshooting specialist, ISP implements support solutions for internal and external customers with diplomacy and expertise. <br><br> JOB SCOPE  <br><br> Assist Inside Plant personnel with basic troubleshooting, support and maintenance of network elements and connections required to support Charter's revenue generating networks. Work to provide enterprise-wide tiered support on converged distribution and access network elements and connections as needed. <br> Under supervision, responsible for the delivery of high quality off-air, satellite, microwave, and digital transport programming up to the outside plant (point of demarcation from ISP facilities) utilizing, maintaining and installing a variety of optical and electrical interfaces including but not limited to coaxial cable, microwave, fiber optic transmission, CAT 6 to name a few typical technologies. This includes the installation, operation and break-fix remediation, with root cause analysis of all equipment associated with the Headend (HE), Hubs. On-call rotation required.<br><br> DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES   Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience.   All work during the internship will be under supervision of an ISP team member.   Assist with monitor services for quality delivery assurance.   Under supervision operate a spectrum analyzer to verify optimum levels and performance leaving ones ISP Facility.   Perform all required Performance Testing as needed.   Follow &ldquo;Did I?&rdquo; checklist and perform daily checks to ensure ISP Equipment functionality.   Assist with ensuring the facility is a clean, safe work environment.   Under supervision maintain awareness of network activities affecting local elements.   Assist with Troubleshoot video   Under supervision perform network problem resolution.   Troubleshoot communication architectures, topologies, hardware, software, transmission and signaling links and protocols. Basic set up and operation of legacy headend equipment including but not limited to RF distribution, signal processors, modulators, demodulators, IRD's and IRT's.   Install Ethernet cabling - follow proper engineering practices for the preparation, routing and termination of CAT 5 and/or CAT 6 cabling.   Under supervision install coaxial cabling - follow proper engineering practices for the preparation, routing and termination of coax and mini-coax applications.   Under supervision install fiber cabling - follow proper engineering practices for the preparation, routing and termination of various types of fiber connectors in both multi-mode and single mode applications.   Under supervision install, align and troubleshoot earth station feed assemblies.   Under supervision install and align various types of off-air antennas for VHF and UHF television and radio reception.   Under supervision install, test and maintain optical passive devices including patch panels, optical couplers, mux/demux and filters utilizing appropriate optical connector handling and cleaning procedures.   Under supervision Install, maintain, and perform testing and required documentation of emergency alert systems.   Perform and properly document with guidance all required Charter Engineering and FCC mandated testing.   Adhere to industry specific local, state, and federal regulations, as applicable.   Maintain required logs, records and other documentation in compliance with company and FCC (Federal Communications Commission) technical requirements.   Under supervision perform HE and facility Technical Quality Assurance (TQA) inspections; ensure all cabling, equipment installation, power and cooling is in compliance with corporate TQA standards.   Assist with the development and Implementation of approved methods of procedure.   Under supervision maintain and support protocol compatibility standards, develops and implements network enhancements.   Under supervision work on projects / systems / issues of basic to moderate complexity surrounding network planning, configuration and optimization.   Partner on one or more projects as a project team member.   Under supervision utilize ISP Workforce management tools   Under supervision perform analog and digital RF channel level measurement and quality testing.   Assist with period test equipment and quality of signal throughout the network.   Assist with daily, weekly, monthly and quarterly testing and logging as outlined by ISP Playbook.   Understand practice know, understand and follow company policies.   Perform other duties as requested by supervisor.    BASIC / MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS   Currently pursuing a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in Engineering and / or related field from an accredited University; Masters' degree is preferred.   Rising Junior (current Sophomore) or above Minimum 3.0 cumulative GPA required   Ability to read, write and speak the English language to communicate with employees, customers, suppliers, in person, on the phone, and by written communications in a clear, straight-forward, and professional manner   Ability to use personal computer, software applications, handheld communication devices and applications   Ability to use the following hand tools: electric drills, hammers, wrenches, screwdrivers   Ability to safely use weight-bearing equipment (such as ladders) within the maximum limitations of that equipment)   Ability to work while standing 50 - 70% of the time    WORKING CONDITIONS   Office/Headend/Hub Environment   Step ladders, Push, Pull, Sit, Stand, Lifting, etc.   Exposure to outdoor weather conditions   Computer room environment   Some local travel required  <br> For more information on Spectrum&rsquo;s benefits, please click here.

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Description </h2> The Lane Construction Corporation is one of America&rsquo;s leading construction companies, specializing in large, complex civil infrastructure. For nearly 130 years, it has contributed to the development of the country&rsquo;s vast network of roads, highways, and bridges, including the Interstate Highway System. Lane also specializes in tunnels, metro and railway systems, as well as airports and water and wastewater treatment plants     Job Description 

 We're currently recruiting for our socially impactful EdTech/Healthcare startup: Smart Course (https://smartcourse.io)  We're also hosting our second ADHD in Middle School Summit (https://smartcourse.io/aims), which is a 5-day online event with over 40 world-class speakers, all of them highly renowned in the field of ADHD.  Dr. Edward Hallowell   Dr. William Dodson   Dr. Ross Greene   Elaine Taylor-Klaus & Diane Dempster   Melissa Orlov   and Dr. Peg Dawson (to name a few).   Even more exciting is that we’re working with other world-class ADHD experts to build an online course:  Sales page: https://www.smartcourse.io/aims-online-course   Course Preview: https://courses.smartcourse.io/p/adhd-in-middle-school   that will help parents of kids with ADHD thrive through the notoriously difficult Middle School years.  As you can see, our first course is geared to help parents effectively prepare their kids with ADHD for the transition to middle school, and gain a better understanding of how to foster better relationships with the school and at home (for example we know that parent-child relationships and marriages are severely strained when raising a child with ADHD. The divorce rate is twice as high as for parents of neurotypical kids). See here for a brief intro video on our Kickstarter campaign: https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/smart-course/adhd-in-middle-school-free-virtual-summit-smart-course?ref=project_build  We have partnered with Teachable (www.teachable.com) which is a successfully established online course development platform to develop and host the course. However, we are now looking to build our own platform using WordPress with the help of a developer/product team.  While we have several ADHD experts developing much of the course material, we are still looking for help with research, internal operations, design (UI/UX, web, graphic), product development, sales, and marketing of the organization.  Some skills of particular interest include:  RESEARCH:  Experience in psychology/psychiatry/neuroscience/learning and attention disorders   Comfortable being on video and presenting content (excellent English verbal communication and camera presence)   Conducting evidence-based research on special needs and learning disabilities/vetting authoritative sources   Key-word research and mapping   Synthesize complex scientific articles into an easily digestible format   Write scripts from that complex information in a succinct, simplified (Layman's Terms), and entertaining way   Create customer discovery surveys that would effectively collect demographic and psychographic information, be able to present that in a concise, quantifiable way, and be able to suggest actions for Smart Course to take based on those insights   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   MEDIA:  Animation and motion graphics (Adobe Aftereffects preferred)   Videography and Video Editing (Adobe Premiere and iMovie preferred)   Graphic design (Adobe illustrator, Photoshop, and Canva preferred)   Basic understanding of marketing on Youtube and Pinterest (For thumbnails and video uploads)   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   MARKETING:  Market Research, Business Development (Customer Discovery)   Understanding of Digital Marketing on YouTube, Pinterest, LinkedIn, Twitter, and Facebook   Skills in email marketing (Active Campaign and HubSpot)   Auditing a marketing funnel using Google Analytics and Google Tag Manager   Basic understanding of conversation rate optimization   Comfortable cold-calling and cold-emailing   Sales copywriting and blogging   Branding strategy   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   PRODUCT:  Full-Stack Developer with HTML, CSS, Javascript (React, Redux, Node, Database Experience (Express MongoDB or SQL) preferred)   JavaScript Fullstack Web Dev / Front End Web Development   UI/UX design, Wix Web Design   WordPress expertise   Collecting product insights through customer discovery   Product management / agile development experience   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   OPERATIONS:  Market Research, Business Development, and Customer Discovery   Project Management using agile methodology   Team Building and Recruiting (HR skills preferred)   Human Resources and Operations (Highly organized in design thinking for internal processes)   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   The work will involve helping to develop and manage overall company progress, team and project management, event planning, company strategy, research and data analysis with parents, and/or sharing your knowledge on the subject. Then, depending on the level of contribution, you could get a percentage of the tuition ongoing, make commissions from sales of the course, or the course could be a source of referrals and marketing for your research and, eventually, potentially your own practice.  We are looking for someone to join the team full-time, however, as an early-stage startup we are unable to provide payment at this time and instead are offering a commission, profit-share, and/or equity-based payment plan, which would be determined over a trial period at the company, and can be discussed further in your interview on an individual basis.  We are looking for someone who is passionate about child psychology, mental health, learning disabilities, and attention disorders, who wants to harness the power of technology to improve people’s lives.  Although some experience in human resources, project management, operations management, customer tech support, and agile methodology is desirable, we are looking for enthusiasm, a deep desire to learn, and a commitment to the cause.  Our goals moving forward would be to continue partnering with organizations, influencers, or professionals that speak to parents of kids with ADHD and market Smart Course’s products and resources nationally with the help of a human resources manager / HR assistant, agile project manager, operations manager, and/or customer technical support representative, in order to become the go-to authority for online education in the space.  Some reasons you might be interested:  You want to hone your creative media skills, UI/UX design, or full stack web development skills and see how they perform in a business context   You are looking to start your own company, dive into entrepreneurship, or want a fast-tracked career towards an executive position (e.g. Dev Ops)   You want to bring your interests in child development, research, education, or clinical work into a more applied setting and translate it into actions that are directly relevant to families   You want to collect data from parents, practice data analysis skills, and present findings in relevant settings   You want to meet and network with leading professionals in the field (educational psychologists, clinical psychologists, educational specialists, etc.)   You want to get involved in the Education Technology and/or Healthcare Technology / MedTech spaces which are growing exponentially, especially for students with special needs   You’re interested in entrepreneurship, startups, and/or technology and want to put your interests to good use   We’ll be growing very quickly over the next semester and need help from bright people interested in education or startups.  If you might be interested in hearing more about this, we'd appreciate the opportunity to meet you. However, If you don’t answer the custom question with the pitch, then you won’t be considered.  Have a look at our website: https://smartcourse.io and this brief overview of our company before continuing your application: http://bit.ly/sc-identity.  We look forward to hearing from you,  Adrien Harrison  Founder & CEO | Smart Course | smartcourse.io  *commission will be determined during the interview process  Job Types: Internship, Contract  Pay: $12.00 - $14.00 per hour  Experience:  Penetration Testing: 1 year (Preferred)  Coding & Scripting: 1 year (Preferred)  Data Security: 1 year (Preferred)  Vulnerability Scanning: 1 year (Preferred)   Contract Length:  Varies   Work Location:  Fully Remote   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity  High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Company's website:  https://www.smartcourse.io/   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19  

    Position Summary:  EN-POWER GROUP, founded in 2003, is an engineering firm that designs, develops, and delivers comprehensive and integrated energy solutions for any building type, from concept to completion. As a growing company, EN-POWER GROUP aims to provide a collaborative working environment and supports employees&rsquo; professional development by helping them pursue their technical interests through diverse hands-on experiences. Our team, composed of engineers, energy managers, analysts, and sustainability experts, focuses on energy efficiency and resiliency in order to strengthen long-term facility planning and maximize project payback.   The position is based in our Midtown Manhattan office and is an ideal opportunity for an Engineering student looking to join a motivated group within the Engineering industry.   As a Mechanical Design Engineer Intern with EN-POWER GROUP, you will perform site visits to document as-built conditions and update drawings accordingly.    Principal Accountabilities:   Perform site visits to document as-built conditions  Update plans to reflect as-built conditions from information obtained during site visits  Create and update documentation required for filing with the Department of Buildings (DOB)  Perform other duties as required    Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Other Job Requirements:   Mechanical drafting experience with AutoCAD  Ability to identify HVAC and mechanical systems  Attention to detail  Ability to work independently and within a team environment  Adobe experience (Illustrator, Photoshop, Acrobat)    Required Personal Qualifications:   Demonstrated passion for energy efficiency and clean energy technology  Collaborative personality, strong team player  Exceptional communication and interpersonal skills  Self-motivation, attention to detail, and ability to multitask  Demonstrated enthusiasm for learning  Proven ability to work independently and within in a team environment, and to proactively identify problems and solutions    Benefits:   Pre-tax Travel &amp; Phone Stipend  Employee Assistance Program  Additional Benefits include: Company Activities, Lunch &amp; Learns   About EN-POWER GROUP   With a mission of providing practical solutions to clients&rsquo; energy problems, EN-POWER GROUP was founded in May 2003 to be an engineering firm that designs, develops, and delivers comprehensive and integrated energy solutions for any building type, from concept to completion. <br>    EN-POWER GROUP is an Equal Opportunity Employer.   We regret that due to the large volume of applications, EN&#8209;POWER GROUP will only be able to contact those candidates who are being most actively considered. Please bear in mind if you are selected for an interview we will contact you within 30 days of reviewing your application. However, if we think your skills and qualifications may be suitable for other similar positions, we may hold your details in our database and contact you in the future. 

  Research Internships at Microsoft provide a dynamic environment for research careers with a network of world-class research labs led by globally-recognized scientists and engineers. Our researchers and engineers pursue innovation in a range of scientific and technical disciplines to help solve complex challenges in diverse fields, including computing, healthcare, economics, and the environment.<br>

  Invesco is one of the world&rsquo;s leading global investment managers, entrusted with managing $1.2 trillion* in assets on behalf of clients worldwide. We are the 6th largest US retail asset manager and the 13th largest investment manager globally, and our more than 8,000 employees worldwide are dedicated to delivering an investment experience that helps people get more out of life. We are purely focused on managing a comprehensive range of active, passive and alternative investment capabilities, which we draw on to provide customized solutions aligned to client needs, our most important benchmark. (*As of May 31,2019)

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Video Editor/Graphic/Website Designer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

   Spring 2021 (January - May 2021) Digital Design Internship - UX/UI Design  <br>    Are you a hyper creative design student, interested in virtual events, brand pop-ups, interactive digital experiences, consumer events and mobile tours? Ever wondered who is creating one-of-a-kind experiential events? Then, TH Experiential is looking for people like you! We are seeking hardworking, creative individuals who have a strong eye for digital design, prior knowledge of UX/UI design and figma, and a possess a genuine interest in Events + Marketing. This is a multi-faceted opportunity where you will work closely with our Design and Creative Strategy teams, as well as the rest of our company to help bring our events to life. Looking for enthusiastic candidates  who are available to start January 4th, 2021 (or sooner!).  <br>     A little bit about TH&hellip;  <br>    Here at TH Experiential, we offer full service experiential live and digital event production based in New York City. We specialize in developing non-traditional, custom campaigns based on the objectives of our clients. How do we do it? Through advocacy building campaign concepts, and a holistic 360-degree approach in everything we do. From large-scale activations to events, mobile tours, installations and sampling-driving consumer engagement and brand loyalty is at the heart of everything we produce.   The goal at TH is to be the ultimate resource for our clients, providing insight, ideation and superior execution while creating authentically shareable experiences that position brands as innovators in their respective fields.   www.THExperiential.com <br>     What you&rsquo;ll be doing   Combine your creativity and technical skills to produce digital graphics and animations for virtual event concepts  Creating 2D and/or 3D Graphics  Concepting and implementing interactive design  Work with artists and illustrators in the conceptualization phase to produce mock-ups and proof of concepts  Assist in the production of wireframes, prototypes, concept sketches, interaction designs and user flows using key tools such as Omnigraffle and Microsoft Visio  Help to create clean and simple user-centered designs  Create prototypes and wireframes  Intern alongside the creative team to design and create graphics, environments and experiences  Contributing to creative brainstorms to develop and deliver amazing experiences  Learn about the entire production process and how they&rsquo;re implemented  Participate in awesome, one of a kind events  Work alongside industry professionals  <br>     We are looking for individuals who have:   Immediate availability for at least 3-5 days per week  Creative design thinking and a user-centric mindset  Understanding of interaction design principles  Knowledge of industry tools such as Figma, Sketch, InVision, Adobe InDesign, Illustrator, Zeplin and OmniGraffle; proficiency in Adobe Creative Suite strongly preferred  Business know-how: Understanding of business metrics and the ability to translate company goals and objectives into digital experiences  An interest in Graphic and Environmental Design and Experiential Activations  A desire to meet and achieve goals in a resourceful independent manner  Ability to build relationships with senior level professionals  Ability to work hands on and assist where needed  Must have clear and concise communication skills  An interest in event production / experiential marketing  The ability to work well under pressure in a fast-paced environment  Excellent communication, interpersonal and presentation skills  Effective problem solving, time management and organization skills  Intellectual curiosity  Relevant work and/or internship experience are a plus  3D design or experience with interactive technologies is a plus  <br>     What can TH Experiential offer you?   An opportunity to learn from the best what the industry has to offer with the potential for a full-time position after the internship is over (an tons of work samples to add to your portfolio!)  Mentoring program under talented &amp; seasoned Operations, Design Team, + Production professionals  Daily lunch stipend  Participate in culture events at the office including field trips to relevant design/art events  A dog-friendly workplace    Please note that this is an unpaid internship opportunity  

  The Software Engineer Summer Intern at Lazard will work within the Data Analytics Group. The primary responsibility is designing, building, testing, and maintaining large-scale software applications and data products. Successful candidates should have a strong programming and quantitative background. The Software Engineer Summer Intern will have the opportunity to work closely with data scientists, investment bankers and senior management across the Firm.   The summer internship will begin in late early June and will run for 10 weeks, concluding in early August.    Required Qualifications:   Advanced degree in Computer Science/Engineering or equivalent work experience  Excellent object oriented or functional analysis and design skills  Experience in rational databases such as MySQL and MSSQL, or NoSQL databases such as MongoDb and ElasticSearch   Experience programming with Python, JavaScript, or other programming language. Experience with object-oriented programming preferred  Experience in the full software development lifecycle (requirements gathering, designing, building, testing and maintenance)  Experience on a frontend technology stack including Angular, Express, and React  Experience with cloud technologies such as Microsoft Azure Platform  A passion for understanding real world problems through data analysis and presentation   Ability to work both independently and as a team player    Additional Preferred Qualifications:   Experience with Devops and designing RESTful API services  Strong interest or previous experience in finance preferred  

    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Williamsville, NY </h2> <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Company Description: </h3>  National Fuel Gas Company (NYSE: NFG) is a multi-billion dollar diversified energy company with corporate headquarters in Williamsville (Buffalo), New York and division operations in New York, Pennsylvania, Texas and California. The Company holds assets that span nearly every facet of the natural gas industry, including Utility, Pipeline and Storage, Exploration and Production and Energy Marketing. National Fuel&rsquo;s history dates to the earliest days of the natural gas and oil industry in the United States, and the Company has been responsible for many industry firsts.   National Fuel is currently seeking to fill the internship position below in the Information Technology department for the  Spring/Summer 2021  semester. <h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  Internship Description: </h3>   IT Creative Designer / Presentation Specialist    Work with IT personnel and business users to transform technical ideas and concepts into effective visual materials (i.e. diagrams, flow charts, PowerPoint presentations)  Design/create, update, and maintain department training materials and content presentations  Design/create graphical system process maps and system roadmaps  Work thoroughly and independently as well as collaboratively with a technical team to produce detailed documentation requirements and quality products  Work across various roles and levels within the IT Project Management Office and functional organization to define, maintain, and evolve communication of a technical nature  Apply new design styles and aesthetics to existing documentation and presentation materials  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Qualifications: </h3> Jr. or Sr. undergraduate or graduate student pursuing a degree/concentration in Communications, Media Studies (Graphic Design) or related discipline  Proficient in Microsoft Office suite or open to investigating Open Source tools to assist in creative communication  Ability to work with a high level of independence as well as collaboratively with a team  Able to learn quickly and take initiative with a strong sense of ownership  Excellent verbal and written communication skills  Strong work ethic, growth mindset and positive attitude  Ability to deliver high quality documentation with extreme attention to detail  Ability to quickly grasp complex technical concepts and simplify through design  Can balance and prioritize multiple assignments  Can perform all job functions remotely in a virtual environment while teleworking (during the pandemic) as well as in an office environment  Minimum GPA of 3.0    This position is a paid internship. Any candidate offered a position with National Fuel will be required to successfully complete a pre-employment drug test. Please submit your resume, cover letter, and transcripts by  January 21, 2021  to: jobs@natfuel.com 

  Marsh is a global leader in insurance broking and risk management. In more than 130 countries, our experts in every facet of risk and across industries help clients to anticipate, quantify, and more fully understand the range of risks they face. We work with clients of all sizes to define, design, and deliver innovative solutions to better quantify and manage risk. We offer risk management, risk consulting, insurance broking, alternative risk financing, and insurance program management services to businesses, government entities, organizations, and individuals around the world. To every client interaction we bring an unmatched combination of deep intellectual capital, industry- specific expertise, global experience, and collaboration.     Since 1871, clients have relied on Marsh for trusted advice, to represent their interests in the marketplace, make sense of an increasingly complex world, and help turn risks into new opportunities for growth. Our more than 30,000 colleagues work on behalf of our clients, who are enterprises of all sizes in every industry worldwide. We embrace a culture that celebrates and promotes the many backgrounds, heritages and perspectives of our colleagues and clients. Visit www.marsh.com for more information and follow us on LinkedIn and Twitter @MarshGlobal      Summary    This position is for an intern in Data Science who, under close supervision, develops quantitative models and statistical analyses for insurance risk modeling. This position assists in research of economic factors, performs a variety of basic financial and statistical analysis and supports the development of new, market-leading analytics-based tools to help clients assess and mitigate risk.      Responsibilities    Assists in the development of new, market-leading analytics-based tools to assess risk   Performs basic quantitative modeling and statistical analysis in order to assess risk and viability of risk mitigation solutions   Supports the understanding of business problems with the broader goal of creating an approach that starts with determining structured and unstructured data needs and availability, builds predictive and/or Machine Learning models, and finalizes with results that unlock insight for clients and colleagues   Demonstrates statistical analysis skill, data mining, actuarial, and/or research techniques, combined with broader awareness of the business and ongoing research, to function in a collaborative and consultancy role   Applies basic understanding of product and risk assessment and possible outcomes by scenario testing   Supports team members in designing analytical models and processes to help internal and external clients quantify and mitigate risks     Qualifications    Pursuing bachelor&rsquo;s Degree in Math, Statistics, Actuarial Science, Data Science or related field   May be interested in pursuing designation from the Casualty Actuarial Society   Ability to explain facts and figures related to job area   Developing statistical modeling knowledge   Detail orientation, communication, and interpersonal skills   Knowledge of modern programming languages such as Python   R, VBA, or SQL may be helpful but not required   Location: New York, NY  

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Engineering Internship (Summer 2021)  </h1>  Position Summary    Plug Power Inc. is actively seeking highly motivated Engineering Interns to engage in a summer internship assignment in various Plug Power locations. These interns will be responsible for assisting various Engineering disciplines in a wide variety of engineering initiatives and projects. Disciplines include mechanical, electrical, chemical, systems, design, manufacturing and service engineering. These candidates will gain exposure to a fast-paced manufacturing and engineering environment which includes developing a detailed understanding of Plug Power&rsquo;s products. All roles will focus on the successful completion of a technical project or process improvement, and documentation and presentation of results at the end of the internship.      Core Duties and Responsibilities    Develop and maintain a detailed understanding of all Plug Power products   Work with senior level engineers and management to interpret and analyze data   Assist in developing engineering processes with guidance from senior level engineers and management   Mechanical aptitude and ability to sufficiently make minor repairs as necessary   Ability to independently set up experiments and monitor progress   Understand engineering concepts and how to appropriately apply them in day to day projects   Ability to critically analyze data in terms of system performance and reliability    Represent Plug Power in a professional manner at all times and in all interactions   Perform all other duties as assigned       Education and Qualification    Pursuing a Bachelor of Science or Master's degree in Electrical, Mechanical, Chemical or a related program   Prior Internship experience preferred   Excellent written and verbal communication skills   Background/experience with statistical analysis   Possess solid hands on approach to problem-solving   Computer and software systems skills as applicable to position including but not limited to: Word, PowerPoint, Excel, and Outlook   Exceptional data analysis and presentation skills   Dynamic interpersonal skills and the ability to effectively communicate with diverse audiences and stakeholders at all levels   Ability to manage complex projects and multi-task effectively   Demonstrated analytical abilities with strong attention to detail   Excellent follow-through   Must be driven and self-motivated   Must possess the highest ethical standards and a commitment to work quality      Plug Power, Inc. is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Website Designer/Digital Markerter Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, front-end developer, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

     Start Here, Go Anywhere! Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world?  <br><br> During your internship at Arup, you&rsquo;ll have the chance to work with some of the most highly respected engineers and specialists in the world. You&rsquo;ll also get the opportunity to work on exciting and significant projects, delivering quality work that has a positive and lasting influence on the community and the environment.<br><br><br>  The Advanced Digital Engineering team is a global group of software developers, product managers, user experience designers and digital consultants within Arup. We use our collective talents to incubate and deliver technology-led solutions to clients, and in doing so help transform the way that cities, buildings and physical networks are planned and delivered. <br>     Our team members are involved in the full life cycle of digital solutions, from ideation to requirements gathering, design, development, deployment and ongoing maintenance and support. Our organizational model gives each of us the opportunity to participate in critical thinking, creative workshops, software architecture, and feature prioritization. We encourage our team members to help identify and incubate new ways to leverage technology in our industry. <br>     Our work is shaped by our values and the deep domain knowledge of in-house building experts who span the broad range of specialties in the built environment. Our data-driven solutions aim to empower clients to design and manage buildings more sustainably, deliver insight on urban resiliency from civic data, and empower city authorities to plan, design and deliver infrastructure projects more equitably, efficiently and with greater transparency. <br>     We also collaborate with experts across our firm to develop and deploy computational tools to enhance their ability to perform design and analysis. Our team serves as a catalyst for automation across Arup. Every day we use elegant software tools, cloud-based web applications, novel automation workflows, geospatial tools, advanced data analytics, machine learning and more to advance the design and delivery of airports, rail networks, urban infrastructure, bridges, tunnels, skyscrapers and other key components of the built environment. <br>    Our employee-owned firm promotes and supports forward looking research and development, and our team is deeply involved in the conceptualization, design, development and deployment of next-generation digital tools for our industry. We are looking for talented individuals interested in advancing their full stack development skills, and excited about engaging experts across the built environment to collaboratively build new digital solutions to help us reshape the world around us.<br><br> Responsibilities of this specific role will include, but not be limited to the following:  <br><br> Open-source projects and rapid prototyping,   Graphically communicating complex information and processes simply   Working with complex data sets.   Working from AutoCAD plans.   Prepare reports, presentations, and boards.   Rendering images, graphs, and tables to effectively communicate ideas in a clear and concise visual presentation.   <br> Qualifications  <br><br> Required:  <br><br> Bachelor&rsquo;s Degree in computer science, civil, mechanical, structural   Minimum of 3.0 GPA or higher   

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Designer/Web Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, front-end developer, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

    Kimley-Horn is looking for Civil Engineering interns to join our White Plains, NY office for the summer of 2021! We have opportunities with our Land Development Services team!   At Kimley-Horn, we do things differently. People, clients, and employees are at the forefront of who we are. Clients know we prioritize achieving their goals and growing their success. Employees know our culture and approach to business are built on a desire to provide an environment for everyone to flourish. Our commitment to quality is only as good as the people behind it&mdash; that&rsquo;s why we welcome and develop passionate, hardworking, and proactive employees. We take pride in how our employee retention, positive company culture, and core values have led to Kimley-Horn&rsquo;s placement on the Fortune &ldquo;100 Best Companies to Work&rdquo; list for 13 years!   Our interns benefit from hands-on experience, technical and consulting trainings, mentorship opportunities, and developmental programs geared towards growing Kimley-Horn&rsquo;s next generation of full-time analysts. You will also gain exposure to client interactions and project financials. As a valuable addition to our team, you will solve complex problems, assist project managers, and collaborate with partners to produce our clients&rsquo; visions for the future built environment.    The Requirement:    In the process of obtaining an ABET accredited engineering degree (Bachelor or Masters) by summer of 2022 in these majors:  Civil and/or Environmental Engineering   Mechanical, Electrical, Systems, Biological, Biosystems, or Agricultural Engineering       The Skills:    Excellent verbal and written communication   Ability to apply technical skills to meet project demands and solve problems for our clients   Positive attitude and an impressive work ethic   Clear sense of urgency and self-initiative to meet deadlines   Attention to details and ability to contribute to a positive work environment   Passion and demonstrated drive to achieve goals   <br>  Applicants must be legally authorized to work for Kimley-Horn in the U.S. without employer sponsorship. We do not typically sponsor H1-B or any other work visa petitions.    <br>  Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities   The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor&rsquo;s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c) 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Digital Media/Video/Photo/Web Design Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related keywords: video editor, video production, marketing, internship, videographer, content marketer, website, film, photo editor, social media, digital marketing, video, photography, web design, digital marketing, social media marketing, photographer   Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

         This is not work experience, this is an opportunity to experience work.  <br>   An Intern is an investment in Moog&rsquo;s future. The intern relationship provides a three-way benefit between the student, university, and Moog. It is an opportunity for the student to incorporate classroom learning into professional, real world situations. The student brings new ideas to Moog on how to tackle projects and challenges, while Moog benefits from fresh perspectives from the brightest students in their respective fields of study. By having the students work on actual programs, we also work towards solving our customers&rsquo; most difficult technical challenges. <br>    Moog&rsquo;s Aircraft and Space &amp; Defense Groups, in the Buffalo, NY area, are seeking students for Summer Electrical Engineering Internships &amp; Co-Ops!   For other Engineering Internship opportunities, please see requisition #205035. <br>   As part of the Moog U.S. Internship Program, this position provides strategic and tactical support to senior and mid-level employees. <br>   The student will contribute to routine engineering work requiring the application of standard techniques, procedures, and criteria in carrying out a variety of engineering tasks. <br>   The student will work on discipline-focused projects and tasks to enhance their collegiate learning experience, while providing meaningful contributions to the Moog Engineering Team(s). <br>    Responsibilities   Contribute to the preparation and execution of key engineering tasks at Moog  Provide technical support to engineers, as needed  Work experience may include conceptual design, detail design, testing, and/or project engineering, based on the student's educational discipline  Provide input on project processes, strategies, and execution  Operate as a multidisciplinary member of the team of creative, independent individuals  Represent Moog in a manner consistent with its technical and professional reputation  <br>    Basic Requirements   Enrolled in an  Electrical Engineering  Bachelor's or Master's Degree program, at an accredited university  GPA of at least 3.0  This position requires access to U.S. export-controlled information.  Due to the current and changing COVID-19 restrictions, relocation may not be possible for certain assignments.  <br>    Students within the Moog U.S. Internship Program are expected to have a professional disposition, effective communication skills, a strong desire to learn, a positive attitude, and the ability to work in a team environment.  <br>   Please note this requisition is for sourcing purposes and will be used to fill individual openings as they become available.<br>     EOE/AA Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity 

   Subsidiary:  NYN<br><br> Barrett Paving Materials Inc. is a leader in heavy civil construction with a vertically integrated value chain which includes aggregate production, hot mix asphalt plants, asphalt paving services, and a wide range of road construction work. Barrett engages in heavy civil and commercial construction projects in counties throughout Upstate NY, specializing in airport and highway work. Barrett&rsquo;s mission has been to strengthen and grow by empowering our people, fostering innovation, and utilizing new technology.  Barrett is a subsidiary of the Colas Group , a worldwide leader in infrastructure construction and maintenance. Our company provides competitive pay, outstanding benefits, career advancement opportunities, professional education, and extensive training for every employee.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader">  Mission </h2>

   Job Title:  Electrical Engineering Intern    Department:  Electrical Engineering    Reports To:  Director, Electrical Engineering    Status:  Nonexempt   <br>   Job Summary     The Electrical Engineering Intern will gain hands on experience to complement technical coursework. Interns will be assigned roles on projects consistent with their level of education and experience.    Duties     This job description is not totally inclusive of all the job functions required of the Electrical Engineering Intern. An employee assigned to this role may have additional, job-related duties.     Essential Functions:    Assisting design and development of specific electronic modules or components to meet design requirements   Supporting electrical analysis, compiling data for investigation   Assisting in design and fabrication of prototype hardware   Supporting the electrical testing of hardware and documenting results   Generating and reviewing electrical design content of drawings, engineering specifications and reporting     Supervisory Responsibilities:    The Electrical Engineering Intern will not have any supervisory responsibilities.    Systems Used:     Hardware &ndash;  Laptop/desktop computer, printer, copier, scanner, plotter, fax machine, telephone, cell phone, and calculator    Software &ndash;  Microsoft Office Suite &amp; Project, ERP System, Smartsheets, other as necessary    Education, Experience, and Skills      Basic Qualifications    Undergraduate student majoring in: Electrical Engineering or related field   Ability to maintain strict confidentiality   Ability to respond to changing situations   Excellent verbal and written communication skills   Attention to detail and high organization skills   High proficiency with computer programs   Strong quantitative and qualitative analytical skills     Preferred Skills    Ability to work in a fast-paced environment   Proficiency in using Microsoft Office applications   Ability to work independently   Results driven    <br>   Physical Activities and Requirements     <br>  Prolonged periods of computer-based work   Ability to lift up to 15 pounds at a time   Ability to travel as necessary    <br>   Work Schedule &amp; Required Availability     This is a nonexempt, hourly position. The intern will work core business hours, 8 am &ndash; 5 pm, Monday-Friday. 

 Overview:   MLJ Contracting is a premier general contractor performing public works projects for major agencies in the New York heavy construction market. We provide quality workmanship to our customers, fair and high-integrity relationships to our suppliers and subcontractors, challenging and rewarding careers to our employees, and a safe and professional work site for all.

  . <br>   

 **This is for a summer 2021 internship**<br><br> Here at Lockheed Martin's RMS business in Liverpool, NY we are working on many exciting defense programs and developing cutting edge products and applications to meet the complex and evolving needs of our customers. <br> We are looking for talented Software Engineers to join our team, working with other engineering disciplines (hardware, firmware, systems, integration &amp; test) to help develop many best-in-class products and solutions.<br><br> The selected software engineer will participate in all phases of the software development lifecycle (design, code, and test), with a focus on Java and/or C++ software development. The engineer will leverage MST software engineering processes and procedures while performing their respective software engineering and verification activities. <br><br> The successful candidate will be flexible, motivated, dedicated, detail-focused, team-oriented, and capable of multi-tasking. <br><br> Candidates must have the ability to obtain a DOD security clearance to at least the Secret level.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Basic qualifications for this role will include working towards a Bachelor's level degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Information Systems, Applied Mathematics, Physics or related technical field and zero years of professional experience. <br><br> Candidates must have the ability to obtain a DOD security clearance to at least the Secret level.<br> Desired Skills: <br> A cumulative GPA of 2.5 or higher is preferred but not required.<br> BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern 

 Company Description<br>  Chromalloy has expanded from a gas turbine parts repair business into an OEM supplier of production parts and advanced repairs and services for gas turbines used in aviation and power applications. Chromalloy serves the airline, military, marine and energy segments with a broad range of services at locations around the globe.   Chromalloy is a subsidiary of Sequa Corporation. Sequa Corporation is a diversified industrial company with operations in the aerospace, metal coatings and automotive industries. Sequa is a Carlyle Group company. For additional information, visit www.sequa.com. 

   Teachable is looking for a new or recent graduate to join our growing team of engineers! This is a full time permanent role for a software engineer. The start date for this role is flexible but still limited to July 2021

 

   All of our internships will be remote with our site/civil internships based in MA, CT, NH, and NY; transportation internships based in MA and CT; our landscape architecture and coastal internship based in the Boston area.   We pride ourselves in fostering a remote environment where our interns can learn and grow. Our internships offer students the opportunity to work on real assignments across multiple disciplines, while also directly relating to their coursework. Students are paired with a &ldquo;buddy&rdquo; and Team Leader, both of which provide day-to-day guidance on projects throughout the summer. We also rely heavily on our internship pool for entry-level full-time openings each year.    Qualifications:   Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and multitasking environment, must embrace challenges and details, be resourceful, and have great organizational and time management skills  Currently enrolled and pursuing a BS in Civil or Transportation Engineering, or a related engineering degree  At least 2 years of completed coursework as well as knowledge of Excel and AutoCAD is strongly preferred, but not required    Responsibilities:   Assist the team in researching, compiling, and examining a wide variety of structure related data  Under supervision, perform engineering calculations, proofreading, and copying of various reports and specs  Assist staff with a variety of projects and/or field assignments  Potential to learn and perform light drafting tasks and potentially assist with small design tasks in AutoCAD    Tighe &amp; Bond  is a growing, well-established, employee-owned, engineering and environmental consulting firm with over 420 employees. A Top 10 New England ENR design firm, Tighe &amp; Bond was recognized by Civil Engineering News and Zweig Group as one of the &ldquo;Best Firms&rdquo; to work for in the country. Our team of engineers, scientists, planners, and other professionals provide creative solutions for critical challenges that impact water resources, wetlands, the environment, climate change, and sustainability from eleven offices across Connecticut, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode Island, Maine and New York. The firm offers employees an inviting mid-size company culture and an opportunity to develop a rewarding career that can have an impact on the environmental development of the Northeast region.    Tighe &amp; Bond  is an equal opportunity employer and affords equal opportunity to all applicants and employees for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other status protected under local, state, or federal laws. 

 Responsibilities  - Collaborate with SaveAway® Dev Team + Leads to finish the development and furthering launch of the core SaveAway® app in a way that is a joy and delight both for users and friends+family you invite  - Obtain, prioritize, and implement changes suggested by InSpirAVE Users and Partners<br/>- Ensure continuity by building on previous development.<br/>- Collaborate with developers, designers, and business partners to ensure the launch of the App. online, through app-platforms e.g., ProductHunt, and through in-store rollouts is a massive success<br/>- Implement for gamification and virality in signing up new users<br/>- Ability to solve for roadblocks associated with the natural path of development through creativity<br/>- Strong resolve and persistence in "getting things done”  Requirements:  Highly Preferred:    - Experience (or high-level of initiative with support of our Dev.Team to develop proficiency) in Java, Eclipse for Java EE developers, Spring MVC, SQL (ie. SQL server)   Other Requirements:   - Experience and/or high level of energy and excitement for fullstack or backend engineering that will 'change the game' to truly 'Think Different' in reimagining retail banking + commerce  - Exposure to software development as a CS graduate or equivalent, current studies, Bootcamp with Portfolio (deployed or on GitHub), or self-taught skills  - JavaScript , jQuery, HTML , CSS  - Utilizing JSP templating as well as AJAX requests with form validation in JavaScript for a responsive front end  - Opportunity to engage in major refactoring to a RESTful API with front end framework, progressive web app, mobile app, etc  - Experience, interest, or ability to collaborate for DevOps including:<br/>** Deployment using FileZilla to generate WAR files, pushing to Linux server with Putty, regularly pushing code to our repository via Git<br/>** Utilizing correct design patterns when adding tables to the database and writing SQL using JDBC to create, read, update and destroy rows from tables<br/>** Writing and changing controllers/models in a Spring MVC web application, adding utilities to the app, as well as manually configuring new JAR files as third party libraries.  - Team player<br/>Not necessary but a plus to have some experience or interest in applied tools including WordPress and SendGrid to engage end-users and working with UX specialist to implement their designs or user feedback in our existing code base with HTML and CSS<br/>- Passionate about the positive social impact that your development can deliver<br/>- Good team-player and collaborator with users and business partners.  Please feel free to contact us and apply!  This internship will offer you the opportunity to receive academic credit and experience!<br/>Related keywords: software engineer, full stack developer, java developer, software developer, web developer, developer  Job Type: Full-time  Pay: $0.00 per year  Benefits:  Flexible schedule  Referral program   Schedule:  Monday to Friday   COVID-19 considerations:<br/>With SaveAway® recognized for the positive outcomes it helps deliver for all to come out that much stronger from the pandemic, that unwavering commitment is equally reflected in the flexibility we provide our team including the option to work remotely.  Experience:  Java: 1 year (Preferred)  APIs: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  One location  Fully Remote   This Job Is:  A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply  Open to applicants under 18 years old, provided it is legally allowed for the job and location  Open to applicants who do not have a high school diploma/GED  A good fit for applicants with gaps in their resume, or who have been out of the workforce for the past 6 months or more  A job for which all ages, including older job seekers, are encouraged to apply  Open to applicants who do not have a college diploma  A job for which people with disabilities are encouraged to apply   Company's website:  www.saveaway.net   Company's Facebook page:  https://www.instagram.com/inspirave/   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19  

  FactSet is an inclusive community unified by the spirit of going above and beyond. Our ethos is to embrace diversity, and that our best ideas can come from anyone, anywhere, at any time. We continuously look ahead to advance the future and technology of our industry, by rolling up our sleeves to solve tough problems together, and by learning from our successes, as well as our failures.     We&rsquo;re looking for talented, hard-working and out-of-the-box thinkers to bring new perspective and fresh ideas to our team. Engineering interns are aligned with specific teams where they&rsquo;ll work alongside our full-time engineers to develop new technologies, brainstorm solutions, and contribute to a project. During your 12-week internship, you&rsquo;ll have ownership over a project that personally interests you, while building your coding and collaboration skills.     Like full-time FactSetters, interns attend social events such as casino nights, lunch parties, and summer picnics. They also get the perks that go with being a FactSetter, such as subsidized lunch Mondays-Thursdays, all-day sodas, juices, and snacks, and breakout areas with couches and plasma TVs.      Minimum Qualifications:    Currently a Junior pursuing a BS in Computer Science (or equivalent)   Experience in programming with C++, C# or another OOP language   Strong problem-solving and analytical skills   Strong communication and interpersonal skills   Ability to work both independently and in groups   Ability to prioritize and set goals on shifting priorities       Preferred Qualifications:    Experience in .NET, GUI environments, and database technologies   Must continually strive to acquire new skills in relevant technology and business areas      At FactSet, we celebrate diversity of thought, experience, and perspective. We are committed to disrupting bias and a transparent hiring process. All qualified applicants will be considered for employment regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or veteran status. FactSet participates in E-Verify.     The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor&rsquo;s legal duty to furnish information.     FactSet is an Equal Opportunity Employer &ndash; M/F/Veteran/Disability/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Shopify Web Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, front-end developer, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 Overview:   J-Track, LLC was formed by three individuals with over 70 years of combined experience in transit and track construction work. We have successfully performed railroad track work, civil construction, and architectural work for a number of government agencies engaged in public transportation. The company&rsquo;s staff includes professional engineers, project managers, superintendents, foremen, quality control managers and safety managers.

      Posted on:  Oct 27, 2020<br> Office:  New York<br> Department:  Information Technology<br> Type:  Business Services<br><br> Position Summary  : <br> As an intern of the PG (Programming Group), he/she will provide assistance in application development work, specifically custom in-house development. The intern will work closely with primarily the PG team (other programmers, SQL database administrator) and secondarily with the Applications Support team, Networking team, and Operations team.<br><br> Duties &amp; Responsibilities  :   Assist the members of the PG in the performance of their duties and responsibilities, specifically in custom in-house development.  Assist in the implementation of solutions in a timely manner, adhering to deadlines and communicating impediments to meeting them.  Assist in testing solutions.  Assist in creating documentation and in updating the team wiki.  Assist to investigate and learn new tools and systems which might facilitate the efficient creation of necessary programs.   Qualifications: <br><br> Education:  College student taking Computer Science or related field.<br><br> Experience:  Some experience with needs analysis, client/server and web programming is a plus.<br><br> Job Specific/Technological Skills:  Experience to program advanced web applications using Visual Basic .NET  Knowledge of MS SQL  Basic understanding of Active Directory  Knowledge of Power BI is a plus   Skills and Abilities:  Must have design and programming skills  Must have an understanding of client/server programming and relational database design  Must possess good communication skills, both oral and written  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Video Edit/Web Design/Photo Edit Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related keywords: video editor, video production, marketing, internship, videographer, content marketer, website, film, photo editor, social media, digital marketing, video, photography, web design, digital marketing, social media marketing, photographer   Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Video editing: 1 year (Preferred)  Photo editing: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

     POSITION SUMMARY:    <br>  Responsible for PC &amp; Printer troubleshooting, maintenance, repair and installation, hardware and software configurations, internet/specialty software, completing assigned projects/moves, and keeping track of computer related deliveries. Must be able to work independently with minimal supervision, as well as, part of a team. Must have exceptional customer service skills.   <br>   EDUCATION, TRAINING, EXPERIENCE, CERTIFICATION AND LICENSURE:    <br>  Pursuing some sort of degree or certification (high school, college).    Basic knowledge of computers (software and hardware).    <br>   SPECIAL EQUIPMENT, SKILLS, OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS:    <br>  Basic knowledge of computer technology, including PC&rsquo;s/laptops, printers, network.   Must possess strong communications skills and ability to interact well with clients at all levels.  

  The Est&eacute;e Lauder Companies Inc. is a manufacturer and marketer of skin care, makeup, fragrance and hair care products and has gained a worldwide reputation for elegance, luxury and superior quality. Its products are sold in over 150 countries and territories. Its distinguished portfolio of more than 25 brands includes some of the most recognized prestige names in the beauty world including Est&eacute;e Lauder, Aramis, Clinique, Origins, M.A.C., Bobbi Brown, La Mer and Aveda among others.

  Forter provides new generation fraud prevention to meet the challenges faced by modern enterprise e-commerce. Only Forter provides fully automated, real-time Decision as a Service&trade; fraud prevention, with approve/decline decisions backed by a 100% chargeback guarantee. The system eliminates the need for rules, scores, or manual reviews, making fraud prevention friction-free. The result is fraud prevention that is invisible to buyers and empowers merchants with increased approvals, smoother checkout, and the near elimination of false positives - meaning more sales and happier customers. Behind the scenes, Forter's machine learning technology combines advanced cyber intelligence with behavioral and identity analysis to create a multi-layered fraud detection mechanism.   Forter is looking for an IT Intern on a part time, 6 month contract basis.    Stuff you'll do:   Provide basic helpdesk support, including troubleshooting for Mac and Windows systems  Log and track service requests using an internal ticketing system, and maintain history records and related problem documentation  Handle problem recognition, research, isolation, resolution and follow-up for routine customer problems and escalate more complex problems to supervisor or technical staff  Set up and configure desktops and laptops according to the company's standard application build  Assist with creating and updating internal IT documentation  Assist with research and implementation of IT projects  Participate in meetings and training sessions    Stuff you'll need:   College degree or trade school certification (technical field preferred) with GPA of 2.5 or higher - if you are currently pursuing one or both, that works too  Strong oral and written communications skills, and the ability to work both independently and with others  Solid organization and planning skills, with the ability to demonstrate effective project coordination, facilitation, and implementation  Deductive reasoning skills - must be able to analyze and synthesize information for problem solving  Experience using Mac and Windows systems  Solid understanding of core operating system technologies, including installation and configuration, hardware components and their functions, and major desktop components and interfaces and their functions  Strong self-motivation and an eagerness to learn new technology    Nice to Haves:   Have related desktop support experience  Experience with G-Suite, Microsoft Office 365, Network topology and methodology, and MDM technology   At Forter, we believe unique people create unique ideas, and valuable experience comes in many forms. So, even if your background doesn't match everything we have listed in the job description, we still encourage you to apply and tell us why your skills and values could be an asset to us. By welcoming different perspectives, we grow together as humans and as a company.    EEO    Forter is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that will consider all qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, national origin, genetics, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. 

   About the Role    We are the NLP team at Liquidnet. We develop proprietary NLP and ML systems to produce analytics that predict the market from corporate communications, news, and alternative data to outperform humans and machines alike. Our systems and algorithms automate traditional financial research, and bring technical accuracy, speed, and efficiency to all corners of the finance industry.   Portfolio managers, research analysts and other financial movers and shakers use our data to understand and anticipate relevant market movement, strengthen investment theses and enhance their trading strategies. Prattle is a part of the new wave of machine learning and AI that the future of finance is building upon.   We have a track record of hiring amazing people and giving them (experienced professionals and recent grads alike) autonomy and responsibility from the start. Our team runs the gamut from Ph.D.&rsquo;s to junior developers, united by the desire to solve hard problems with data and creative solutions. You&rsquo;ll have the best tools and resources available to get the job done and thrive in a collaborative environment where our teams are passionate about building great things.      Responsibilities    Analyze unique proprietary data sets.   Create, evaluate, and enhance mathematical models and streaming analytics pipelines.   Write production code.   Partner globally with other data scientists, quants, developers, product designers, clients and industry leaders to tackle the important problems faced by the world&rsquo;s largest asset managers     Skills and Experience    Currently studying Statistics, Economics, Quantitative Finance, Applied Physics, Engineering or related data analysis focused fields.   Proficiency in a mainstream programming language, such as Python, R, C/C++, Go, or other languages with applicability to managing data and data analysis.   Experience working with databases, preferably with knowledge of SQL.   A strong foundation in a data driven/numeric discipline, including STEM, or quantitative social sciences.   Familiarity with software development practices such as version control (git), test frameworks, code review tools, deployment configuration management, continuous integration.   Experience with data analysis and machine learning libraries/frameworks and methods.   Excellent communication skills and team orientation   Ability to collaborate globally; leveraging technology to communicate and partner with our NY and London offices  

   Brisbane Consulting Group, LLC is seeking an Accounting Software Implementation Intern and in that position, you will be exposed to basic accounting procedures and principles ranging from account payable and receivable systems to general ledger entries to payroll. You will work under the direction of the Senior Implementation Specialist to provide on-site and remote accounting software consulting and support to clients.   To be a strong candidate for this internship, candidates should understand basic accounting principles, including AP, AR, and GL knowledge. <h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  REQUIREMENTS </h3> The candidate should have obtained or be pursuing a college degree in the accounting field  Ability to prioritize, multi-task, and follow through on tasks/projects  Demonstrate strong technical skills with Microsoft Office products (Outlook, Excel, and Word) and accounting software  Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal  Strong interpersonal skills to serve our clients  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> ADDITIONAL INFORMATION </h3> Internship period: Spring 2020 or Summer 2020  Ability to work a minimum of 20 hours/week is required  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> APPLICATION INSTRUCTIONS </h3>  To apply for any of our open positions, submit your resume via our online application. Please email swilkinson@LumsdenCPA.com if you have questions. <br>    Brisbane Consulting Group LLC is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Lumsden &amp; McCormick, LLP Certified Public Accountants. 

 Description:   Job Title:  Software Engineer (Intern - Rochester, NY)    Job Location:  Rochester, NY<br>    Job ID:  CS20200510-51392    Job Description:    Apply computer science, engineering, and mathematical analysis concepts and principles in the development of software for the target application   Work closely with cross functional members of the engineering organization to develop and evaluate interfaces between hardware and software, and operational performance requirements and design of the overall system   Support and participate in all phases of the software development life cycle, including requirements analysis, design, implementation, integration, and test of embedded software for real-time control of advanced tactical radio equipment   Develop software test procedures, software programs, and related documentation   Utilize modeling tools and equipment to establish operating data, conduct experimental tests, and evaluate results   Participate in peer reviews, identify, track and repair defects   Utilize a variety of software languages (i.e., C++, C#, C, Java, Ruby, HTML5, XML, SQL, Perl, Python, Ajax, Qt) on Windows, Linux, mobile platforms, and embedded real time operating systems (VxWorks, Linux, QNX, Integrity, Windows CE, and others for Motorola, Intel, TI, and custom processor designs)     Qualifications:    Working towards a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Software Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Wireless Engineering, Information Security, Mathematics, Digital Arts &amp; Sciences or related field   GPA of 3.0 or greater     Preferred Skills:    One or more of the following: C++, C#, C, Java, Ruby, JEE, HTML5, XML, SQL, Qt, Windows, .NET, Unix, Linux, SOA, RTOS, Real-Time Controls, Wireless, Software Security, Robotics, OOA/OOD ,  Hadoop, Android, Embedded Systems  

   WHO WE ARE    Kinship, Mars Petcare's newest division, is a hotbed for future innovation, data science and analytics, and at the forefront of emerging technology for pets, pet owners and veterinarians. At Kinship, we move quickly to shape the future of pet care. We are Optimistic, Purposefully Inquisitive, Open to all, and passionate about what's possible. We're a coalition of bright minds, big ideas, and bold businesses united by our love of pets.. <br>    Part of Mars, Incorporated, a family-owned business with more than a century of history making diverse products and offering services for people and the pets people love, the 85,000 Associates in Mars Petcare are dedicated to one purpose: A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS. With 75 years of experience, our portfolio of almost 50 brands serves the health and nutrition needs of the world's pets and The WALTHAM Centre for Pet Nutrition has advanced research in the nutrition and health of pets for over 50 years. Mars Petcare is also a leading veterinary health provider through a network of over 2,000 pets. We're also active in innovation and technology for pets, with WISDOM PANEL&trade; genetic health screening and DNA testing for dogs, the WHISTLE&trade; GPS dog tracker, and LEAP VENTURE STUDIO accelerator and COMPANION FUND&trade; programs that drive innovation and disruption in the pet care industry. <br>     OUR INTERNSHIP PROGRAM    Kinship is committed to providing interns with a valuable experience that will help build a strong foundation for entering into the workforce. In addition to a structured mentorship program, regular feedback, and networking opportunities, our interns are exposed to a broad variety of projects and will get to work on cross functional projects with other interns in their group. Our paid internship program will run for 13 weeks from January 25 - April 30. You can expect to work alongside 3-4 other interns in your location and will have the opportunity to present your project to our leadership team at the end of your internship. <br>     A BIT ABOUT OUR TEAM    The Kinship Data &amp; Analytics team is a newly formed group with global impact on the Kinship businesses. This team, a mixture of engineering, product insights, and data science associates, will partner with internal and Mars Petcare teams to build a rich understanding of pets and pet-owners and power our business and the Kinship data ecosystem. We are using an evolving, cutting edge tech stack to help us ingest, process, model and democratize data from across the segment to create robust pet-centric views of our clients. <br>     HOW YOU'LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS   Drive actionable insights on pet parent behavior  Develop dashboard to effectively communicate insights    WHO WE NEED TO HELP US PET PARENT LIKE A PRO:    As Kinship people, we have three pillars that set out how we aim to be-in our everyday work, and in how we approach each other. We call these our Cultural Pillars. In all of the roles that we hire for, we look for people who are Optimistic, Purposefully Inquisitive, and Open to All.   And for this role, you'll need these skills to knock it out of the dog park:  Familiarity with Python and SQL  Familiarity with data visualizations tools (e.g., Looker, Tableau)  Basic presentation skills  Must be currently enrolled in an undergraduate or graduate university program in the U.S. during the Spring 2021 semester and able to intern remotely or Hybrid   Kinship takes being Open to All seriously. We encourage applications from individuals underrepresented in their field of study, and those that can potentially add new and valuable perspectives to the pet care and tech industries. Multicultural, Black, Indigenous and students of color, are strongly encouraged to apply.    WHAT YOU WILL GAIN FROM THE EXPERIENCE   Build technical skills in key growth areas (i.e. Python, SQL)  Present key learnings to the leadership team  Receive coaching &amp; mentorship on career development (e.g., resume building, networking, career trajectory)  

 We are on a mission to make the world smaller with one Gesture at a time. Being one of the newest on-demand companies in the market, we live out our company mission by helping to provide the solution to the age-old problem of overpriced “gifting.” With Gesture, anyone can easily send flowers, wine, champagne and so much more from all across the nation starting at $20, with free delivery and no surprise fees.  Helping you stay connected one Gesture at a time.  We are looking for an iOS Developer Intern to join our team immediately! You will work with our team of talented engineers to design and build the next generation of our mobile applications.   Responsibilities:    Add new features and functionalities to the existing iOS app   Work on improving usability and security of the app   Work with QA, the support team and customers in diagnosing and resolving issues   Play a key role in designing and developing the next generation of our app   Participate in and lead the designs of new features   Deliver high-quality code within specified deadlines    Qualifications:    Experience with Xcode and LLVM build environments   Experience with SWIFT, object-oriented programming knowledge   Strong knowledge of building iOS applications supporting iOS version 7.0 and up   Familiarity with modern UI design guidelines   Multithreading / asynchronous programming   Familiar with using REST APIs and consuming network-based services   Familiar with HTTP   Experience in developing Android apps is a great plus   Knowledge of GSuite, Slack, and Zoom or similar applications   We encourage you to visit yourgesture.com at your earliest convenience and download our app.  We look forward to meeting you soon.  Job Type: Internship  Pay: $0.01 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  College Credit  

   Who We Are:  New York Air Brake has been serving the rail industry since 1890 with innovative train control systems. Headquartered in Watertown, New York, with operations in Nixa &amp; Kansas City, Missouri; Irving, Texas; West Chicago, Illinois and a brand new, state-of-the-art manufacturing facility in Salisbury, North Carolina. Known for innovation, quality, customer focus, and safety, NYAB continues to grow and offer career opportunities in a people-first environment. <br>    This is your opportunity to make a big impact on the next generation of braking and safety systems. You can expect challenging work and an insiders view into your future profession. You will work as an individual and as part of a project team, while receiving regular feedback in preparation for a final presentation to company leaders. <br>     Responsibilities will be focused in one or more of the following areas:   Participate in the development and implementation of beneficial programs/projects aimed at improving environmental efficiency, employee safety, and equipment ergonomics  Monitoring, analyzing, and reporting of operational safety, environmental and sustainability metrics  Participate on new equipment launch teams to complete requirements for HSE, including job hazard analysis, personal protective equipment assessments, machine guarding assessments, waste evaluations and HSE regulatory permitting  Investigate and contribute to the resolution of employee occupational injuries, environmental incidents and property loss events  Assist with process safety improvement projects, including use of six sigma tools, lean, and project management skills as required  Contribute and participate in implementation and auditing teams to ensure OSHA, EPA, and ISO14001 / OHSAS18001 requirements are being met  Development of safety and environmental awareness training, communications material and employee events  Liaison work with HSE, Facilities, Engineering, and other functional disciplines  <br>     What We Offer:  Our internships are not all work. NYAB is located in Watertown, New York. When not working, spend your free time hiking the Adirondack Mountains, kayaking the many waterways, enjoying the beaches of Lake Ontario or exploring the history, food and fun the Thousand Islands Region has to offer. You are just a short drive to World Class Casino&rsquo;s, Golf, Shopping and the award winning Finger Lakes Wine Country. Our interns begin work as early as the end of May and work up until the middle of August. Expect 40 hours per week and a competitive salary (based on experience and position) of up to $20 per hour. You will take part in special events, &amp; outings, take advantage of wellness &amp; workout programs in our fitness facility or join the lunchtime kickball league. There is something for everyone as a summer intern. <br>   Required Skills<br> Enthusiastic approach to work  Resourceful &ndash; not intimidated by large assignments  Ability to multi-task and work in a fast- paced, team- focused environment  Self-motivation and the ability to learn new assignments quickly  Strong communication, organization and collaboration skills  Knowledge of statistical tools preferred  <br><br> Required Experience<br> Previous relevant internship, co-op, course, or work experience  <br>     Education:   Co-Op Opportunity for Environmental, Chemical, Occupational Health &amp; Safety or Industrial Engineering majors with a GPA of 3.0 or higher.  <br>     Offers of employment are contingent on pre-employment drug testing and criminal background screening results  <br>     New York Air Brake is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to excellence through diversity: EOE/AA/M/F/D/V  

Graphic Designer UI/UX Internship <br><br> Company:  Retensa Industry: SaaS, Management Consulting <br> Department:  Technology Solutions Contact: careers@retensa.com <br> Position Title:  Graphic Designer Intern Phone: <span id="jobsearch-JobDescription-phone-number"><a href="tel:+1-212-545-1280">(212) 545-1280</a></span><br><br> Who We Are:  Retensa is a thought leader, global expert, and innovator of employee retention strategies. They integrate organizational science and online technology with a company's corporate culture to create real-world talent management solutions. Retensa unlocks insights hidden in workforce data. Through connected and contextualized intelligence, Retensa helps organizations reduce employee turnover and retain top talent ensuring that the company and the employee succeed. <br><br> What We Believe:  Retensa was founded under the principle that the employee-firm relationship has changed. The old models of talent management no longer work. Due to social and economic changes, today's workforce has different needs, wants, and expectations than a short few years ago. Whether we like it or not, this new breed – the Emergent Workforce – crosses all ages, races, genders, and geographies; changing how we attract, motivate, and retain top talent. <br><br> What You Will Do:  Graphic Designers will work in a forward-thinking environment to build the layout, design, style, and “look and feel” of our cloud-based applications and websites. Your work will be the doorway to our organization. We are looking for a designer that will strengthen our brand, by creating a responsive, mobile-friendly and modern experience. Projects include: <br><br> Refreshing our current online brand  Creating a first-class user experience across our platforms  Redesigning communication diagrams and interactive models  Aligning Print, Audio & Video messages   This is not a filing and copying internship. <br><br> Requirements:  Candidates should be hard working, enthusiastic, and resourceful. Online portfolio and previous design experience is required for this position.You should also have at least 3 direct experiences out of the following: <br><br> Photoshop  Adobe Illustrator  WordPress  HTML/PHP  Video Editing (After Effects, AVS, Final Cut, or similar)  Icon design  Infographics   This is a challenging internship for passionate individuals with previous graphic design experience. Retensa internship candidates should be hard working, enthusiastic, and resourceful undergraduate seniors or Masters. The ideal candidate should possess good written and verbal communication skills and must include samples/portfolio of websites or design pieces with application. Retensa team members are strong team players who are highly motivated with a positive attitude. <br><br> Time:  Hours/Week: 16 – 24. Minimum of 2 days/week. (Part/Flex-Time Available). <br><br> To apply, please submit your application to our Careers Site <br> Due to the high volume of applicants, we may only be able to contact qualified candidates.*  

 Current MBA student graduating between December 2021 and Spring 2022.  3+ years of full-time industry work experience, which occurred between the conferral date from your undergraduate program and prior to starting your MBA or master’s program.   At Amazon Web Services (AWS), you’ll learn a lot and apply it quickly. Each day could be completely different from the last. It’s a continually evolving place where motivated employees thrive and where employee ownership and accountability lead to results. <br><br> Ground Transportation (car rental companies, passenger rail operators, and bus companies, excluding public commuter service) is a $236B market. As an Intern, you’ll learn by teaming with Amazon Web Services’ team members to construct a Go To Market strategy to accelerate the digital transformation and cloud adoption for the Industry. You will engage with key industry customers, strategic industry partners, Solutions Architects and field sellers to assess, define, promote, and evolve AWS offerings for the worldwide Ground Transportation industry. <br><br> Construction of the strategy will require cross-functional engagement from the Travel and Hospitality Industry team (consisting of Worldwide Business Development leaders for Accommodation/Lodging, Airlines, Airports, Restaurants, and Industry Marketing Manager, Industry Segment Lead (AWS Partner Network), Solutions Architecture and Professional Services), together with field teams (including Sales / Account teams). Successfully working cross-functionally is part of this role, the intern will be evaluated on the ability to engage stakeholders and where necessary, to identify blockers and escalate appropriately. <br><br> Where:  The preferred location for this role is New York, NY, but other locations within the US will be considered. <br> When:  The internship will tentatively start June 2021 and last 12-weeks. <br><br> Summary of responsibilities: <br> Research and evaluate the AWS Travel and Hospitality Go To Market Strategies and service offerings for Industry customers  Evaluate and assess the Ground Transportation Industry market opportunity for AWS services  Understand existing Ground Transportation Industry customers’ use of AWS and identify potential patterns of adoption  Develop a Go To Market Strategy for the Worldwide Ground Transportation Industry  Develop and Validate Industry Messaging Artifacts, including: Presentations, Industry Value Map, and Field Training Package  Experience in Hospitality, Logistics, Travel, or Transportation  Completed Bachelor’s degree in either Business, Marketing, Hospitality, or Communications  Enrolled in MBA program specializing in either Marketing (product and product life-cycle), Commercial, General Business, or International Business  Advanced Excel user, proficient in data analysis and driven by data.  Strong Project Management capabilities. Ability to define timelines and deliver.  Operational excellence mind-set and experience.  Excellent problem-solving skills. Adept at simplifying complexity and developing scalable solutions.  Exceptional interpersonal and communication (both written and verbal) skills. Experience communicating with both technical and non-technical stakeholders across multiple teams.   Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

  We create great places and the connections that get people and goods moving&mdash;whether by car, bus, train, plane, or their own two feet. Working within the context of the communities we serve, we provide planning, engineering, and infrastructure management services that fit the needs of our clients and improve the overall transportation experience. Join our team and help us keep communities connected.   Your Opportunity   Our Dynamic New York City Structural team is looking for an Intern/Co-op for the Summer of 2021.   Your Key Responsibilities   Assist engineers in the preparation of contract documents and reports for a variety of civil and structural engineering projects ranging from bridges to commuter rail and subway stations.  Responsibilities include computer aided design and drafting, checking drawings and calculations, quantity take-offs, simple structural calculations, and field inspection.    Your Capabilities and Credentials   Minimum requirements include some exposure to CAD Design programs and current good academic standing in accredited engineering school.    Education and Experience   Must be currently enrolled in a Bachelors or Masters Engineering Program  Typical office environment working with computers and remaining sedentary for long periods of time. Field work may include exposure to the elements including inclement weather.  This description is not a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that may be required of the employee and other duties, responsibilities and activities may be assigned or may be changed at any time with or without notice.  Stantec is a place where the best and brightest come to build on each others&rsquo; talents, do exciting work, and make an impact on the world around us. Join us and redefine your personal best.   Job:  Co-op/Summer/Intern Student   Primary Location:  United States-New York-New York   Employee Status:  Temporary   Job Level:  Entry Level   Travel:  No   Schedule:  Full-time   Req ID:  200001UD  Stantec provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified employees and applicants for future and current employment and prohibit discrimination on the grounds of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression. We prohibit discrimination in decisions concerning recruitment, hiring, referral, promotion, compensation, fringe benefits, job training, terminations or any other condition of employment. Stantec is in compliance with local, state and federal laws and regulations and ensures equitable opportunities in all aspects of employment. EEO including Disability/Protected Veterans 

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Intern - Model Data Verification Engineer </h1> Virtual Req #491  

   Vacancy Number:   2021-124   Position:   Information Security Intern (PT-4 Positions)   Location:   Central Administration - 900 Watervliet Shaker Road   Basic Function:     An Information Security Intern (BOCES) works under direct supervision, undertaking a variety of projects as they relate to the information security and systems architecture of the Capital Region BOCES/Northeastern Regional Information Center (NERIC) Data &amp; Network Operations Center. Projects carried out by persons in this position are part of the regular routine of the department and are of an in-service training nature designed to provide maximum exposure to experience in a designated field. Information Security Intern (BOCES) positions provide an on-the-job training situation through work based learning. Supervision is not a responsibility of this position. Does related work as required.     Qualifications:     A. Current enrollment at a regionally accredited college or university or one accredited by the New York State Board of Regents with completion of at least sixty (60) credits in a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree program in information security, information systems, computer science, information resources management, information technology or a closely related field.     Responsibilities:     1. Specific duties will vary with each project assignment, all relating to the information security and systems architecture of the Capital Region BOCES/Northeastern Regional Information Center (NERIC) Data &amp; Network Operations Center.<br> 2. Ability to learn the principles and practices of networking, information security and operating systems.<br> 3. Ability to learn sources of information and technological developments in the field of information security and systems architecture.<br> 4. Ability to learn about the organization of a BOCES.<br> 5. Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing.<br> 6. Ability to understand and follow oral and written instructions.<br> 7. Ability to carry out project assignments of a broadly defined nature.<br> 8. Physical condition commensurate with the demands of the position.     Start Date:   March 1, 2021 (Hours are part-time depending on availability.)   Application Deadline:   January 29, 2021 (or until position is filled)   Starting Salary:     $17.85 &ndash; $20.53 per hour   The selected applicant will be subject to a fingerprint supported criminal history background check in accordance with SAVE Legislation effective July 1, 2001.     Apply To:     https://capitalregionboces.recruitfront.com/JobOpportunities      Further Information Contact:     Capital Region BOCES, 900 Watervliet-Shaker Road, Albany NY 12205<br> or email crbrecruitment@neric.org     Date:   January 15, 2021 

 We are looking for people who are remarkably creative, want to get their sleeves dirty, and want to have an overall good time. We are an early stage startup looking to find people to help us grow quickly and work closely with our backend team to help edit and build new screens onto our live app. We are built within figma and will only be choosing people who have extensive experience in this space.  The role will include but is not limited to:  Building screens and connecting them to our infrastructure  Designing the website  Ability to guide and build new features for our company  Assisting the CEO and design team on strategy and design  Willing to be flexible and do anything needed   Official is the next generation of social media designed for couples.  In today’s modern world of technology, there are a plethora of applications which allow for an individual to seek companionship. The matchmaking tools at the average person’s disposal are endless, yet are no longer necessary once that special someone is found.  Official looks to fill the void that remains once the initial relationship is formed by building on the foundation of the primary applications, and fostering a lasting and healthy relationship between users. Through curated content produced by both Official’s partners and its users, Official seeks to become a beneficial tool for couples, one that can be integral to the success of any and all relationships.  By allowing couples to accumulate points through interaction within the platform, Official will be able to reward users with additional perks and discounts. Couples can then use these to further explore the depths of their relationship within the application. Love can be expressed in an innumerable amount of ways, Official hopes to facilitate this love within relationships through simple communication, connection, and companionship.  Our goal is not to help you find someone, but to make sure that you keep the person you are already with. We believe the best way to sustain a healthy relationship, is to #GetOfficial.  At the end of the day, our company is about making people's relationships better one step at a time. If that interests you and you want to help out, apply.  This is for college credit (sorry we don’t have funding yet)   Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Experience:  UX/UI: 1 year (Required)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Hours per week:  10-19   Company's website:  getofficial.co   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Social distancing guidelines in place  Virtual meetings  

 Company Description<br>  Over the last twenty years, MarketAxess has completely revolutionized the fixed-income market by creating a single platform using proprietary technology that connects the world&rsquo;s most influential financial institutions. Today, more than 1,700 institutional investors and broker-dealer firms rely on us to bring them accurate market data to assist with their trading decisions, connectivity solutions that facilitate straight-through processing and technology services to optimize trading environments.   <br>  If you are graduating in December 2021 or May 2022 and are interested in exploring a career that places you at the crossroads of financial services and technology, please read more about our opportunity below.   The development of our trading functionality and data services is at the core of our business. Our  Technology team  includes product specific trading teams, a group that works on connectivity to our institutional investor clients and broker-dealer clients, data and analytics, and web-based development.   <br>   What You&rsquo;ll Do    In this position, you will work with other developers, architects, test engineers and product management in the development of real-time fixed income trading systems. You will join an Agile Scrum team whose goal is to build new products and enhance existing ones. Being on an Agile Scrum team, you will be asked to engage in the following activities daily:   Understand business requirements   Participate in software design   Provide time estimates   Write code and unit tests   Participate in code reviews   Fix bugs    <br>   What You Bring to the Table    Working towards a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s degree in mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or similar (Master&rsquo;s degree preferred)   Good understanding of various data structures and algorithms   Well-versed in modern application design paradigms and patterns   Exposure to JAVA programming language   Basic knowledge of enterprise RDBMS (Oracle, Sybase, SQL Server)   Experience with one of the following Enterprise Operating Systems: Linux, Windows   Experience in development/willingness to learn Java based server-side framework (Spring Boot)   Understanding of browser-based technologies/willingness to learn (HTML/CSS, JavaScript, React, AngularJS, AJAX)   Curiosity/interest related to cloud technologies and cloud design patterns (AWS)   Strong verbal and written communication skills as well as organizational and problem resolution skills   Team player and strong interpersonal skills   Ability to function well in a competitive, challenging environment, and the ability to deal with changing priorities    <br>   What&rsquo;s In It For You    In addition to working on cutting edge technology and in our culture of innovation, collaboration, and openness, we offer:   Healthcare and wellness options   401(k) match   Employee stock purchase plan   Training and tuition assistance   Other perks include generous time-off policies, stipends for gym memberships, exercise equipment and similar, and access to on-site healthcare    MarketAxess Corporation and its affiliates provide equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, veteran status or any other characteristic prohibited by federal and state law. 

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Career Potential<br> </h2>   Ortho Clinical Diagnostics is committed to improving and saving lives with diagnostics. To do this we hire people who share this dream and are ready for new adventures. As a valued team member, you will carve your own career path and be part of building this company stronger and better than ever before. There is no limit to the experiences, opportunities and new directions you will have access to here at Ortho Clinical Diagnostics. More importantly, you will be driving the surge of a whole new direction in important medicine. That&rsquo;s something we can all take pride in as we take this journey together.     Ortho is known in the industry as a leader in customer service and support. Deeply understanding and exceeding the needs of our clinical lab, hospital and blood bank customers is what we do. It&rsquo;s who we are. If you join Ortho, no matter what your role, you will be expected to keep that Customer Excellence focus in your work.<br><br>   <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Opportunity  </h2>   Ortho Clinical Diagnostics is seeking a User Experience Design Intern for our 2021 Summer Intern Program. As a User Experience Design Intern within the Clinical Labs R&amp;D group at Ortho Clinical Diagnostics, you will have the opportunity to work on a design project in a multi-disciplinary team environment. Your responsibilities will include the creation of design solutions for future needs within the global diagnostics market. You should be passionate about the benefits of good design and how it can positively shape user experience. You will be expected to interact with customers and gather user research and feedback to support product design decisions. You will also be expected to provide high quality wireframes and interactive prototypes for existing and future solutions. Lastly you will need to examine these solutions through usability testing with internal and external users.<br>  User Experience Design interns are expected to inspire the R&amp;D team to think creatively, challenge the normative, and improve the user experience in all aspects of our products and services. We are looking for a well-rounded, talented and self-motivated pre-junior, junior, or senior who possesses exceptional analytical, design and presentation skills, is articulate, eager to learn, and interested in the rewarding challenge of medical product design.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Responsibilities  </h2>   Assignments and responsibilities will focus on the &ldquo;front end&rdquo; of the design process including user research, competitive analysis, product design work including style guides, and usability testing. The UX Intern will be responsible for documenting their work in formal reports and design specifications.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Deliverable:  </h2>  The User Experience Design Intern will be responsible for conducting workflow analyses, creating and maintaining product style guides, low-fidelity wireframes, and high fidelity prototypes.     The intern will also assist with the usability testing of various products through formative and summative testing.     The Intern will present a poster on his/her work.<br>     <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Qualifications  </h2>  Undergraduate/Graduate in the Field of Study of UX Design, New Media Design , Graphic Design, Human- Computer Interaction, Human Factors, Industrial Design     Minimum GPA: 3.0     Minimum Year in School: 2nd year     Design skills such as creating low and high-fidelity wireframes and protypes is essential.     Strong experience using Adobe Creative Suite (Illustrator, Photoshop, InDesign, etc.) and Figma.     Solid understanding of user centered design including user research and usability testing.     Exceptional design, presentation and communication skills.     The ability to write clearly and comprehensively.     Ability to work within constraints as well as to challenge constraints to support good design.      <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Other Requirements  </h2>  Student must have a portfolio or work available for review by hiring manager. Student is encouraged to include a sample of their portfolio, or link to an online portfolio, with their application and resume.     Student must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident       #LI-SP1 

  Bright Power works with forward-thinking owners and developers to identify, design, and implement custom energy and water solutions on a wide variety of systems. Our team is comprised of a diverse, talented, and hard-working group of individuals committed to growing this industry and to making a positive impact on the environment.   <br>   Join Us    Bright Power has been a transformative player in clean energy and sustainable housing for 16 years. Our Clients include affordable housing owners and developers, Fortune 1000 financial and real estate investors, privately held firms, and some of the nation&rsquo;s largest property managers.   <br>  We are passionate about reducing energy and water usage through the implementation of energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies. Our goal is to improve the health, comfort, and value of our client&rsquo;s buildings, while cultivating a sustainable future. We believe deeply in doing well by doing good and come to work every day seeking to change the world.   <br>   The Role    The Strategic Initiatives Business Unit of Bright Power is seeking detail-oriented and motivated interns to join our Access Team. Bright Power works with property owners who have loans through the Fannie Mae Green Loan program and helps them meet their utility data reporting requirements.   <br>  The Benchmarking &amp; Compliance Tenant Data Intern will research, review, and request whole-building or individual apartment authorization forms and utility data required for compliance. This position plays a crucial role in ensuring the success of the entire program.   <br>   Responsibilities    Call utility companies to research company-specific processes for tenant data collection and follow up on data requests   Email utility companies to submit authorization forms and request tenant data   Conduct quality assurance of utility data authorization forms from external clients   Troubleshoot and communicate issues relating to data access and quality   Transfer and store documents to ensure high standard of organization   Collaborate with team members to improve workflow processes   Contribute to other Strategic Initiatives projects as needed    <br>   What you get out of working at Bright Power    Opportunity to learn about energy management, working with utilities and utility data, and sustainable buildings   Training in utility benchmarking and industry-standard software tools   Networking with leaders across Bright Power&rsquo;s business units, and connections to leaders in the building and energy industry   8 hours of paid time off per month   Be part of a team that is hard-working and driven, but doesn&rsquo;t take itself too seriously    <br>   Qualifications    Excellent communication and writing skills   Comfortable speaking on the phone and writing emails to external parties   Self-motivated and self-organizing direction - this position works with an end deliverable for a client that has many moving pieces   Strong attention to detail and problem-solving skills   Experience with spreadsheet based programs - Microsoft Excel or Google Sheets   Experience with utility bill data   Ability to work well in a team-oriented environment providing ideas and open feedback   Graduated college or university in the last year   A New York State resident OR graduate of a school in New York State    <br>   Preferred Qualifications    Experience in the real estate, energy efficiency, renewable energy, sustainability or building operations world   Experience with cloud-based CRM platforms - Salesforce   Experience with Energy Star Portfolio Manager, especially for Multifamily Buildings and Commercial   Experience in fundraising, political campaigning, or sales     EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES  <br>Bright Power provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Bright Power complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.   Bright Power expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of Bright Power&rsquo;s employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.   Powered by JazzHR   oDVBsnXXEJ 

    The world looks to the United Nations for solutions to complex problems. Our 40,000 staff work to maintain international peace and security, develop friendly relations among nations and promote social progress, better living standards and human rights. To be effective in solving the world&rsquo;s problems, the United nations needs a diverse workforce contributing to these solutions. The Office of Human Resources fosters a dynamic, adaptable, mobile workforce, with the highest level of competence and integrity, to effectively and efficiently serve the mandates of the Organization. <br><br> The UN offers an exciting diverse and inclusive workplace. This internship provides a unique opportunity to work with colleagues of diverse background to solve a variety of problems. We are seeking an energetic, responsible intern to join the Organization. If you are selected, you will join a global intern cohort and make a real impact by working on challenging and rewarding projects.<br><br> The internship position is located in Office of Human Resources (OHR). The Office fosters a dynamic, adaptable, mobile workforce with the highest level of competence and integrity to effectively and efficiently serve the mandates of the Organization.<br><br> The OHR internship is for three months with an opportunity for extension to no longer than six months, depending on the needs of the department. The internship is UNPAID and full-time. Interns work up to five days per week (35 hours) under the supervision of a staff member in the department or office where they are assigned.  Responsibilities  The Office of Human Resources (OHR) is seeking a passionate young person who is an innovative doer and thinker and interested in making a difference for a better world.<br><br> Within delegated authority, the Graphic Design/Data Visualization intern may be responsible for the following duties: <br><br> Create graphically engaging presentations and materials;  Present visual concepts and ideas in a compelling and attractive manner;   Assist with data visualization through graphs and maps;  Update and curate content for social media outlets;   Research, identify, and test tools and resources to support analysis of various data sources;   Collect and analyze data and information;   Generate infographics to support decision makers in their understanding workflows;   Participate in information management discussions and the design of sustainable visualization solutions including templates and icons;  Liaise with relevant in-house and external partners as necessary or requested by the Unit;   Create branding material and engaging visual products for social media, public outreach campaigns, publications, conferences, events and meetings, in accordance with UN design standards and policies on schedule and delivered in a timely manner;  Other activities and special projects as assigned.   

   Non-Exempt<br><br> The Desktop Support Intern supports desktop and laptop systems within the company including; unlocking accounts, swapping hardware, imaging, setup/installation and basic Windows and MS Office troubleshooting. Strives to meet or exceed Service Level Agreement with the customer. Maintains and updates Easy Vista helpdesk software of desktop support transactions.  <br> Essential Duties:   Supports desktop and laptop end-users with IT related problems including responding to phone requests, setting up and administering new user accounts, and working through trouble-tickets with a focus on meeting or exceeding service level agreements. Assists with IT projects related to support and infrastructure.   Configures and sets up desktops and laptops for use. May perform other duties as assigned.   Supports end-users with remote access including connectivity or other related issues.   Utilize effective customer relations and communications skills to maintain relationships with internal/external users by identifying service needs.   Build, install, maintain, image/re-image, troubleshoot and repair computer systems and peripherals. Document, maintain, upgrade and/or replace hardware and software.   Provide first and second level support.   Record and maintain accurate incident and change records and Easy Vista helpdesk software.   <br>  Minimum Education: <br> Must be enrolled in a Computer Science, Information Systems, or a technically equivalent undergraduate degree program.  <br> Minimum Experience: <br> Basic hardware, Windows 7/10 software and troubleshooting skills.  <br> Required Skills:   Ability to multi-task and work within time constraints.   Ability to work collaboratively.     Critical thinking and problem-solving skills.<br> #zip 

   This role will be open for applications January 5, 2021 - January 22, 2021. We will begin reviewing applications on January 19, 2021.    Participation in the internship program requires that you are located in the United States for the duration of the internship program.    This application is intended for students who are eligible for full-time work authorization in the United States upon completing their education. <br> Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations:  Mountain View, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA; Seattle, WA, USA   Minimum qualifications:   Currently pursuing a Bachelor's, Master's or PhD.   Experience with online writing and publishing, including blogs, articles, newsletters, and/or wikis.  Experience reading source code, such as Java, Python, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, or other programming languages.  <br>  Preferred qualifications:   Ability to cope with fast-paced and constantly changing environments.   Strong communication and interpersonal skills.   Interest in writing matched with an ability to write clearly and informatively.  Interest and curiosity about technology and software development.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> About the job </h2>  Technical Writers take complex information and communicate it clearly, concisely, and accurately without relying on technical or corporate jargon. With a unique cross-functional perspective, technical writers at Google are the key link between our engineers, marketing associates, developer advocates, and external developers. You juggle a variety of writing projects, such as technical concept documents, how-to guides, example code, FAQs, and product announcements.  As a Technical Writer for Google's developer products, you'll contribute to one of several projects that educate developers about using tools and technologies-both outside and inside of Google. You'll work with other Technical Writers, Engineers, and Product Managers to determine needs for developer features that need documentation, then create document plans, draft new developer guides, and resolve issues with existing documentation to keep it up to date.  You might be studying computer science but also enjoy writing clear and concise documentation, or you're a strong writer and communicator with some scripting or programming knowledge, such as JavaScript, Python, or Java. You might also have a background as a developer, and write as a hobby; or perhaps you're an experienced communicator who loves digging deep into code. One thing is for certain&mdash;you are passionate about helping people learn how to apply technology to solve real problems. Whatever your academic background, you want to help developers build amazing things and you make efforts in your writing to be clear and actionable.   Google is and always will be an engineering company. We hire people with a broad set of technical skills who are ready to address some of technology's greatest challenges and make an impact on millions, if not billions, of users. At Google, engineers not only revolutionize search, they routinely work on massive scalability and storage solutions, large-scale applications and entirely new platforms for developers around the world. From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another. 

   Diffusion Process Engineering Intern    Our commitment to excellence doesn&rsquo;t stop with our technology, it extends to the people we hire. When you join Cree, you&rsquo;ll find yourself immersed in a culture similar to any startup environment &ndash; fast decision making, passionate people and constant innovation.      What can Cree do for you?    Cree offers an extensive 12-week internship program that aligns with our new hiring model and talent development strategy. Students a part of our internship program will develop knowledge and skills across their areas of interest while gaining insight into unit operations. Additionally, you will have the ability to apply academic concepts to real&ndash;world business challenges. An intern has the opportunity to be a key strategic contributor from the ground up.      What can you do for Cree?    Bring enthusiasm, creativity, and an open-mind to help strengthen our culture and build on our success   Bring a fresh perspective to the challenges we face   Learn from an experienced team   Deepen your understanding of classroom concepts   Gain real-world experience     What you need for success:    Enrollment in an accredited collegiate program   Maintains a 3.0 GPA or above   Excellent communication skills   Relevant Experience   Ability to work without sponsorship now or in the future      Who You&rsquo;ll Work With    This intern will work with the RF Fab Product Engineering team. The intern will be assigned to a large engineering project as well as one or more smaller projects and tasks. These projects will impact the bottom line for the company and will be a learning experience for the intern. Product engineering is responsible for yield, performance, and manufacturability so the projects will lie in any of these areas.   This team is heavily involved in manufacturing RF semiconductor products for a variety of customers and applications. As part of the Product Engineering team, the intern will interact with Operations and Fab engineering teams. The intern will likely also be introduced to parts of the Development, Failure Analysis and Reliability, Device Design and Test Engineering teams.      Why Cree    Since our beginning 30 years ago, we have introduced innovative and disruptive solutions that enable a more efficient, productive and safer world. We continue our leadership in developing market-leading lighting-class LEDs and semiconductor products for power and radio frequency (RF) applications. We believe in unlocking the power and potential of technology, enabling the world to do more with less. We aim to transform the way people experience light and are also leading the innovation of Power/RF products that move us toward a more energy efficient future. <br><br> Be part of our future and have a direct impact while working for an organization that provides a place to work alongside brilliant people, a competitive total rewards package, and a problem-solving culture. We invite you to submit an application if you feel we would be a good fit. <br><br> We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.     This role may require additional duties and/or assignments as designated by management.     We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. 

 Overview:   At Zebra, we&rsquo;re reinventing how businesses operate at the enterprise edge - helping them run faster, smarter, and more connected than ever before.

   Contentsquare is a global SaaS technology startup that empowers brands to build better digital experiences for all. We&rsquo;ve been experiencing tremendous growth within the past few years as our team has grown from 300 to 750 employees, and have recently raised a $190M Series D funding in 2020. In addition, we have 7 main offices across the world (Paris, NYC, London, Tel Aviv, Munich, Tokyo, Singapore) with 700+ clients globally including many accounts from the global Fortune 100. We can tell you that this growth is not going to stop here, we still are looking for great talent like you to join our family!

  At Text IQ, we leverage state of the art unsupervised machine learning, deep learning, natural language processing, and social network analysis to build AI for sensitive information. Our algorithms are used by the world's most highly-regulated, Fortune 500 companies to identify latent risk in their data. To further support our enterprise clients, we maintain strategic partnerships with leading, international law firms.

  At Fitch, we have an open culture where employees are able to exchange ideas and perspectives, throughout the organization, irrespective of their seniority. Your voice will be heard allowing you to have a real impact. We embrace diversity and appreciate authenticity, employees work in an environment where they can be their true selves. Our inclusive and progressive approach helps us to keep a balanced perspective.   With our expertise, we are not only creating data and information, but also producing timely insights from every angle to influence decision making in this ever changing and highly competitive market. We have a relentless hunger to innovate and unlock the power of human insights and to drive value for our customers. There has never been a better time to make an impact and we invite you to join us on this journey.   Fitch Ratings is a leading provider of credit ratings, commentary and research. Dedicated to providing value beyond the rating through independent and prospective credit opinions, Fitch Ratings offers global perspectives shaped by strong local market experience and credit market expertise. The additional context, perspective and insights we provide have helped fund a century of growth and enables you to make important credit judgments with confidence.<br>    As a Data Science Intern at Fitch, you can contribute to the transformation of our business through the use of enhanced analytics to drive strategy, improve analytical insight, and increase automation. The Enhanced Analytics team in Fitch&rsquo;s Global Public Finance &amp; Infrastructure department is seeking a part-time data science intern to support a wide range of projects relying on careful analysis of data and development of tools relying on modern data science techniques. <br><br> The ideal candidate for this internship will have a keen ability to manipulate and analyze data with Python (NumPy, pandas, xarray). Strong data visualization skills and prior exposure to finance and/or economics are also desirable. <br><br> Job Description:<br>    Collect and clean data. As always, this is a significant part of the work!   Translate business needs into concrete data analysis tasks, execute those tasks, and effectively communicate findings to stakeholders   Write scripts to automate various labor-intensive data ETL processes to support our analysis   Produce data-driven analytical tools, visualizations, and dashboards   <br> Position Requirements:<br>   Proven ability to produce robust, efficient, well-documented code in Python   Demonstrable knowledge of SQL and relational databases   Familiarity collecting data via REST and SOAP APIs   Prior experience using SciPy and related packages (NumPy, pandas, Matplotlib or Seaborn, xarray) to manipulate, analyze, and visualize data<br>     Fitch Group is a global leader in financial information services with operations in more than 30 countries. Wholly owned by the Hearst Corporation, we are comprised of three main businesses: Fitch Ratings | Fitch Solutions | Fitch Learning.   For more information please visit our websites: www.fitchratings.com | www.fitchsolutions.com | www.fitchlearning.com   Fitch is committed to providing global securities markets with objective, timely, independent and forward-looking credit opinions. To protect Fitch&rsquo;s credibility and reputation, our employees must take every precaution to avoid conflicts of interests or any appearance of a conflict of interest. Should you be successful in the recruitment process at Fitch Ratings you will be asked to declare any securities holdings and other potential conflicts prior to commencing employment. If you, or your immediate family, have any holdings that may conflict with your work responsibilities, you may be asked to divest yourself of them before beginning work.   Fitch is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law. 

     The D. E. Shaw group&rsquo;s summer doctoral internship program exposes talented Ph.D. candidates to the projects and environment associated with full-time work in quantitative analysis and software development at the firm. Ph.D. interns interact with fellow interns and employees of similar academic backgrounds while discovering how the analytical skills gained from their graduate programs may relate to the work done here. Throughout the internship, Ph.D. candidates are encouraged to attend our academic speaker series and track academic progress in various areas that may be of interest.

  At Liquidnet, internships are different. Here, you will be part of a team, working on projects that are directly relevant to our business.     Our  Data Services team  is seeking a bright, creative and curious individual, who feels at ease with technology and doesn&rsquo;t accept the status quo. You will work with the team to help research and analyze business, regulatory, and technology related initiatives to deliver high-quality solutions for various financial market participants. Your ability to learn fast and desire to contribute will play a critical role in the team&rsquo;s success.      Responsibilities    Help improve systems by studying current practices; designing modifications   Assist in creating informative, actionable, and repeatable reporting that highlights relevant trends and opportunities for improvement   Conduct insightful, ad hoc analyses to investigate ongoing or one-time operational issues   Filter and &ldquo;clean&rdquo; data by reviewing reports and key indicators to locate and correct code problems       Skills and Qualifications    Currently pursuing a Computer Science degree or related study at an accredited university.   Familiarity with programming and scripting languages.   Analytical skills (breaking down a complex concept/problem into parts).   Critical thinking skills (questioning assumptions) .   Quality-oriented mindset.   Dedication to the team&rsquo;s success.   Great verbal and written communication skills.   Must be good with numbers .   Ability to prioritize and work under deadlines.   A strong Interest in Fintech!       A plus:    Previous internship and/or relevant project experience.   Knowledge of Microsoft Access and/or SQL.   Proficient with Excel.   Comfortable with navigating within both Windows and Linux environments.   Python  

           This is a student intern position that will work with Dr. Zhang to design and develop smart glass applications to support real-time data collection and integration in emergency care settings. <br>

  The Commercial Aircraft Solutions business area is looking for talented students pursuing a career in the fields of electrical design, software design or mechanical design. Internship opportunities are available to perform professional technical work which requires knowledge and application of basic engineering principles, theories and concepts to complete assignments under direct technical supervision. This hands-on experience will complement technical coursework. <br><br> Interns will be assigned roles on programs or special projects consistent with their level of education and experience. In this capacity the intern will work independently but under the guidance of a mentor to learn about the engineering principles and technical development specific to BAE Systems.<br><br> For Electrical Design (Electrical or Computer Engineers) duties may include:<br> Assisting design and development of specific electronic modules or components to meet design requirements   Supporting electrical analysis, compiling data for investigation   Assisting in design and fabrication of prototype hardware   Supporting the electrical testing of hardware and documenting results   Generating and reviewing the electrical design content of drawings, engineering specifications and reports  <br> For Software Design (Computer Engineers or Computer Science) duties may include:<br> Assisting design and development of software components to meet specified design requirements  Developing, reviewing and documenting software requirements, design and code  Supporting hardware and software integration including investigating and debugging issues  Supporting verification of design by developing test procedures, analyzing results, and troubleshooting failures  <br> For Mechanical Design (Mechanical Engineers) duties may include:<br> Assisting design and development of packaging modules, mechanisms or components to meet design requirements  Supporting mechanical analyses and compiling data for investigation  Assisting in the design and fabrication of prototype hardware  Supporting environmental testing of hardware including: vibration, shock, thermal, fatigue and others as required  Documenting test results for review by senior engineers  Generating and reviewing the technical content of drawings, engineering specifications and reports<br>  

     <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Responsibilities </h2> 

 Description:   Job Title:  Systems Engineering (Intern - Rochester, NY)    Job Location:  Rochester, NY<br>    Job ID:  CS20202511-53653    Job Description:    Perform operational analysis and develop concept of operations, design and implementation plans   Develop test plans, procedures &amp; cases   Conduct tests and document results   Use software tools, scripting and software/hardware troubleshooting   Analyze systems requirements from end systems and users   Supports development and evaluation of complex system designs and architectures   Develop and deliver presentations to communicate design activity plans and status to internal and external customers     Qualifications:    Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in Systems Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, Mathematics, Aviation, Aerospace Engineering, or related field   GPA of 3.0 or greater     Preferred Skills:    Coursework and/or experience in systems engineering, systems architecture, systems analysis and design, system performance modeling, integration and/or project management, and/or model-based systems engineering   Familiar with Rhapsody  

    Intern - Data Science     The New York Times is seeking inventive and motivated interns to join the Data Science group. In this role, you will reframe newsroom and business objectives as machine learning tasks that can deliver actionable insights, accurate predictions, and effective optimization.<br>  <br> About Us     The New York Times is a technology company committed to producing the world&rsquo;s most reliable and highest quality journalism. Our ability to do so relies on a talented team of expert technologists who help NYT learn from a tremendous abundance of data unique to this company. The Times seeks a Data Scientist Intern for the summer of 2020 to join the Data Science Group applying machine learning methods to meet this challenge, in close collaboration with working partners across the company.     Check out the Times Open blog to see what we&rsquo;re up to.     About our Team     We implement and execute machine learning research with reliability and reproducibility. We communicate results and impact to newsroom and business stakeholders. Our group turns models into data products, collaborating with engineering teams, and integrates these into process throughout The Times.     As a data science intern, you will:    Develop and deploy machine learning solutions to newsroom and business problems;     Work with Python, scikit-learn, and Google Cloud Platform; and     Communicate the results of your analyses to other members of the organization in a clear and concise fashion.       About You     You have experience in computer science, applied mathematics, or other quantitative or computational discipline. You have experience with open source machine learning or statistical analysis tools. Familiarity with experimental design is a plus. You have coding experience, Python preferred. You have demonstrated the ability to communicate complex ideas in data science to relevant stakeholders. You share our commitment to The Times&rsquo; mission of delivering the world&rsquo;s best and most reliable journalism. You are eager to collaborate with both technical and non-technical colleagues in editorial, product management, marketing, and executive leadership groups. You share our desire to join the world&rsquo;s most important journalism company at a moment in history when the importance of learning from our data is transforming every aspect of the craft and practice of journalism.     Benefits and Perks:    Interning at The New York Times is a unique opportunity to work at a historic and innovative global media organization dedicated to enhancing society by creating, collecting and distributing high-quality news and information     You will be helping to power, distribute and expand what is possible for our award-winning journalism     You will have the opportunity to work on creative, cross-functional projects     We have frequent panel discussions and talks by a wide variety of news makers and industry leaders     NYT interns benefit from competitive pay, great perks and influential networking        The New York Times is committed to a diverse and inclusive workforce, one that reflects the varied global community we serve. Our journalism and the products we build in the service of that journalism greatly benefit from a range of perspectives, which can only come from diversity of all types, across our ranks, at all levels of the organization. Achieving true diversity and inclusion is the right thing to do. It is also the smart thing for our business. So we strongly encourage women, veterans, people with disabilities, people of color and gender nonconforming candidates to apply.       The New York Times Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of an individual's sex, age, race, color, creed, national origin, alienage, religion, marital status, pregnancy, sexual orientation or affectional preference, gender identity and expression, disability, genetic trait or predisposition, carrier status, citizenship, veteran or military status and other personal characteristics protected by law. All applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to legally protected characteristics. The New York Times Company will consider qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local &quot;Fair Chance&quot; laws.  

   Date Posted:   2020-11-06-08:00   Country:   United States of America   Location:   CAN01: Carrier-Syracuse, NY 6304 Thompson Rd, Syracuse, NY, 13221 USA  Carrier is a leading provider of HVAC, refrigeration, fire, security, and building automation technologies. These high-technology products and services enable modern life by delivering efficiency, safety, and security across several platforms.<br>   Carrier has an opening for an experienced Computer Scientist or Software Engineer to serve as a vital member of the Electronic Catalog team. This team is responsible for developing and maintaining software-based tools to drive Carrier equipment and systems sales strategy. eCAT is users by the Carrier sales engineers and deliver sustainable HVAC system solutions to customers. This position is based in Syracuse, NY.<br> <h2 class="jobSectionHeader">  The candidate&rsquo;s responsibilities including but not limited to include: </h2>  Develop micro-services for use in a cloud environment   Participate in Agile/Scrum software development process   Analyze software requirements and create solutions for them   Full lifecycle application development   Design and develop web-based software applications and components in various software languages   Code analysis, requirements analysis, software review, identification of code metrics, and system risk analysis   Evaluating and identifying new technologies for use by the software development team<br>  <h2 class="jobSectionHeader">  Education: </h2>  The ideal candidate will be a at least a sophomore, junior, or senior pursing a Bachelor`s degree in Computer Science or Software Engineering with similar co-op/intern or work experience. The candidate must have a 3.0 minimum GPA overall.<br> <h2 class="jobSectionHeader">  Experience / Qualifications: </h2>  Proficiency with C# and ASP.Net   Understanding of object-oriented design and analysis (OOD and OOA)   Experience with Microsoft Visual Studio and SQL Server   Experience with software development principles and processes   Familiarity with web-based tools and architecture   Excellent verbal, writing, and presentation communication skills   Ability to lead and work as part of multidisciplinary teams in a global environment     Carrier is An Equal   Opportunity/Affirmative   Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.     Job Applicant's Privacy Notice:    Click on this link to read the Job Applicant's Privacy Notice 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Website Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 Company Description<br>  As one of the original innovators in lending, credit, fraud, and spend analytics, Verisk Financial integrates one of the industry&rsquo;s largest sets of data to help banks, financial regulators, retailers, and media companies grow their businesses. We combine data with predictive analytics to uncover new consumer and business insights and integrate this data with the most technologically advanced platforms.   Verisk Financial | Argus is a leading provider of intelligence, decision support solutions, and advisory services to financial institutions across the global commerce ecosystem. Our clients include more than 50 top U.S., Canadian, and other international financial organizations, regulators, payment providers, merchants, and media. Argus is the leading source of segment-level portfolio management benchmarking data, analytics, models, and advisory services. We maximize value delivery to clients by combining proprietary data sets, cutting-edge software and analytic tools, domain expertise, and our unique results-oriented approach. Customers worldwide use our services for tailored data management solutions that include business intelligence platforms, profile views, mobile data solutions, enterprise database services, and fraud risk scoring algorithms for marketing, fraud, and risk mitigation. Our clients gain competitive advantage from our exclusive focus on leveraging global best-in-class analytics and methodologies to help achieve their business and regulatory objectives. To learn more about Argus please visit us at: www.argusinformation.com. We are proud to be a part of the Verisk family of companies!   At the heart of what we do is help clients manage risk. Verisk (Nasdaq: VRSK) provides data and insights to our customers in insurance, energy and the financial services markets so they can make faster and more informed decisions.   Our global team uses AI, machine learning, automation, and other emerging technologies to collect and analyze billions of records. We provide advanced decision-support to prevent credit, lending, and cyber risks. In addition, we monitor and advise companies on complex global matters such as climate change, catastrophes, and geopolitical issues.   But why we do our work is what sets us apart. It stems from a commitment to making the world better, safer and stronger.   It&rsquo;s the reason Verisk is part of the UN Global Compact sustainability initiative. It&rsquo;s why we made a commitment to balancing 100 percent of our carbon emissions. It&rsquo;s the aim of our &ldquo;returnship&rdquo; program for experienced professionals rejoining the workforce after time away. And, it&rsquo;s what drives our annual Innovation Day, where we identify our next first-to-market innovations to solve our customers&rsquo; problems.   At its core, Verisk uses data to minimize risk and maximize value. But far bigger, is why we do what we do.   At Verisk you can build an exciting career with meaningful work; create positive and lasting impact on business; and find the support, coaching, and training you need to advance your career. We&rsquo;ve been recognized by Forbes as a World&rsquo;s Best Employer and a Best Employer for Women, testaments to our culture of engagement and the value we place on an inclusive and diverse workforce.   . 

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Description Summary </h1> GE is seeking sharp, personable, highly organized interns who are looking for the opportunity to grow their technical and professional skills while building a career with unlimited potential. Interns will learn from the best in the industry and work on substantial projects with real world implications, getting hands-on with the Renewables Operations team.  <h1 class="jobSectionHeader">  Job Description </h1>  Essential Responsibilities :<br> We offer meaningful, impactful assignments as well as a Summer that includes team building, career development opportunities, and more! Renewables Operations Interns are GE&rsquo;s primary pipeline to full-time employment opportunities either as a direct hire or as a member of one of our world-class early talent leadership programs. Renewables Operations Interns are hired to focus on a particular area of the GE business based on availability of positions, the interviewer's assessment, and the applicant's preference. Renewables Intern assignments, typically 10 to 12 weeks in length, are dynamic and challenging based on the business needs and the type of work required. Interns have significant exposure to key operations and engineering business leaders at GE; as well as a global internship support network to accelerate learning and development.<br><br> Qualifications/Requirements :<br> Currently enrolled in a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s Degree program at an accredited university or working towards a degree in a technical field of study, attending a full time matriculated two year technical program. Degree focused in Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Engineering and Management, Supply Chain Management, Operations Management, or other relevant STEM majors with Operations experience. Minimum cumulative or in-major 3.0/4.0 GPA.<br> Must commit to working full time (40 hrs/wk) during the internship.<br> Graduating between December 2021 &ndash; June 2023.Eligibility Requirements: Legal authorization to work in the U.S. is required. GE may agree to sponsor an individual for an employment visa now or in the future if there is a shortage of individuals with particular skills.<br><br> Desired Characteristics :<br> Prior intern, co-op, or research experience Renewables, Operations, or relevant area. Leadership experience inside and/or outside the classroom. Strong analytical and technical skills with experience in IT industry standards and development methodologies. Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to articulate clearly. Demonstrated creative problem solving and proactive learning.<br><br> Additional Eligibility Qualifications :<br> GE will only employ those who are legally authorized to work in the United States for this opening. Any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a drug screen (as applicable). 

 Pretty Well Beauty is looking to add a Web Developer Intern to the team! This is a fully remote position with flexible hours. You would be primarily working on the development of a Word Press Website. Must have experience with Word Press and Woo Commerce.  Candidates should be experienced in the following:  Coding for layout and function  Web Applications and programming languages such as HTML, CSS, JavaScript, JQuery and API's.  Good understanding of E-commerce  Data Integrations<br/>Work well and able to communicate clearly with Web Designer  Understanding of how web applications work including security, session management, and best development practices  Maintain plugin's + problem diagnosis and creative problem solving skills  Full list of preferred skills:  JavaScript, JQuery, HTML, HTML5, CSS, CSS3, Web Programming Skills, E-Commerce, Teamwork, Verbal Communication, cross-browser compatibility, Web User Interface Design (UI), Security Principles, Object-Oriented Design, Web Services (REST/SOAP), Multimedia Content Development, API's  BS in computer science or a related field  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per year  Benefits:  Employee discount  Flexible schedule   Schedule:  Monday to Friday   COVID-19 considerations:<br/>All roles are being done remotely.  Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  JavaScript: 2 years (Preferred)  Angular: 2 years (Preferred)  HTML: 2 years (Preferred)  CSS: 2 years (Preferred)  WordPress: 2 years (Required)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Hours per week:  20-29   Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:  No: Not providing sponsorship for this job   This Job Is:  A “Fair Chance” job (you or the employer follow Fair Chance hiring practices when performing background checks)  A good job for someone just entering the workforce or returning to the workforce with limited experience and education   Company's website:  prettywellbeauty.com   Company's Facebook page:  Facebook.com/prettywellbeauty  

 Overview:   At Welkin Mechanical, we work on some of the highest profile mechanical projects within the New York infrastructure market. From heavy mechanical and fire protection, to plumbing, HVAC, and specialty contracting, we engage with the best clients on the most challenging and unique projects.

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented WordPress Web Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 Support manufacturing engineering activities as we expand workload in the shop for radar and sonar assembly.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Technical educational background  Interest in production/ factory setting  Strong computer skills (Microsoft Office suite)  Self-starter and strong sense of self-direction  Strong written and oral communication skills  2.5 GPA or higher preferred, but not required (Cumulative or Major GPA)    Desired Skills: <br> Prior exposure to production or support environment, testing or training  <br> Exposure to technical curriculum preferable    BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern

  Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal&rsquo;s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.  Job Description Summary: At PayPal, we&rsquo;re literally reinventing how the world pays and gets paid. We understand that it&rsquo;s about people. We connect individuals to let them shop, get paid, donate and send money using today&rsquo;s technology with the confidence that comes from the security and control PayPal enables. Are you ready to help us change the world? The world&rsquo;s leading payments company, PayPal, brings together a family of brands that are revolutionizing the way people move money. At PayPal you will be immersed in an amazing community with a vibrant culture that thrives on innovation, collaboration, inclusion and wellness. We are seeking world-class problem solvers who have a passion for data and a relentless focus on execution and delivery. You will be most successful with a healthy combination of both, technical skills and business acumen. As a Data Analyst you will generate insights by conducting extensive analyses of PayPal&rsquo;s rich data. In the process, you will develop a deep understanding of the payments business, our site functionality, further strengthen your analytic, leadership and presentation skills and gain exposure to a wide variety of functional teams within PayPal.  Job Description:    Key Responsibilities    Understand how to make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users   Aggregate data from various sources to construct streamlined data pipelines and integrate data from multiple PayPal systems   Identify key metrics and build exec-facing dashboards to track progress of the business and its highest priority initiatives   Identify key business levers, establish cause &amp; effect, perform analyses, and communicate key findings to various stakeholders to facilitate data driven decision-making   Work closely across the matrix with teams like Finance, Marketing, Product, Engineering and senior executives   Lead and participate in special projects/initiatives: innovate and implement large-scale quality improvements to processes and/or systems by conducting data analysis and making recommendations, troubleshooting technical issues, and refining processes around customer support        Basic Requirements:    Must be earning a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s degree in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or related field   Experience with one or multiple of the following will be highly desirable; Python, Java, Tableau, Jupyter Notebooks, Teradata, Hadoop/Hive, Oracle, JavaScript, SQL, Airflow, Linux, Perl, PHP   Excellent understanding of computer science fundamentals, data structures, and algorithms   Demonstrated experience, familiarity and ease with handling large data sets and crunching numbers   Information Retrieval (search/recommendation/classification) experience or Human Judgment/User Interface experience   Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to translate complex problems into simpler terms, and effectively influence both peers and senior leadership     Position Location: Varies     We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.  PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. 

 An intern in this position will work closely with a team of engineers on a formal government fixed or rotary wing aircraft contract or internal investment efforts in one or more of the following areas: digital and analog circuit card design, digital signal processing, FPGA design, radio frequency (RF) and antenna design, electromagnetic interference testing, custom test equipment, and hardware integration and test.<br><br> This position is for the Advanced Integrated Products organization, which focuses on design, development qualification and integration of airborne avionics equipment.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Pursuing a BS Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Engineering Physics degree or equivalent.<br><br> Excellent verbal and written communication and analytical skills.<br><br> A working knowledge of basic electronic measurement equipment is a plus. This may include the ability to take measurements using an oscilloscope and a Digital Volt Meter, or use of a Spectrum Analyzer and/or a Measurement receiver. Skill and ability to: collect, organize, synthesize, and analyze data; summarize findings; develop conclusions and recommendations from appropriate data sources.<br><br> Must be able to obtain and maintain a secret security clearance.<br><br> Must have at least a 3.0 cumulative GPA.<br> Desired Skills: <br> Electrical (Electronics) Engineering:<br> Analog, Digital and power supply circuit design  FPGA programming using Verilog/VHDL  Familiarity with processor design &amp; architecture  Test equipment hardware (Oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, etc.) and associated software.  Designing custom test racks using commercial equipment for validating and evaluating customer hardware performance  <br> Electrical (Antenna/RF) Engineering:<br> Analog/power supply, Radio Frequency (RF), Wireless Communications and Antenna design experience  Familiarity with Microwave Office and Matlab  <br> Electrical (EMI) Engineering: <br> Experience with hardware design for Electromagnetic Interference / Compatibility (EMI/EMC) and requirements / procedures of MIL-STD-461, 464 and DO-160 testing standards   Knowledge of EM theory to apply design techniques and design features to control electromagnetic (EM) emissions (intentional and un-intentional) and susceptibilities    BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Wordpress/Shopify Front End Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

   PULLMAN integrates technology-driven, engineered solutions into its industry-leading contracting services. PULLMAN&rsquo;s capabilities include specialty design-build services for new and existing structures, as well as a wide range of specialty repair and maintenance services. With offices located throughout the United States, and as a signatory to local, national, and international labor union agreements, PULLMAN has the track record and the experience to meet our customers&rsquo; specialty contracting needs.<br><br> If you are seeking a challenging and rewarding construction internship opportunity with a dynamic, diversified and innovative company, a PULLMAN Project Engineer Internship may be for you! We are currently recruiting for a Construction Project Engineer Intern to be based in our New York office.   As a Construction Project Engineer Intern, you will apply your knowledge and develop new skills while working on a variety of challenging projects.   As a Project Engineer intern you will assist in:  Project management support  Estimating  Budget preparation  Job cost management  Scheduling  Production rate tracking  Client relations  Safety management  Quality control management  Engineering and design support  Business development   Successful candidates will possess:  A Bachelors degree or will be working toward a Bachelors degree in Construction Management, Civil Engineering or related field of study  Strong verbal and written communication skills  Excellent documentation and organizational skills  Strong computer skills  A positive outlook and a team spirit   PULLMAN is proud of a company culture that promotes 24/7 safety and quality. 

  Please limit your application to 3 roles per academic year.  <br> The ultimate source for official answers about a business online should be the business itself. However, when consumers ask questions on company websites, too often they are left in the dark with wrong answers. Yext (NYSE: YEXT), the Search Experience Cloud, solves this problem by organizing a business's facts so it can provide official answers to consumer questions &mdash; wherever people search. Starting with the company website, then extending across search engines and voice assistants, businesses around the world, like Taco Bell, Marriott, and Jaguar Land Rover&mdash;as well as organizations like the U.S. State Department&mdash;trust Yext to radically improve the search experience on their websites and across the entire search ecosystem.<br><br> We're looking for  Software Engineers  to join the Yext Engineering team and drive the technology behind our revolutionary product offering! Our team works in an agile environment running two-week sprints that culminate with demos of features in progress. You will work alongside engineers from the top universities and tech companies in the world, hands-on with the code from day one.<br><br> What You'll Do  Participate in full life-cycle software development  Design, implement, and deploy highly distributed and scalable systems  Contribute ideas for new features and identify areas for improvement proactively  Immerse yourself into the Yext culture and ecosystem by following our engineering motto: &quot;Think Big, Learn Fast, and Get Stuff Done&quot;    What You Have   Pursuing a degree in Computer Science or a related technical field, graduating between December 2021 and August 2022  Excellent implementation skills in a OOP language (We mostly use Java and Go)  Fast learner who picks up new technologies quickly  Ability to work productively in a collaborative team environment  Comfortable working within a fast-paced environment   Yext is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ethnicity, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, genetics, sex, pregnancy or childbirth, sexual orientation, gender (including gender identity or nonbinary or nonconformity and/or status as a trans individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, marital, parental and/or familial status, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any characteristic protected under applicable law. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.<br><br> #LI-RR1 

     Thank you for your interest in a career with Equitable.  Are you ready to begin preparing for your future career in IT? Equitable is seeking stellar student leaders who are eager to participate in our IT/ Data Internship program. The experience you&rsquo;ll gain will open up exceptional career opportunities and could lead to you landing your dream job at Equitable upon graduation. <br> <br> The 10-week IT Summer Intern program provides an exciting and rewarding experience for college students interested in IT as a career.<br> Our program provides training and practical experience on technology best practices and processes designed to start developing the Equitable technology leaders of the future. (10 weeks: 6/7/2021 - 8/13/2021) <br> <br> The IT Summer Internship will provide the Intern with a general understanding of Information Technology and the various business areas we support. The IT Interns will be assigned to a technical functional area of IT &ndash; Programming, Systems Analysis or Data Analysis. Upon the successful completion of the internship, the IT Interns will be considered for a permanent position upon college graduation.  Intern Goals/Success Measures:<br> Experience in building relationships with all levels of management<br> Ability to work with project teams and complete all assigned projects by deadline dates<br> Functional experience in assigned IT business areas<br> Demonstrated teamwork through collaboration on an Executive presentation  Typical assignments will consist of:<br> Involvement and assistance with department-wide industry-leading-edge initiatives<br> Project support to ensure the completion of various company-wide projects<br> Interfacing with a diverse group of peers in a matrix organization<br> Supporting team members in completion of project tasks such as analyzing data models, software development, conducting unit testing, and implementing project deliverables<br> Time is allotted for training, networking and completion of CIO / SIO project presentation <br> 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Website Administrator Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

  Xylem |&#712;z&#299;l&#601;m|   1) The tissue in plants that brings water upward from the roots;   2) a leading global water technology company.   Xylem, a leading global water technology company dedicated to solving the world&rsquo;s most challenging water issues, is the leading global provider of efficient, innovative and sustainable water technologies improving the way water is used, managed, conserved and re-used. Our international team is unified in a common purpose: creating advanced technology and other trusted solutions to solve the world&rsquo;s water challenges. We are committed to creating an organization of inclusion and diversity, where everyone feels involved, respected, valued and connected, and where everyone is free to bring their authentic selves and ideas.   If you are excited and passionate about helping us #letssolvewater, we want to hear from you! For more information, please visit us at www.xylem.com.    We Offer You More Than Just &ldquo;A Job&rdquo;    Professional Development &ndash; To advance the capabilities of our people, we offer a wide variety of experiences to support our employees&rsquo; professional growth and continuous learning.   Total Rewards &ndash; We offer comprehensive programs for compensation, benefits, recognition, learning and development, work-life integration and corporate citizenship.   Watermark &ndash; Watermark is our corporate social responsibility program working to provide education and access to safe water to ensure healthy lives, gender equality, and resilient communities. Employees have the opportunity to learn and volunteer on various water-related projects.   Employee Networks &ndash; Our Employee Networks provide a professional, supportive network for employees from diverse backgrounds, including Women&rsquo;s, LGBT+ and Allies, Veteran&rsquo;s, People of Color and Allies, Emerging Leaders, and Working Parents Networks.     The Role:  The R&amp;D Engineering Intern under supervision and direction of senior lab staff will support engineering activities such as pump testing, modification, fabrication, design development and assembly of prototype electro mechanical systems, experimental design circuitry or specialized test equipment.   Applications may include analog, digital and/or video circuits, and logic systems. Ability to work from schematics, diagrams, written and verbal descriptions, layouts or defined plans to perform testing, checkout and trouble-shooting functions. Assist in determining methods or actions to remedy malfunctions. The candidate will also assist in the design, construction and fabrication of R&amp;D Lab test equipment. Uses manufacturing test, development or diagnostic equipment, including, but not limited to, test programs oscilloscopes, signal generators and specialized test apparatus.    Essential Duties/Principal Responsibilities:    Under general supervision supports engineering activities such as design, test, check-out, modification, fabrication and assembly of prototype electro mechanical systems, experimental design circuitry or specialized test equipment.   Develops solutions to technical problems of moderate (semi-routine) scope and complexity   Contributes to the completion of milestones associated with routine technical tasks.   Works with contacts in immediate work unit to obtain and/or provide information to complete assignments.   Has a strong sense of ownership and drive   Wants to learn from experienced engineers, technicians, and managers   Performs other duties as assigned.   Capable of physically performing the duties in an industrial R&amp;D test lab, consisting of lifting turning and use of basic tools.     Minimum Qualifications: Education, Experience, Skills, Abilities, License/Certification:    Attending an accredited University studying toward a BSME or BSMET   Minimum rising sophomore in standing   Basic knowledge of test methodologies and statistical tools used to solve problems   Willingness to work in a research and development environment   Ability to communicate effectively in writing, orally with both local and remote sites   Ability to work collaboratively within a team environment of engineers to meet aggressive goals and high quality standards   Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced, dynamic, and high visibility environment and work well as part of a team   Must be willing to work out of the Xylem Seneca Falls facility   Strong oral and written technical communication skills preferred   Proficient in MS Office: Word, Excel, PPT   LabVIEW experience preferred   Experience with hand and power tools   Understanding formal problem solving methodologies   Strong mechanical aptitude     Physical Demands:    (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)   Regularly required to sit or stand, reach, bend and move about the facility     Work Environment:    (The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.)   Office: Standard office equipment; work usually performed in an office setting free from any disagreeable elements.   Standard weekly job hours: 40 hours    Xylem is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other characteristics protected by law. 

 Redhouse Arts Center located in Syracuse, NY is a professional, not-for-profit theater serving the community by providing leading and inclusive experiences through its theater and educational programs.  POSITION: Information Technology Internship  Redhouse Arts Center has an immediate opening for an IT Intern; this is a part-time position. The IT Intern will work closely with Redhouse leadership on various IT tasks and projects. Responsibilities include computer and printer troubleshooting, maintenance, repair and installation, hardware and software configurations, and other similar duties. Must posses a general knowledge of computer technology and computer systems including Mac/Apple products. Must be detail oriented and able to work independently with minimal supervision.  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Experience:  Windows: 1 year (Preferred)  Customer Service: 1 year (Preferred)  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented WordPress/Shopify Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

   Date Posted:   2020-01-24-08:00   Country:   United States of America   Location:   CANTR: Refrigeration-Syracuse, NY 6304 Thompson Rd, Syracuse, NY, 13221 USA    Carrier is built on innovations that consistently reinvent industries and standards of quality, safety and sustainability. To ensure we continue to lead the way, Carrier is always seeking talented, motivated individuals that can help drive the future of our industry- leading brands. Carrier&rsquo;s portfolio includes fire safety, security, building automation, heating, ventilation, air conditioning and refrigeration systems. Transicold sits inside the refrigeration side of the business and provides business solutions for those transporting goods across the globe.      Responsibilities:      Hands-on experience in multiple engineering applications that can include Mechanical, Electrical, Refrigeration Systems, Materials Engineering or Structural Analysis &amp; Vibration.   Utilize state-of-the-art equipment to support tests on multiple revolutionary projects.   Work side-by-side with subject-matter experts and be involved on project teams.       Job Requirements:     Education / Certifications    Pursuing a Bachelors or Masters in either Mechanical or Electrical Engineering with a minimum of two years of relevant coursework.    Experience / Qualifications    Candidates should possess the ability to be hands-on in a laboratory environment.   Design and support of structural tests in a multi-axis vibration and stress lab.   Demonstrated proficient computer and analytical experience with engineering development tools such as Matlab and Pro-E is a plus.   Interest in FEA and vapor compression systems is also preferred.   Strong written and verbal communication skills   Candidates should be self-motivated, able to work independently, organized, and able to follow directions well.   Knowledge and ability to thrive in a fast-paced changing environment is essential for success in this position.     Carrier is An Equal   Opportunity/Affirmative   Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.  

     Who We Are:  New York Air Brake has been serving the rail industry since 1890 with innovative train control systems. Headquartered in Watertown, New York, with operations in Nixa &amp; Kansas City, Missouri; Irving, Texas; West Chicago, Illinois and a brand new, state-of-the-art manufacturing facility in Salisbury, North Carolina. Known for innovation, quality, customer focus, and safety, NYAB continues to grow and offer career opportunities in a people-first environment. <br>    This is your opportunity to make a big impact on the next generation of braking and safety systems. You can expect challenging work and an insiders view into your future profession. You will work as an individual and as part of a project team, while receiving regular feedback in preparation for a final presentation to company leaders. <br>     Responsibilities will be focused in one or more of the following areas:   Construction of Engineering Prototypes  Engineering Development Testing  Construction of Test Equipment  Design Analysis  <br>     What We Offer:  What We Offer:  Our internships are not all work. NYAB is located in Watertown, New York. When not working, spend your free time hiking the Adirondack Mountains, kayaking the many waterways, enjoying the beaches of Lake Ontario or exploring the history, food and fun the Thousand Islands Region has to offer. You are just a short drive to World Class Casino&rsquo;s, Golf, Shopping and the award winning Finger Lakes Wine Country. Our interns begin work as early as the end of May and work up until the middle of August. Expect 40 hours per week and a competitive salary (based on experience and position) of up to $20 per hour. You will take part in special events, &amp; outings, take advantage of wellness &amp; workout programs in our fitness facility or join the lunchtime kickball league. There is something for everyone as a summer intern. <br> Required Skills<br> Presently attending an accredited college or university, with a GPA of 3.0 or higher  Previous relevant internship, co-op, course, or work experience  Strong communication, teamwork, leadership skills  Active involvement in your own career development to date (e.g. networking, seminars, and industry groups, etc.) is highly desired  Flexibility to work across multiple disciplines  <br><br> Required Experience<br>   Education:  Engineering majors with a GPA of 3.0 or higher. Electrical or Computer Engineering major/minor preferred. <br>     Offers of employment are contingent on pre-employment drug testing and criminal background screening results  <br>     New York Air Brake is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to excellence through diversity:   EOE/AA/M/F/D/V  

   This internship is a part of  CONMED TALENT LAUNCH  &ndash; a hands on, immersive program designed to provide students with the exposure, experience and development needed to launch a successful career at CONMED. Program highlights include networking with senior leaders and recent college graduates, feedback and coaching, cross-functional shadowing opportunities, and more! 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented WordPress Develop Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

    ROLE OBJECTIVE:    The electrical engineering intern will assist engineering staff and department while providing an<br>  educational learning experience. The experience will benefit the company and intern while maintaining cost-effective solutions to standard engineering<br> challenges. The intern will assist with tasks related to engineering design, product manufacturing and testing.    GENERAL FUNCTIONS AND SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES     General Functions    Engineering work under the supervision of a mentoring member of the TXRX Systems R&amp;D engineering group. Primary responsibilities will be participation with the engineering team assisting in technical tasks required to complete new product developments, initiate product design improvements, and special R&amp;D assignments.    Specific Responsibilities:   Perform functional tests on electronic products  Assist with development of special RF filters and circuits  Assist with test/debug and documentation of new products  Assist with engineering design verifications and product validations  Assist with circuit and system design and debug  Simple programming of embedded systems     Justification:    The further justification for the summer intern is that the position provides an added engineering resource during the New Platform TTA project work which will is expected to be in full prototype verification and validation phase during the intern&rsquo;s term. There will be extensive amounts of lab testing work that will need to be performed as well as documentation completed.     Required skills/Qualifications:   Enrolled in a BS or MS education program, Electrical Engineering, Physics etc. (Preferred 3rd or 4th year)  Electrical Engineering aptitude with understanding of electrical circuits and    embedded controllers Familiarity with electrical test equipment (e.g. oscilloscope, meters, instrumentation)  Basic competence with one or more programming languages (C/C++, Python, etc.)     Optional skills:   Familiarity with RF test equipment and instrumentation (VNA Spectrum Analyzer)  Familiarity with computer operating systems such as Windows Linux, Android  

     Location:  Big Flats, NY, US, 14814    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43329 <br>   Corning is one of the world's leading innovators in materials science, with a 166-year track record of life-changing inventions. Corning applies its unparalleled expertise in glass science, ceramics science, and optical physics, along with its deep manufacturing and engineering capabilities, to develop category-defining products that transform industries and enhance people's lives. Corning Valor&trade; Glass is an example of a life-changing innovation purpose-built to store and protect injectable medicines. Corning is also a global leader in pharmaceutical tubing, manufacturing a variety of clear and amber glass tubing that is converted by our customers into vials, cartridges, ampules and syringes.    Scope of Position:  

 This electrical engineer will work as part of an diverse engineering team that develops electronic components and subsystems for undersea systems. As a minimum, this candidate will be expected to interface with other electrical engineers, mechanical engineers, draftsmen and Operations (Manufacturing) personnel on the development of detailed electrical designs. Selected candidate will work closely with a senior engineers in the design, assembly and test of these complex electronic systems. Documentation and reporting of schedule, financial and technical progress on all task responsibilities is expected. <br><br> Candidate should have excellent verbal and written communication skills and ability to work in a team oriented product development organization. Proficiency with the use of personal computers, including word processing and graphical applications is required.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Currently in pursuit of a BS degree in Electrical Engineering or related discipline  Ability to work in integrated teams  Strong verbal and written communication skills  2.5 GPA or higher preferred, but not required (Cumulative or Major GPA)    Desired Skills: <br> Experience/exposure to MATLAB, Spice, LabVIEW, circuit board design, and/or analog/digital test equipment    BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern

  Seeking interns who have access to Geographic Information Systems (ArcGIS Pro Desktop) or ArcMap.    Responsibilities will include:   Collecting open source data   Organizing, adding, and editing data on file geodatabases in ArcGIS Pro   Creating maps focused on improving sidewalks in major U.S cities     Data will be used for navigation, real estate and health apps/APIs. Interns will learn to define sidewalk character and quality using walkability constructs.    Work is done remotely during the Covid-19 period. 

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43968 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&amp;D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.   Program Benefits:  Competitive salaries  Housing assistance  Travel reimbursement  <br>   Intern Activities:  Social and networking events  Volunteer opportunities  Community Involvement  <br>   Travel Requirements (please note if international):   We do not anticipate travel  <br>

 Overview:   Calspan takes great pride in our ability to attract, recruit, and develop extraordinary talent. We are currently looking for exceptional students to fill our 2021 Summer Internship Program. Calspan&rsquo;s interns will contribute to exciting projects in both the aerospace and automotive industries and have the opportunity to participate in professional development sessions led by subject matter industry leaders. We are looking for a motivated student to join our Transonic Wind Tunnel team.

   Start Here, Go Anywhere! Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world? <br><br> During your internship at Arup, you&rsquo;ll have the chance to work with some of the most highly respected engineers and specialists in the world. You&rsquo;ll also get the opportunity to work on exciting and significant projects, delivering quality work that has a positive and lasting influence on the community and the environment.<br>    The Bridges and Civil Structures team designs structures which enhance the built environment around the world. Graduate engineers will join other talented designers in our interdisciplinary office to work on challenging, interesting and award-winning infrastructure projects. Graduates will play an active role at all stages and on all kinds of projects, from feasibility studies to concept and final designs. They will work to achieve professional status through project design work, including preparing calculations, drawings and computer modeling; and structured training, including extensive internal courses. They will join Arup&rsquo;s rising digital transformation in seeking new ways to increase our efficiency through automation and creating an integrated digital approach to design.<br>    <br> Responsibilities of this specific role will include, but not be limited to the following: <br>  <br> Structural software skills (training course, on-the-job)   Structural analysis modeling (on-the-job)   Learning about the Arup Structural Skills Network (introduction course, on-the-job)   Learning to navigate through codes and/or guidelines.   <br> Qualifications 

      CDM Smith is looking for an Environmental Engineering Intern to join our team! You'll be working with a dynamic team of industry leading engineers on a diverse portfolio of public, federal, and industrial projects. Students will work closely with senior engineers to research environmental information to support analyses and design. They will evaluate data to determine usability in for analyses and modeling. Students will also assist in developing documents and presentations to disseminate study information. May assist with fieldwork to collect environmental data. They may also be exposure to ArcGIS, CADD, Excel and Access software to display, analyze and manage data.

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Current employees and contingent workers click   here   to apply and search by the Job Posting Title.  </h2><h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> iHeartMedia<br>       Job Summary:    iHeartMedia is the No. 1 all-in-one digital audio service with over a billion downloads; we reached our first 20 million registered users faster than any digital service in Internet history and reached 110 million registered users faster than any other radio or digital music service and even faster than Facebook. Our areas of operations include radio broadcasting, online, mobile, digital and social media, live concerts and events, syndication, music research services and independent media representation. We are looking for talented, energetic, curious problem-solvers who will be a great fit into our fast moving culture. In turn, we will help you acquire specific skills where needed.<br>       Responsibilities:     &bull; Conducts technology solution research &amp; analysis.     &bull; Prepares &amp; delivers reports as required.     &bull; May work with other interns on projects.     &bull; Assists in developing and broadening interest in iHeartMedia.       Qualifications:     &bull; Hands on software development skills using Microsoft Visual Studio (C#), HTML, and/or Java (specifically React). Knowledge of relational databases and SQL a big plus     &bull; Outstanding problem solving skills with the ability to rapidly and independently build solutions that people love     &bull; You must possess natural technical curiosity and the desire to learn new things quickly     &bull; Excellent written and spoken communication skills; active listening; effectively conveying information; ability to proofread &amp; edit     &bull; Planning &amp; organizing: focusing on urgent and important tasks; avoiding procrastination; showing attention to detail; meeting deadlines     &bull; Innovation &amp; Creativity     &bull; Leadership in peer relationships     &bull; Ability to work independently and efficiently     &bull; Flexibility &amp; creativity; can adapt to shifts in priorities and urgencies     &bull; Highly proficient in Microsoft Office Suite and social media platforms, e.g., Twitter, Facebook, Tumblr, Instagram, Pinterest     &bull; Interpersonal skills: collaboration with others     &bull; Professionalism<br>      Work Experience:     &bull; Previous work experience in web development, e-commerce or the media field preferred<br>      Education:     &bull; Full-time BS undergraduates (rising Junior or Senior) at a four-year college focusing in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related technical field     &bull; Minimum 3.2 GPA     &bull; Interest in the Media field of study a plus, e.g., Communications, Marketing, Advertising, Broadcast Journalism       Certifications:     &bull; College/university transcript (must submit with application)<br>        Location    New York, NY: 125 West 55th Street, 10019<br>       Position Type    Temporary<br>       The Company is an equal opportunity employer and will not tolerate discrimination in employment on the basis of race, color, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, disability, ethnicity, national origin, marital status, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other legally protected classification or status.<br>      Our organization participates in E-Verify. Click   here   to learn about E-Verify.<br>      Current employees and contingent workers click   here   to apply and search by the Job Posting Title.  </h2>

   Type:   Internship <br> Experience: Graduate Students     Who we are:    Dataminr puts real-time AI and public data to work for our clients, generating relevant and actionable alerts for global corporations, public sector agencies, newsrooms, and NGOs. Our leading AI platform detects the earliest signals of high-impact events and emerging risks from vast amounts of publicly available information. Our real-time alerts enable tens of thousands of users at hundreds of public and private sector organizations to learn first of breaking events around the world, develop effective risk mitigation strategies, and respond with confidence as crises unfold.   Dataminr is making its mark for growth and innovation, recently earning recognition on the Deloitte Technology Fast 500, Forbes AI 50 and Forbes Cloud 100 lists. We also earned accolades for 'Most Innovative Use of AI' from the 2020 AI &amp; Machine Learning Awards.   Join our team and help the world manage risk in real time. You'll work with 600+ talented people across seven offices, united by our passion to collaborate, make a difference, and have fun while doing it!  

 Overview:   At Bohler, we empower the ambitious to become the accomplished. This greater purpose connects us with like-minded professionals, fosters meaningful relationships, and generates the alignment necessary to produce an unrivaled consulting and employment experience.

   Start Here, Go Anywhere! Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world?  <br> 

    Essential Role and Responsibilities   Assist in the design and develop GUI-based test programs that interface with test equipment (logic analyzers, oscilloscopes, meters, etc.)   Help to develop application and software libraries to support NAI board products for Windows, Linux and VxWorks operating systems.   Work on embedded programming for low level hardware interfaces between I2C, SPI, and other bus or I/O devices.    Qualifications and Education Requirements   At least 60 Credits toward a Computer Science or Electrical Engineering degree with embedded software development (preferably embedded Linux and VxWorks).   One year of engineering and/or programming experience a plus.   Understanding of software engineering, procedural and object-oriented programming concepts.   Some knowledge of C, C++, C#, GUI programming, Object-Oriented design and programming, TCP/UDP Ethernet Programming, Windows and Linux.     Other Skills and Abilities   Must have good oral and written communication skills.   Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.   Self-motivated, and possess a high degree of curiosity and desire to learn new things.   Microsoft Office, Word and Excel.   Ability to work with hardware to debug test programs.    North Atlantic Industries is a specialized provider of embedded electronic and computing systems for military, commercial aerospace and industrial applications. We are 200+ highly talented and innovative employees, who are dedicated to solving complex electronic challenges. At NAI, you&rsquo;re encouraged to participate in a variety of projects and given the space to develop a wide breadth of technical expertise.     Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities   The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor&rsquo;s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c) 

 Position Overview:   Come join a company that is investing and expanding! Novelis is looking for Juniors and Seniors who are interested in an  Process Engineer  Internship or Co Op beginning on or around May 20th.

  Meltek Inc. is a pre-seed Cleantech startup whose mission is to expand reliable access to renewable energy resources in the United States and abroad. By enabling homeowners and small businesses to optimize their renewable energy and storage systems Meltek will empower more homeowners and small businesses across the United States to save money on electrical costs while enjoying greater access to clean energy.    Role &ndash;    Assist leadership and other developers to plan, architect, and develop applications used to monitor and manage equipment and access, manage and store data intended to enhance and optimize the installation and usage of renewable energy resources and energy storage.     Responsibilities &ndash;    Design platform architecture with inputs from product management   Fine-tune energy optimization algorithms   Interface the SCADA/EMS engine with visualization tools for the UI/UX    Implement CI/CD protocols and code   Manage database efforts   Determine inputs required to provide marketing&rsquo;s desired outputs   Develop functions, applications, and coding to provide required outputs and control   Develop and optimize interfaces between various databases and applications   Develop interfaces between internal systems, external systems, and users     Technical Qualifications &ndash;   BS/MS in ECE or related field   Knowledge of EMS or SCADA systems   Experience developing a product from scratch   Understand full stack of technologies from backend to frontend, including but not limited to Python, MatLab, JavaScript and SQL   Familiarity with the entire software development lifecycle   Working knowledge of full-stack development, SCADA, HMI, MMI, and EMS     Personal Qualifications &ndash;   Clear, precise communications needed for fully remote work   Disciplined self-starter with an entrepreneurial mindset   Understanding of product development and team leadership    Proactive in seeking solutions to difficult technical problems   Effective verbal and written communication skills     Location:  Remote    Note:  This position will be funded through the New York State Energy Research &amp; Development Authority (NYSERDA) Clean Energy Internship Program (Link). Only New York State-based applicants will be considered. 

  Job Type:  Non Exempt<br> State: :NY  City: Melville<br> Brand: Corporate<br><h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Overview  </h2>      AvalonBay Communities, Inc. is one of the nation's leading Real Estate Investment Trusts (REIT's), in the business of developing, redeveloping, acquiring and managing quality apartment communities in high barrier-to-entry markets of the United States. These markets are located in the Northeast, Mid-Atlantic, Southeast, Pacific Northwest and Northern and Southern California regions of the country. We currently own and operate approximately 82,000 apartment homes in the US and employ approximately 3,000 associates.     Creating a better way to live is the purpose that binds AvalonBay associates. We take that purpose seriously and expect you will as well. By focusing on collaboration, innovation, and taking ownership of our choices and actions, we act in ways that focus on creating value for our customers, investors and associates. Your positive, professional, and consistent personal interactions make AvalonBay a great place to work.   

  We create great places and the connections that get people and goods moving&mdash;whether by car, bus, train, plane, or their own two feet. Working within the context of the communities we serve, we provide planning, engineering, and infrastructure management services that fit the needs of our clients and improve the overall transportation experience. Join our team and help us keep communities connected.   Your Opportunity   Our Dynamic New York City Civil team is looking for an Intern/Co-op for the Fall 2018 Semester.   Your Key Responsibilities   Assist engineers in the preparation of contract documents and reports for a variety of civil and structural engineering projects ranging from bridges to commuter rail and subway stations.  Responsibilities include computer aided design and drafting, checking drawings and calculations, quantity take-offs, simple structural calculations, and field inspection.    Your Capabilities and Credentials   Minimum requirements include some exposure to CAD Design programs and current good academic standing in accredited engineering school.   Education and Experience   Must be currently enrolled in a Bachelors or Masters Engineering Program  Typical office environment working with computers and remaining sedentary for long periods of time. Field work may include exposure to the elements including inclement weather.  This description is not a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that may be required of the employee and other duties, responsibilities and activities may be assigned or may be changed at any time with or without notice.  Stantec is a place where the best and brightest come to build on each others&rsquo; talents, do exciting work, and make an impact on the world around us. Join us and redefine your personal best.   Job:  Co-op/Summer/Intern Student   Primary Location:  United States-New York-New York   Employee Status:  Temporary   Job Level:  Entry Level   Travel:  No   Schedule:  Full-time   Req ID:  21000035  Stantec provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified employees and applicants for future and current employment and prohibit discrimination on the grounds of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression. We prohibit discrimination in decisions concerning recruitment, hiring, referral, promotion, compensation, fringe benefits, job training, terminations or any other condition of employment. Stantec is in compliance with local, state and federal laws and regulations and ensures equitable opportunities in all aspects of employment. EEO including Disability/Protected Veterans 

    AKF Group LLC is an award-winning professional services firm providing engineering, commissioning, testing, technology, and sustainability and lightning design services. We are currently recruiting an electrical and mechanical Intern/CoOp to join our Engineering team in our New York office. Ideal candidates are enrolled in a mechanical or electrical engineering program and are eager to learn.    What You Will Do:    Perform basic calculations   Assist in the evaluation of fundamental engineering guidelines, code compliance requirements and industry standards   Participate in the examination of field conditions as required to support development and completion of projects   Assist in documentation processes   Prepare materials for presentations or client meetings   Assist in the requests for information and drafting correspondence   Represent the company in a professional manner in all dealings with owners, architects, vendors, other design professionals and contractors   Update job knowledge and technical expertise by participating in educational opportunities, reading professional publications, participating in technical organizations   Perform other duties as assigned     What You Will Need:    Pursuing a bachelor&rsquo;s degree from an accredited mechanical or electrical engineering program   Possess strong verbal, written, analytical, persuasive and interpersonal skills   Ability to handle multiple assignments simultaneously and work effectively as part of a project team   Knowledge of MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook)   Introductory working knowledge of BIM/Revit and AutoCAD     Job Classification and Scheduled work hours:    Full Time Temporary Hourly Non-Exempt Employee. Non-Exempt employees are eligible for Overtime Pay.   Standard workweek is Monday-Friday   You may be required to work extra hours in order to meet client&rsquo;s demands and project delivery target dates.   Travel to client meetings and worksites is required.  

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for a full-time summer intern on the Energy Market Products team.<br>    This intern will be working with both the Energy Market Products and Enterprise Infrastructure Products teams. The Business Analysts on these teams collaborate with IT and the business on development of detailed requirements and product documentation. The intern will work with the Energy Market Products team on the creation of user stories in JIRA to support requirements traceability on several projects, and work with the Enterprise Infrastructure Products team to support detailed requirement development and smoke testing on several projects. <br><br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Current enrollment in Electrical Engineer, Economics, Computer Science, or related technical degree program  Some experience in any portion of the Software Development Life Cycle   Technical Writing Skills  <br>   The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check.   The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

 CharacterFaceGen CFG is the latest state-of-art AI-powered software that generate a 3D facial model & animation from video footage  Please watch our video demo before you apply<br/>Application https://youtu.be/KBe1tZFlsGE<br/>CFG Gen2- https://youtu.be/95B6WKYLlhE  Job Description (Sorry. Visa sponsorship is not available)  Help implement product code in C++ and/or python - 3DMM or Deep Learning-based 3D face & body reconstruction  3D reconstruction using Lidar-enabled SLAM software  Help complete implementation for 3D GUI & plugin to run CFG in Maya, LW3D, C4D, Adobe AE, Nuke, Modo, Blender etc   What We Need To See:  BA and MS in Computer Science or two years of experience - Courses or projects on computer visions, machine learning, 3DMM and ML-based 3D face/body reconstruction, volumetric motion capture, etc  Robotics SLAM is a plus  Strong programming foundation and experience in C++ and python.  Interest in computer vision and graphics. Good communications, math, and analytical skills.   Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Experience:  Computer vision: 2 years (Preferred)  Machine learning: 2 years (Preferred)  C++: 2 years (Preferred)  Python: 3 years (Preferred)  Software development: 3 years (Preferred)  Robotics SLAM: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Multiple locations   Internship Compensation:  Pay   Company's website:  https://characterfacegen.com/   Company's Facebook page:  https://www.facebook.com/characterfacegen   Work Remotely:  No  

  Seeking the challenge of building something outstanding from the ground up? At MongoDB, we're doing just that, by unlocking the power of data for developers. We're looking for curious minds to help us build the next-generation in database technology.   As we continue on our mission to become a data platform company, there's an exciting opportunity to craft the product in a way that opens the possibility for users of MongoDB Atlas to build impactful things. As a Data Science intern, joining a growing community of data enthusiasts, you will have the chance to create and make a direct impact. By conceptualizing machine learning models that help us anticipate customer behavior, or by formulating predictive models that improve the MongoDB query language, you will learn how to contribute to a data driven product.    What we are looking for in you   A Masters or PhD student in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics, Physics, Economics, Mathematics, Analytics, or other field with significant course work in statistics and research).  Confident programming in a statistical programming/scripting language (R, Python).  Have an understanding of data structures, machine learning algorithms, and computational complexity. Familiarity with design of online experiments is a plus.  Have a solid ability to collaborate and communicate with people from diverse professional and educational backgrounds.  Comfortable thinking analytically about ambiguous problems and willing to problem solve and troubleshoot regardless of methods, techniques, or tools; not hung up on implementing a convolutional neural net!    What you'll find at MongoDB   Write code (Python, R, SQL, etc.) for analyzing data, and build statistical models to solve specific business problems.  Build stakeholder-facing reports &amp; visualizations to provide insights and metrics which help understand user behavior.  Collaborate with data engineers, UX researchers, software developers, and data analysts/scientists to build data science solutions and provide analytical support.  Find like-minded teammates who will make your New York City internship the most fun ever!   *MongoDB, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.* 

  **OUR SUMMER INTERNSHIP PROGRAM WILL START WEDNESDAY, JUNE 2ND, 2021.** <br><br> ABOUT US&hellip; <br><br> Spectrum Reach is the advertising sales division of Charter Communications, Inc. The company offers custom solutions for the modern media landscape utilizing national cable networks, internet advertising and promotional events supported by marketing, research and award-winning creative services. Spectrum Reach applies insightful research to understand consumer behavior and build targeted, multi-screen media plans personalized for each customer.<br><br> With offices in 41 states and over 100 markets, Spectrum Reach covers over 27 million households throughout the country. From traditional commercial advertising to exciting new possibilities in interactive media and multi-screen solutions, Spectrum Reach&rsquo;s consultative team brings advertisers effective, efficient ways to turn our audiences into their customers.<br><br> Click here to view what some of our former interns are doing now: https://vimeo.com/392988168<br><br> WHAT WE OFFER&hellip; <br><br> Competitive pay for both our undergrad, graduate and technology positions. <br><br> INTERNSHIP REQUIREMENTS&hellip;   Internship will last approximately 10 weeks.   Must have at least a 3.0 GPA or greater   At time of application, you must be enrolled in an educational institution.    JOB OVERVIEW&hellip; <br><br> The Intern will assist with the coordination and execution of various tasks and process within the Product Management and Development team. This role requires strong analytical, ad tech / advertising and communication skills. <br><br> JOB DUTIES...   Conduct product competitive analysis   Review existing product portfolio, make product recommendations for key product refreshes   Effectively collaborate with internal stakeholders; such as Creative Services, Sales and Marketing   Develop presentations, run reports and perform competitive research   Execute all special projects in a timely manner   Conceptualize candidate net new product(s) and follow product release framework    REQUIREMENTS...   Demonstrable interest in ad tech / mar tech, advertising and marketing   Strong efficiency necessary in MS Word, Excel and PowerPoint, Photoshop and HTML   Excellent organizational and personal communication skills   Creative problem solving and the ability to take initiative and make sound judgment   Ability to change direction quickly while meeting deadlines   Work effectively and act professionally with all staff levels   Ability to work with minimal/moderate supervision   Ability to learn new processes quickly   Ability to work in a fast-paced, team environment while also working individually towards goals   Strong attention to detail and quality  <br> For more information on Spectrum&rsquo;s benefits, please click here.

   About the Role      The Liquidnet Infosec Internship offers the candidate the ability to experience information security in real world scenarios. It is the mission of the Infosec Department to protect Liquidnet&rsquo;s data, members, and employees from nefarious actors. Utilizing best in class tools, adherence to industry frameworks and an extremely motivated team, the chosen candidate will be a hands on asset in helping us achieve this mission.      Responsibilities     &bull;  Examine application architectures, assess the security risks they pose and suggest mitigations   Participate in product evaluations    Write scripts for access control auditing with our team and network vulnerability scan parsing    Assist with security assessments and audits (firewall rules, wireless networks, etc.)    Assist with security monitoring and response tasks    Share the latest thinking on information security topics       Skills and Experience      A motivated learner, keen on absorbing all that happens within Infosec    The candidate is studying cybersecurity or a related field    Familiar with Windows and Linux operating systems    Excellent communication skills  

   Talent Acquisition Business Partner:  Kevin Leysath   The Summer College Internship Program is a 10-week, paid internship experience that allows undergraduate and graduate students the opportunity to attend development workshops, network, and be part of our company. Our college interns work on meaningful projects, are mentored under their respective managers, and continue to develop throughout the entire summer. In addition, through the internship program, our interns can attend development workshops that are focused on key concepts within the divisional tracks of Information Technology, Actuary, Analytics &amp; Data, Clinical Studies, Web-based Customer Experience, Digital Operations, and other technical based degree programs.   This is a paid 10-week summer internship from the first Monday in June to the second Friday in August (up to 40 hours per week).

     The Opportunity    <br>  Mesirow Financial is an independent, employee-owned firm founded in 1937. As specialists in investment, risk management and advisory services, we are committed to helping our institutional, corporate and individual clients achieve their objectives. Our professionals are inspired by an entrepreneurial desire to develop tailored solutions designed to deliver measurable results.   <br>  As one of the nation's more established and most experienced participants in the fixed income markets, Mesirow Financial offers our clients a myriad of financial products, combined with extensive market experience. Our Institutional Sales and Trading team is comprised of over 120 dedicated traders, salespeople and analysts highly specialized in a variety of sectors of the fixed income market.   <br>  We have an exciting opportunity for an Institutional Sales &amp; Trading Intern to learn the fixed income markets and to begin to develop a successful career in Institutional Sales. Successful candidates will possess strong quantitative and communication skills and thrive in a fast-paced and collaborative environment. This program allows students to simultaneously display their current talents and acquire new ones.   <br>   Responsibilities    Perform various types of analysis using fundamental and technical data   Become familiar with Senior management and their roles   Conduct industry and product research in support of trading desks and senior leaders   Prepare presentation materials and participate in portfolio reviews for senior management   Monitor a variety of markets and assist in developing trade ideas in support of the trading desks   Participate in individual and group projects and shadowing opportunities   Listen to client calls and help field client requests     Requirements    Current enrollment in a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in Accounting, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering, or Math   Graduation between December 2021 and June 2022    Strong extracurricular activities/campus involvement    High proficiency with Microsoft Office products (i.e. Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)   Ability to work in a fast-paced environment with high attention to detail   Superior communications skills, both oral and written; effective interpersonal skills   Ability to work well independently and also within a team    Understanding of accounting, math, and basic finance   A background in computer science is beneficial, but not required  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Designer/Developer Assistant Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 Running manual machines, running CNC machines, hand assembly, welding.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Currently enrolled in a 2 year degree program at an accredited college for Electronics Engineering, Software Engineering, Facilities Engineering, Manufacturing Engineering, or a related discipline  <br> 2.5 GPA or higher preferred, but not required (Cumulative or Major GPA)    Desired Skills: <br> Knows how to operate Manual Bridgeport and Lathe Machines  <br> Thorough understanding of CNC Machines  <br> Ability to work with hand tools and can read blueprints  <br> Welding MIG/TIG    BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern

 "School Credit opportunity"  WHY JOIN US?  Sound Around, Inc. (SA) is a NYC-based company with 47 years of experience in selling consumer electronics, currently mainly through online platforms and big-box stores, including shipping merchandise across the U.S. through third-party services. We are currently in the market for the following:   Industry   E-Commerce   Electronic Manufacturer  Selling Wholesale Retail and Online,  Full Stack Web Developer (Shopify experience)  As Full Stack Web Developer (Shopify experience) , you will have the following:   Responsibilities   Manage our Shopify using best practices   Find, diagnose, and fix bugs   QA existing and future sites   Front-end tasks include taking mock-ups and making them pixel perfect on Shopify   Back-end development work includes optimizing the existing site for speed, bug diagnostics, and building out new site functionality   Work efficiently within a local and staging environment   Keep all project tasks organized   Meet deadlines   Additional tasks and projects as needed    Skills & Qualifications:    2+ years of full-stack web development experience   Previous experience completing a successful Shopify project   Prior start-up company experience highly preferred   Very Good level experience with CSS, HTML, bootstrap, AJAX, JavaScript, MySQL, and PHP   Comfortable working in team environments   Strong cross-functional communication skills   Ability to handle multiple priorities and meet deadlines   Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Experience:  Shopify: 2 years (Preferred)  javascript: 2 years (Preferred)   Hours per week:  30-39   Company's website:  www.Pyleusa.com   Work Remotely:  Yes  

  At Parametric, we offer competitive salaries, generous benefits and opportunities for growth and development. We invite you to explore our available job opportunities listed below and look forward to having you become a part of our continued success!      General Description    The Fixed Income Investment Systems Intern will design and implement creative and complete solutions to complex business problems. Intern will train extensively in current enterprise development practices.      Primary Responsibilities    Training:   Watch training videos and read books to gain industry understanding   Work through various training modules   Design and build test applications      Business Interaction:   Occasionally work directly with the business on macros, scripts, et al.   Work with the tools team on various applications and requirements   Work on production teams as a test engineer      Tools and Methodologies:   Agile Development   Test-Driven Development   Paired programming       Job Requirements    Junior or Senior in a college program in the Information Technology field.   Familiar with a coding language (C#, Java, Python)   Must enjoy working with people<br>     Parametric is an equal opportunity employer and is committed to providing a work environment that is free of discrimination and harassment. It does not discriminate against applicants or employees with respect to any terms or conditions of employment on account of race, color, religion, creed, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, age, pregnancy, parenthood, physical or mental disability (actual or perceived), medical condition including genetic characteristics, marital status, citizenship status, military service, gender, gender identity or express, registered domestic partner status, domestic violence victim status, status with regard to public assistance, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Parametric also prohibits discrimination based on the perception that a person has any of those characteristics or is associated with a person who has or is perceived as having any of those characteristics. This commitment applies to all persons involved in the operations of Parametric, and prohibits unlawful discrimination by any employee of Parametric, including supervisors and co-workers. All employment decisions shall be consistent with the principles of equal employment opportunity.     The information on this website is for U.S. residents only and does not constitute an offer to sell, or a solicitation of an offer to purchase, securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer. Investing entails risks and there can be no assurance that Parametric (and its affiliates) will achieve profits or avoid incurring losses. All investments are subject to potential loss of principal. Parametric does not provide tax or legal advice. Prospective investors should consult with a tax or legal advisor before making any investment decision. Please refer to the disclosure page for important information about investments and risks. 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Shopify Web Designer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

  Unqork is a no-code application platform that helps large enterprises build complex custom software faster, with higher quality, and lower costs than conventional approaches. Rather than relying on the need for code to translate business logic into an application, Unqork lets you design and build complex, fully functional applications using an intuitive visual interface. Whether it be insurance, health care, financial services, or public enterprise, Unqork is solving complex issues for industries across the board without ever writing a single line of code.    About the 2021 Unqork Internship Program:    This summer join Unqork in the no-code revolution! Unqork is seeking talented and driven individuals to participate in an exciting two-month internship program. During these eight weeks, you will be immersed in our inclusive and stimulating culture, working closely with some of the city's best talent in your field and learning about the industry from veteran mentors.   At Unqork, we place great importance on personal growth both behind the desk and in front. Network with company leaders during our weekly happy hours and enjoy exciting social outings planned for you and your mentors. And best of all, be surrounded with forward-thinking individuals who are passionate about what they do.   Are you ready for a dynamic, fast-paced summer? Come with plenty of energy because we just don't move that slowly!    Program Dates:    8 week long remote internship from June 14th through August 6th. We will kick-off your welcome with two days of training and orientation.    Other highlights include:   Work on cross-functional teams  Weekly meetings and feedback from managers  Learning experiences with Unqork's Senior Leadership Team  Unqork &quot;Yoda&quot; Mentorship  Weekly happy hour and virtual social events  Weekly Learning Bites with distinguished guest    The opportunity:    As an Engineering Intern on the Workflow team at Unqork you will work on a dynamic, cross-functional team, focusing on development primarily using React and Node.js. This is a critical role in helping to design, build, and own an industry-changing product.    Who you are:   You're empathic and enjoy working in a team environment  You are resourceful, pragmatic, open-minded and enjoy solving complicated problems  You pay attention to the details  You have an eagerness to learn and excel in a high-paced environment    What we're looking for:   Some experience with Javascript frameworks (React or Node.js)  Experience developing complex integration platforms, or working within such platforms    Unqork is an equal opportunity employer, and proud to be committed to diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age.  

Research and Develop algorithms to predict water quality in water treatment plants and distribution systems. Parameters like pH, alkalinity, disinfectant concentrations will be used to determine an aggregate index to ensure the quality of water. <br>The hourly rate for this role is $18.00/hour. This is the rate that we in good faith believe is the rate of possible compensation for this role at the time of this posting. We may ultimately pay more or less than the posted range and this range is only applicable for jobs to be performed in Colorado. This range may be modified in the future. <br>This is a temporary job. As such, this job is NOT eligible for benefits, bonus, incentive pay.

 Job Description:   Dewberry is a leading, market-facing professional services firm with more than 50 locations and 2,000 professionals nationwide. What sets us apart from our competitors are our people. At Dewberry, we seek out exceptional talent and strive to deliver the highest quality of services to our clients. Whether you&rsquo;re an experienced professional or a new graduate, you&rsquo;ll have the chance to collaborate with the best and brightest and work on innovative and complex projects at the forefront of the industry. Our commitment to excellence stems from our personal integrity and from other defining attributes, which we call &ldquo;Dewberry at Work,&rdquo; that have inspired our employees to be successful for more than a half-century.

   Job Responsibilities:   Collect, validate and organize data per the team&rsquo;s needs  Utilized Excel, R, SAS, Python, SQL in capturing, analyzing, managing and forecasting data  Assist managers in identifying investment opportunities from data analysis  Build quantitative models to support portfolio management and investment  Develop ad-hoc reports per managers&rsquo; requests or clients&rsquo; inquiries    Qualifications:   Minimum GPA 3.0  Should be in the pursuing of a college degree or above  Financial Mathematics/Engineering, Data Analytics/Business Analytics majors preferred  Good mastery of data analysis, data forecasting and database management  Strong technical skills in using Excel, PowerPoint, R, SAS, Python and MySQL  Excellent interpersonal skills  Strong presentation skills  Strong analytical and critical thinking skills  Established history of leadership and achievement  

     Location:  Big Flats, NY, US, 14814    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43330 <br>   Corning is one of the world's leading innovators in materials science, with a 166-year track record of life-changing inventions. Corning applies its unparalleled expertise in glass science, ceramics science, and optical physics, along with its deep manufacturing and engineering capabilities, to develop category-defining products that transform industries and enhance people's lives. Corning Valor&trade; Glass is an example of a life-changing innovation purpose-built to store and protect injectable medicines. Corning is also a global leader in pharmaceutical tubing, manufacturing a variety of clear and amber glass tubing that is converted by our customers into vials, cartridges, ampules and syringes.    Scope of Position:   Summer internship position to identify improvements that increase throughput and inventory turns.  In this meaningful role, you will have the opportunity to apply Industrial Engineering and Lean concepts to improve product and information flow, reduce inventory, meet customer delivery, increase capacity, reduce complexity, and reduce costs  Lead and/or participate in project teams to apply Industrial Engineering tools to yield process and flow improvements with the purpose of reducing cost, growing capacity, or reducing complexity  Implement Lean fundamental concepts such as value stream mapping and layout concepts for flow and pull to implement continuous flow  <br>    Day to Day Responsibilities:   Utilize sound industrial engineering skills to improve throughput and inventory turns.  Engage with operations to understand production workflow, problems to solve, current state, and feasibility of proposed solutions  

 Must apply direct with our client, ages 18-26:  https://click.appcast.io/track/6uxn56h?cs=itk&exch=16&jg=39c2&bid=TEz0xVerpiuhxLt0LS4mUA==  Our one-year training program offers real access to today's best companies and a proven path to career success. You’ll learn the skills hiring companies need and make important professional connections. 100% of qualified students earn an internship.  Job-Ready Skills Training<br/>We ask companies what skills they’re looking for, then train you in those skills to ensure you’ll land a top job when you graduate. That’s why 90% of our grads are either employed within the profession they studied or in school within four months.  Six-Month Corporate Internship<br/>Your six-month internship is about gaining access, getting your foot in the door, and making connections that count. You’ll receive valuable, hands-on experience working at a major company as you further develop the technical skills you’ve learned.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Pay: $12.00 - $20.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:  No: Not providing sponsorship for this job   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  

   We pride ourselves in fostering a remote environment where our interns can learn and grow. Our internships offer students the opportunity to work on real assignments across multiple disciplines, while also directly relating to their coursework. Students are paired with a &ldquo;buddy&rdquo; and Team Leader, both of which provide day-to-day guidance on projects throughout the summer. We also rely heavily on our internship pool for entry-level full-time openings each year.    Qualifications:   Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and multitasking environment, must embrace challenges and details, be resourceful, and have great organizational and time management skills  Currently enrolled and pursuing a BS in Civil or Environmental Engineering, or a related engineering degree.  At least 2 years of completed coursework as well as knowledge of Excel and AutoCAD is strongly preferred, but not required.    Responsibilities:   Assist the team in researching, compiling, and examining a wide variety of structure related data.  Assist in creating concept-level design of treatment works and perform computations for stormwater and watershed planning, and water quality studies.  Under supervision, perform engineering calculations, proofreading, and copying of various reports and specs.  Assist staff with a variety of projects and/or field assignments  Potential to learn and perform light drafting tasks and potentially assist with small design tasks in AutoCAD.    Tighe &amp; Bond  is a growing, well-established, employee-owned, engineering and environmental consulting firm with over 420 employees. A Top 10 New England ENR design firm, Tighe &amp; Bond was recognized by Civil Engineering News and Zweig Group as one of the &ldquo;Best Firms&rdquo; to work for in the country. Our team of engineers, scientists, planners, and other professionals provide creative solutions for critical challenges that impact water resources, wetlands, the environment, climate change, and sustainability from eleven offices across Connecticut, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode Island, Maine and New York. The firm offers employees an inviting mid-size company culture and an opportunity to develop a rewarding career that can have an impact on the environmental development of the Northeast region.    Tighe &amp; Bond  is an equal opportunity employer and affords equal opportunity to all applicants and employees for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other status protected under local, state, or federal laws. 

  Rich&rsquo;s, also known as Rich Products Corporation, is a family-owned food company dedicated to inspiring possibilities. From cakes and icings to pizza, appetizers and specialty toppings, our products are used in homes, restaurants and bakeries around the world. Beyond great food, our customers also gain insights to help them stay competitive, no matter their size. Our portfolio includes creative solutions geared at helping food industry professionals compete in foodservice, retail, in-store bakery, deli, and prepared foods, among others. Working in 100 locations globally, with annual sales exceeding $4 billion, Rich&rsquo;s is a global leader with a focus on everything that family makes possible. Rich&rsquo;s&reg;&mdash;Infinite Possibilities. One Family.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader">  PURPOSE STATEMENT </h2>

 Overview: <br> Riverhead Building Supply is a successful Building and Materials retailer. We seek a part time interns to work with our fast paced IT team out of our corporate headquarters. We are an equal opportuinity employer. <br><br> Responsibilities: <br> Candidate will be exposed to a dynamic IT environment. Diverse responsibilities will include IT help desk, Equipment set up, business communications, database work, and customer support for a multi-location environement. <br><br> Qualifications: <br> Flexible shift, approx 25 hours/week.

    Position Summary:  EN-POWER GROUP, founded in 2003, is an engineering firm that designs, develops, and delivers comprehensive and integrated energy solutions for any building type, from concept to completion. As a growing company, EN-POWER GROUP aims to provide a collaborative working environment and supports employees&rsquo; professional development by helping them pursue their technical interests through diverse hands-on experiences. Our team, composed of engineers, energy managers, analysts, and sustainability experts, focuses on energy efficiency and resiliency in order to strengthen long-term facility planning and maximize project payback.   This internship is based in our Midtown Manhattan office and is the ideal opportunity for students or recent graduates to gain valuable hands-on experience in energy management, building science, and lighting systems.   As an Energy Analyst and Field Intern, you will support lead energy engineers and auditors in the design, development, and evaluation of energy efficiency measures. You will develop an understanding of building HVAC, DHW, lighting, mechanical, and envelope systems. Your day-to-day will be to assist with building site visits, technical data entry, and energy modeling and calculations.    Principal Accountabilities:   Collect data during on-site inspections to document existing systems and associated equipment  Write/draft energy efficiency reports including ASHRAE Level I and II audit reports, and Local Law 87 Compliance reports  Assist lead engineers/auditors in the field to conduct energy audits and site assessments of building systems to evaluate energy usage and identify energy conservation measures (ECMs)  Assist with feasibility, energy savings, and cost-benefit financial analyses for potential ECMs  Create energy use analyses of building systems using analytical tools to help develop energy management plans and building-wide energy reduction plans  Assist lead engineers/auditors with testing and retro-commissioning of building systems to ensure compliance with Federal, State, and local laws (e.g., Local Law 87)    Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Other Job Requirements:   Pursuing or recently received a degree in engineering, environmental science/studies, or other relevant technical field  Interest in HVAC systems, renewable energy systems, and energy efficiency concepts  Proficiency in Microsoft Office with significant expertise in Excel  Certified as OSHA-10 within 6 months of employment per EN-POWER GROUP&rsquo;s training program  Possess ability to perform physical tasks including but not limited to: Standing, walking, and sitting for extended periods of time, reading and recording information on handwritten forms and computer screens, using hand tools (such as powered tools, measuring devices, etc.), lifting and carrying up to 25 pounds, navigating in small/enclosed places, climbing stairs and ladders, and working in loud, warm and cold environments  Travel primarily within New York City    Required Personal Qualifications:   Demonstrated passion for energy efficiency and clean energy technology  Collaborative personality, strong team player  Exceptional communication and interpersonal skills  Self-motivation, attention to detail, and ability to multitask  Demonstrated enthusiasm for learning  Proven ability to work independently and within in a team environment, and to proactively identify problems and solutions    Benefits:   Pre-tax Travel &amp; Phone Stipend  Employee Assistance Program  Additional Benefits include: Company Activities, Lunch &amp; Learns   About EN-POWER GROUP   With a mission of providing practical solutions to clients&rsquo; energy problems, EN-POWER GROUP was founded in May 2003 to be an engineering firm that designs, develops, and delivers comprehensive and integrated energy solutions for any building type, from concept to completion. <br>    EN-POWER GROUP is an Equal Opportunity Employer.   We regret that due to the large volume of applications, EN&#8209;POWER GROUP will only be able to contact those candidates who are being most actively considered. Please bear in mind if you are selected for an interview we will contact you within 30 days of reviewing your application. However, if we think your skills and qualifications may be suitable for other similar positions, we may hold your details in our database and contact you in the future. 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Website Designer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

   What We're Looking For   Our New York City office is seeking a Civil Intern Engineer to assist on Bridge Inspection projects. This will be a field position for the summer of 2021. <br><br> Under close supervision, assists assigned department(s) and/or project(s) by performing basic engineering-related tasks which may reflect elements of standard post-secondary engineering curriculum, usually on a part-time, temporary, or co-op basis.    Primary Focus Will Include:   Perform road and bridge inspections   Provide inspection work to monitor engineering plans and specifications   Perform mathematical calculations   Keep daily diaries of inspections      Preferred Qualifications and Skills:   Completion of at least 2 years of post-secondary civil engineering program   Structural emphasis or interest in bridge projects   Valid driver's license   Completion of OSHA 10 Hour Training   Previous internship or co-op experience   Interest in field/on-site work environment       What You'll Need    Essential Responsibilities:   Assists engineer teams in various tasks and duties.   Assists Engineer with research, development and design of projects.   Assists Engineer with the preparation of engineering drawings and documents as assigned.   Performs other duties as assigned.      Minimum Qualifications:   High School Diploma/GED or equivalent plus current enrollment in an accredited post-secondary engineering program     Visa sponsorship is not available for this position.   #Bridges

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Webmaster Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Development Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 *Job Description:<br/>Greene Developers is a Non for Profit Commercial Real Estate Development firm that is currently seeking a motivated college student to join our team for a virtual internship opportunity. As part of the internship, we will provide learning opportunities throughout the organization so that our intern understands the fundamentals of the Real Estate Development and Real Estate Sales industry following this experience. From an everyday perspective, our intern will contribute to hands-on research, assist with day-to-day responsibilities, contribute to business development initiatives, and carry out tasks for both internal and external clients. The ideal candidate will be detail-oriented, self-motivated, able to work well in a fast-paced environment with tight deadlines, demonstrate clear communication skills, and be motivated to learn – with a deep passion for and interest in Real Estate Development or Real Estate Sales as a career. Interns are placed in the following business units: Transactions, Asset Management, Research/National Accounts, and Leasing. Ultimately the end result is for our interns to work with us in some professional capacity in the near future. Students that have a background in real estate, construction, engineering /architectural, finance, or affordable housing will be prioritized.  *<br/>*Role and Responsibilities  Build a new website using Word Press   Attend industry educational and networking events   Property due diligence/research and other miscellaneous administrative duties   *<br/>*Mandatory Requirements  Experience building websites using Wordpress.  Ability to multi-task and manage shifting priorities and deadlines, with attention to detail and an ability to work both independently and in a team environment   Ability to effectively handle multiple projects simultaneously in a fast-paced environment   Positive attitude and willingness to learn   A high degree of integrity, excellent communication skills and takes initiative   *<br/>*Preferred Skills  WordPress plugins   *<br/>*Highly Desired  Real Estate Company, Title Company, Construction Company as previous work or volunteer experience   A passion to work with the Affordable Housing Community   *  *  This is a non paid internship with frequent bonuses and commission compensation for top performers.   *  Job Types: Internship, Contract, Commission  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Benefits:  Flexible schedule  Professional development assistance   Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay  Commission pay   Experience:  WordPress: 1 year (Required)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  Pay  College Credit   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity  High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment  

   Job Description      CACI helps the Air Force Research Laboratory explore, prototype, and demonstrate new technologies, enabling the Air Force to maintain its technological advantage. We are seeking a  full stack web application development intern  to help us research and develop web applications for cyber operations planning and management.   As a full-stack web application developer, you will:   Work closely with our customers to design and implement frontend and backend software for a complex interactive web application   Support design of the client- and server-side software architectures   Develop and manage backend databases   Write automated tests and user interface tests to support automated application testing   Build frontend features according to the principles of progressive enhancement and responsive design   Apply your HTML / CSS / JavaScript programming skills to solving complex data management problems   Write technical documentation   <br> Additional technologies you will use may include:   Server-side programming environments, particularly Java or Node.js and frameworks like Express   Frontend frameworks like Angular, React, or in some cases none at all   SVG, Canvas, WebGL or other web-based graphics programming environments   Automated testing tools like Mocha, Ava, JUnit, Selenium, or others   Databases like PostgreSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, etc   SCM and issue tracking tools like Git, GitLab, Jira, etc   <br> You&rsquo;ll Bring These Qualifications:   Able to work in an office environment, including using computers for long periods of time and communicating with others face-to-face, by telephone, email, or instant messaging   Be enrolled in a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s degree program in the field of computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering, video game development, or related field   Desire to learn on the job   <br> These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:   Able to work in-person at our offices in Rome, NY   <br> What We Can Offer You:   We&rsquo;ve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.   Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.   We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.   We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nation&rsquo;s highest priorities.   For over 55 years, the principles of CACI&rsquo;s unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.    inrn2      Job Location    US-Rome-NY-UTICA <br>    CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities. 

 Work with maintenance department on electrical projects  Tooling projects  New Product Development projects  Machine building and wiring projects  Works from any of the following: specifications, diagrams, sketches, technical manuals, models, original designs or verbal instructions.  Assist and observe electrical/pneumatic devices in operation and determine fixes  Light machine shop responsibilities  Bachelor's degree in Mechanical or Electrical Engineering or currently enrolled and working on Bachelor's in Mechanical or Electrical Engineering  Industry experience preferred  Adept at interpreting engineering drawings  Experience wtih Microsoft office suite (Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Outlook)  CAD experience a must  Maintain strict confidentiality   Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Front End Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Social Media Specialist Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

  The Organization:    Founded in 1846 to care for the children and widows of sailors in the Port of New York, Seamen's Society was one of the first organizations, in the US, to care for abandoned children in family settings, rather than institutions. Today, Seamen's Society for Children and Families is a comprehensive $23 million nonprofit organization that offers foster care and adoption services, mental and behavioral health care services, prevention/family stabilization services, domestic violence intervention and counseling services, health home care management services, education financial support, and a youth tutoring program. The agency's nearly 200 professionals serve over 1,100 children and 800 families in New York City.   Intership Summary : The IT intern will be responsible for a variety of projects and support work, which may include troubleshooting complex technical issues, administration of various infrastructure-level systems, and automation and efficiency improvements. Specific projects will be matched to a candidate’s interests and experience; sample projects include working alongside our engineering team to migrate the Agency server Infrastructure platform to the cloud via Microsoft Azure.   Selected candidates can expect:    Gaining real-life experience working in an IT business environment  Being given meaningful work assignments and challenging projects where others are relying on you to deliver results  Learning new relevant technologies  Working in a supportive, friendly work culture  Opportunities to share your opinion, ideas, and your learnings with IT business leaders and team members  Networking with full-time employees through various planned events and activities that will provide exposure to other facets of the Company outside of IT  Mentorship with seasoned IT, and business executives  Partnerships with other departments within the Company to gain a greater understanding of various roles in the Agency    Duties during Intership:    Provide phone and email technical support for end-users to resolve any hardware or software issues  Set up desktop and laptops for users  Support and troubleshoot workstations, servers, and network-related issues  Perform systems administration for Office 365, Windows Servers, and workstations across multiple sites  Escalate client issues through the proper channels  Manage Tickets according to defined case impact and priority  Maintain client security standards and confidentiality of information  Document support issues and all resolution steps in a ticketing system  Update cases and communicate with clients as required until the issue is closed    Who we are looking for:    Ideal candidates will have a dedicated interest in both building technology and helping others use it effectively. They will successfully combine superb research and analytical skills to resolve unfamiliar problems and advance challenging work.  Applicants should have a basic knowledge of the Microsoft Windows enterprise environment and standard applications, and a demonstrated interest in improving process and technology. Familiarity with general systems administration, a Linux environment, and experience with Python, PowerShell, and/or other scripting languages is a plus.  Excellent interpersonal, communication and organizational skills are critical, as the role involves working with colleagues across a diverse set of backgrounds, experiences, and projects.  In keeping with our Agency’s culture and the ever-changing nature of our work, we are more interested in talent, curiosity, and motivation as demonstrated by an impressive history of achievement than we are in any skill or experience.    Qualifications/Requirements :  Currently pursuing or recently completed a bachelor’s degree or equivalent from an accredited university in Computer Information Systems or a related concentration  Experience providing excellent customer service and professionalism  Excellent written / verbal communication, problem-solving, and analytical skills  Strong judgment, issues management, and problem-solving techniques  Strong presentation, time management, and prioritization skills  Must be able to manage individual workload  Must be a strong team player  Must possess a strong sense of ownership with client relationships   Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  Windows: 3 years (Preferred)  Customer Service: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  One location   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   Company's website:  seamenssociety.org   Work Remotely:  No  

 COMPANY DESCRIPTION: <br> Freeport Metrics (FM) is a 10-year old American-Polish IT consulting firm that collaborates with its corporate clients to invent and build B2B digital products that will impact the future. We have the creative talent to imagine and the technical skills to deliver. If you love ambitious projects, you're reliable, you keep a pragmatic attitude and always stay positive, FM it's just a perfect workplace for you! <br><br> POSITION SUMMARY: <br> We’re looking for a fresh mind with excellent communication and analytical skills who will participate in creation of a long-term value for Freeport Metrics. In this role you will work with experienced business professionals in an English speaking environment. <br><br> ESSENTIALS: <br> Primary location: Working Remotely  Actual location: Portland, Maine (100% of our past and forecasted future sales in USA)  Employment: full-time/part-time min 32h per week  Project industry: Software development for HealthTech, FinTech, and FoodTech industries  Company size: 40+   WHAT YOU’LL DO: <br> Contact potential clients in US through cold calls and emails  Set up calls between (prospective) clients and Business Development Managers  Research organizations and individuals online to identify new leads and potential new markets  Identify client needs and suggest appropriate services  Proactively seek new business opportunities in the market  Present our company to potential clients  Support Business Development Manager in his duties   WHAT YOU'LL NEED: <br> Independent quick learner with strong initiative and problem solving skills  Excellent communication and negotiation skills  Familiarity with MS Excel (analyzing spreadsheets and charts)  A superior personal character and work ethic  Available min. 32h per week   NICE-TO-HAVES: <br> Experience with CRM software (e.g. Pipedrive)  Understanding of sales performance metrics  Experience as a Business Development Representative or similar role  Hands-on experience with multiple sales techniques (including cold calls)  BSc degree in Marketing, Business Administration or relevant field  International work or academic experience  Active participation in student organisations or science clubs   WHAT WE OFFER: <br> 1-on-1 job training provided by an experienced Business Development Manager from US and Poland  Collaboration with skilled, smart, international co-workers and clients  Flexible, comfortable, friendly and professional work culture  Annual education & training stipend  Realistic, collaborative approach to planning our work allowing for work-life balance   Interested? Don’t wait and apply directly to the role via application form. <br><br> The recruitment process will consist of a combination of these steps: <br><br> CV/resume review  phone interview  on-site interviews   The Administrator of your personal data is Freeport Metrics Sp. z o. o., with registered office at Młynarska 7, 01-205 Warszawa. Your data is processed for the purpose of the current recruitment process. Providing data is voluntary but necessary for this purpose. Processing your data is lawful because it is necessary in order to take steps at the request of the data subject prior to entering into a contract (article 6 point 1b of Regulation EU 2016/679 - GDPR). Your personal data will be deleted when the current recruitment process is finished, unless a separate consent is provided below. If the consent is provided, your personal data will be stored for a period of one year. You have the right to access, correct, modify, update, rectify, request for the transfer or deletion of data, withdrawal of consent or objection.

     Internship &quot;PHP and AJAX Delevoper&quot; 

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Virtual CNN Digital UX Research Intern &ndash; Summer 2021 </h1> Location  New York, New York   Business:  Turner   Position Type:  Intern  Job ID  180747BR   Virtual   CNN Digital UX Research   Intern   &ndash; Summer 2021 <br><br> The CNN Story <br> We are the now and the next. The power behind the people building the future. We are born from the spirit of innovation. We are created from the idea that people around the world want more, need more, deserve more. We are the home of the global digital revolution. We are CNN.<br>  <br> See what it&rsquo;s like to work at CNN!  Follow us on Instagram, Twitter and Facebook.<br>    The Job <br> The CNN Digital UX Research Intern will work on research projects that envision new businesses and revenue streams for CNN. Working in a startup environment, the research intern will use quantitative and/or qualitative methods to study new digital experiences that will attract and engage new audiences and redefine the current landscape. We are looking for individuals who will design and execute studies that address both user behavior and attitudes, using the right methodology for the right question.<br><br> The Daily <br>  The UX Research Intern will plan and conduct qualitative and/or quantitative user research, partnering with UX designers, product leads and other stakeholders on specific projects.   Own the research process from screening participants and defining test plans to analyzing data and synthesizing result in a fast-paced environment.   Conduct competitive/market analysis to identify audience segments and develop user journeys that reflect the needs and pain points of those segments   Explore insights about users through a variety of methods whether it be surveys, interviews, data analysis, usability studies, diary studies, and ethnographic observation, or a new method.   Effectively communicate methodologies and be able to take a variety of inputs including analytics, survey results, user behavior, and other data to craft actionable and unbiased recommendations.   Must be comfortable in a fast-moving collaborative organization.  <br>  The Essentials <br>  2 or more years of college study in UX research, media research or user experience design.   Prior internship work as a UX researcher or research analyst preferred   Background in Human Computer Interaction, Information Science, Psychology or Social Sciences preferred   Proficient in Excel and willing to learn usability study software, and/or statistical research software.   Passionate about research methodology in general. Good understanding of statistics and analytics.   Strong problem-solving aptitude and a natural curiosity for how experiences come together.  <br>  The Perks <br>  An opportunity to work with a great team that is passionate about the same thing you are!   Networking opportunities to meet people that you&rsquo;d like to know!   A speaker series that introduces you to cool executives and what they do for the best brands!   Part of the WarnerMedia family of powerhouse brands.  <br> The Summer 2021 program dates are June 7th through August 13th. The internship will be a full remote/virtual experience. Most internships will provide a company owned laptop for the duration of the internship program. Interns are paid a competitive wage based on bureau location and relocation is not provided as the program is fully remote/virtual. Participation in the internship program is reserved for students who are currently enrolled in college. Most positions are targeted to upperclassmen and graduate students. Please note that CNN Summer 2021 intern postings may be taken down as soon as we receive an extensive pool of applicants per role. Please submit your application as soon as possible.<br><br> Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers. Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.

 Do you love User Experience, User Interaction Design, and crafting user journeys? Do you want to be a part of an organization with a social mission?  We’re looking for someone who can roll up their sleeves and work closely with our founding team and user groups to create and user test wireframes. Once we’ve confirmed with our users that we’ve ‘nailed it’ our developers will then code those wireframes into the product.  We’re looking for an emerging UX/UI Designer or Product Manager who wants to take what they’ve learned in school and put it to use for a real world company.  Please note this internship is for course credit. We’ll do our best to make sure that you gain valuable skills and experiences and support you in going after whatever you’d like next (introducing you to people, providing strong references, etc.).  If you’re interested, please send a resume and portfolio to the email address provided.  Responsibilities: Develop behavioral specifications, personas and wireframes for product features;  Act as the bridge between the business/product team and development team to translate requirements into tangible visual UI representations  Identify typography, iconography and visuals to support the development process  Follow lean UX principles and user centered design to develop a user-friendly product  Define and maintain a unified style-guide across all user facing interfaces  Skills: Wireframing, Visual Design, Storyboarding, Requirements Specification, Prototyping, Familiarity with tools like Figma, Sketch, Illustrator, Photoshop, or any other rapid prototyping tools  An added plus is experience with basic HTML and CSS  Contract length: 3 months  Part-time hours: 20 per week  Expected start date: 2021-02-01  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  UI: 1 year (Preferred)  UX: 1 year (Preferred)  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Front End Web Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

     Start Here, Go Anywhere! Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world? <br><br> During your internship at Arup, you&rsquo;ll have the chance to work with some of the most highly respected engineers and specialists in the world. You&rsquo;ll also get the opportunity to work on exciting and significant projects, delivering quality work that has a positive and lasting influence on the community and the environment.<br><br> Responsibilities of this specific role will include, but not be limited to the following: <br><br> System load calculations to establish equipment size   Calculations for designing specific piping systems for a variety of projects   Report writing: writing summaries of the calculation methodologies employed   Attend meetings and communicate with clients to establish their needs and discuss design issues with them.   Coordinate work with engineers of other disciplines/companies.   Incorporate sustainable design methods in buildings.  Prepare drawings detailing the systems designed. System design calculations.   Select equipment for use in building systems.   Construction administration &ndash; Site visits, submittal reviews   <br> Qualifications  <br><br> Required: <br>

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Developer Shopify Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, front-end developer, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

     Location:  Big Flats, NY, US, 14814    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43305 <br>   Corning is one of the world's leading innovators in materials science, with a 166-year track record of life-changing inventions. Corning applies its unparalleled expertise in glass science, ceramics science, and optical physics, along with its deep manufacturing and engineering capabilities, to develop category-defining products that transform industries and enhance people's lives. Corning Valor&trade; Glass is an example of a life-changing innovation purpose-built to store and protect injectable medicines. Corning is also a global leader in pharmaceutical tubing, manufacturing a variety of clear and amber glass tubing that is converted by our customers into vials, cartridges, ampules and syringes. <br>    Scope  of  Position:   In this role, you will provide engineering support for job classifications that engage in research and/or product development in more than one engineering discipline within the Engineering/Manufacturing job family. We look for you to work on assignments that are complex in nature where considerable judgment and initiative are required in resolving problems and making recommendations. We also look for you to figure out methods and procedures on new assignments and may provide guidance to other personnel.<br>     Day to Day Responsibilities:    Work will include project and process activities.   Provide mechanical solutions to equipment, safety, and/or process challenges.   Applicants should have the ability to work in a team-based environment and be able to participate as an individual contributor.   Work under the direction of an engineer to: o Become familiar with manufacturing equipment and processes.   Develop design concepts and drawings in CAD.   Work with vendors for component fabrication and cost reduction opportunities.   Assist in assembly of equipment.   Debut and solve problems on equipment. o Build prototype models and conduct experiments.   Support equipment debug and troubleshooting operations.   Support production and job changes on various lines throughout the plant.<br>      Travel  Requirements:   Less than 10%.  <br>    Hours  of  work/work  schedule/flex-time:   Summer internship start: 5/28/2021  Monday &ndash; Friday, standard business hours.  <br>    Required Education:   Pending Sophomore, Junior or Senior in an undergraduate program in a Mechanical Engineering or Engineering Technology major.   Minimum GPA of 3.0.<br>      Required Skills:    Ability to create and interpret mechanical drawings and schematics.   Knowledge of CAD programs (SolidWorks preferred).   Proficiency in Microsoft Office programs.   Ability to manage multiple projects/tasks.  <br>    Desired Experience / Qualifications / Skills:    Prior manufacturing or mechanical internship or experiences.  Familiarity with mechanical components and machining methods.   Basic statistical understanding.   Experience dealing with suppliers and other external partners.  <br>    Soft Skills:    Creative and technically curious.   Strong problem solving and decision-making skills.   Results oriented and high commitment level.   Effective communication &amp; presentation skills (verbal and written).   Ability to work on diverse project teams.   Ability to build new business relationships.<br>     This position does not support immigration sponsorship.   We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status.  We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Elmira 

 Be a part of a dynamic and diverse team that engineers large-scale, complex and resilient technology solutions that drive our global business. You'll help build and optimize digital applications and systems that support millions of customers, clients and employees worldwide.  When you work at JPMorgan Chase, you're not just working at a global financial institution. You're an integral part of one of the world's biggest tech companies. In 16 strategic technology locations worldwide, our team of more than 50,000 technologists design, build and deploy everything from enterprise technology initiatives to big data and mobile solutions, as well as innovations in electronic payments, cybersecurity, machine learning and cloud development. As a firm, we're partnering with FinTech and Silicon Valley tech firms to deliver cutting-edge solutions to our clients and customers. Our $10.8 billion annual investment in technology enables us to hire people to create innovative solutions that will not only transform the financial services industry, but also change the world.    What to expect  <br> Joining our Software Engineer Internship means you will:<br><br>  Begin with an induction covering our tech strategies, products and systems, as well as an overview of our technology community. <br>  Dive head-first and gain hands-on experience creating innovative solutions that make a difference for our customers, clients and employees. <br>  Work on agile teams with peers and experienced software engineers to grow your skills, share ideas and innovate with our technology community all over the world. <br>  Gain deeper insight into what it means to work here through networking events, senior speaker sessions and peer-mentorship programs.<br><br>  <br> At the end of the summer, top performers may receive the opportunity to join us for a full-time role upon graduation.  Locations you may join:<br><br>  Chicago, IL   Columbus, OH   Wilmington, DE   New York Metro, NY   Plano, TX   San Francisco, CA   Seattle, WA   Tampa, FL   <br> You will be given the opportunity to select up to three location preferences on your application. Potential placement could include any of our offices within the city's metropolitan area.   About you    If you're ready to put your passion for technology to work in a way that makes a real difference, you'll find your place in our Software Engineer Internship.   Key skills include:<br><br>  Computer Science and/or Engineering majors are preferred, while other majors may be considered   Pursuing a B.A., B.S. or 5th year M.A. or M.S. with expected graduation of August 2021 through June 2023 or participating in a JPMorgan Chase-sponsored training program   A well-rounded academic background with a preferred minimum cumulative GPA of 3.2 (or prior participation in a JPMorgan Chase-sponsored training program   Foundational knowledge of programming languages (e.g., Python, Javascript, Java, C++, C#), databases, data structures, and algorithms   Strong interpersonal and communication skills   Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, collaborative environment   Relevant internship experience and/or leadership in school or community organizations   <br> This role is a pipeline to our full-time Software Engineer Program, which is not eligible for employer immigration sponsorship. If you will require employer immigration sponsorship after completing your degree, you do not meet the basic requirements of this summer internship role.   Join us    At JPMorgan Chase, we're creating positive change for the diverse communities we serve. We do this by championing your innovative ideas through a supportive culture that helps you every step of the way as you build your career.   We value the unique skills of every employee, and we're building a technology organization that thrives on diversity. We encourage professional growth and career development, and offer competitive benefits and compensation. If you're looking to build your career as part of a global technology team tackling big challenges that impact the lives of people and companies all around the world, we want to meet you.    What's Next?    Help us learn about you by submitting a complete and thoughtful application, which includes your resume. Your application and resume is a way for us to initially get to know you, so it's important to complete all relevant application questions so we have as much information about you as possible.   To get started, enter your email address. Your email address will be used to create and maintain your profile. If you are a current JPMC employee, use your JPMC email address to apply for jobs internally. Do not use an email address with &quot;.edu&quot; extension as doing so could result in delays receiving updates regarding your candidacy.   After you confirm your application, we will review it to determine whether you meet certain required qualifications.   If you are advanced to the next step of the process, you'll receive an email invitation to complete a series of 12 games through the pymetrics platform. pymetrics will allow you to showcase your potential beyond what you tell us in your resume and application form. It's an additional data point that helps us gain a better understanding of who you are as an individual. It should take no longer than 25-35 minutes to complete. If you have already completed the pymetrics games, you will have the opportunity to submit your gameplay results for this specific application without having to replay the games.   Following completion of pymetrics, you'll receive another email invitation to complete a coding challenge and video interview, powered by HireVue. This is your opportunity to further bring your resume to life and showcase your experience for our recruiting team and hiring managers.   After completing your coding challenge and video interview, you will be invited to complete a short survey where you will have the opportunity to specify which location you are most interested in.   pymetrics, HireVue and a completed survey are required, and your application will not be considered for further review until you have completed them. We strongly encourage that you apply and complete these required elements as soon as possible, since programs will close as positions are filled.   JPMorgan Chase is committed to creating an inclusive work environment that respects all people for their unique skills, backgrounds and professional experiences. We strive to hire qualified, diverse candidates, and we will provide reasonable accommodations for known disabilities.   Visit jpmorganchase.com/careers for upcoming events, career advice, our locations and more.JPMorgan Chase &amp; Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.   We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.   Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans 

  Our commitment to excellence doesn&rsquo;t stop with our technology, it extends to the people we hire. When you join Cree, you&rsquo;ll find yourself immersed in a culture similar to any startup environment &ndash; fast decision making, passionate people and constant innovation.    What can Cree|Wolfspeed do for you?    CreeWolfspeed offers an extensive 12-week internship program that aligns with our new hiring model and talent development strategy. Students a part of our internship program, will develop knowledge and skills across their areas of interest while gaining insight into unit operations. Additionally, you will have the ability to apply academic concepts to real&ndash;world business challenges. An intern can be a key strategic contributor from the ground up.    What can you do for Cree|Wolfspeed?    Bring enthusiasm, creativity, and an open-mind to help strengthen our culture and build on our success   Bring a fresh perspective to the challenges we face   Learn from an experienced team   Deepen your understanding of classroom concepts   Gain real-world experience     What you need for success:    Enrollment in an accredited collegiate program   Maintains a 3.0 GPA or above   Excellent communication skills   Relevant Experience   Ability to work without sponsorship now or in the future      Who You&rsquo;ll Work With    Opportunities in this internship may include:   This person will work with the Facilities Engineering team located in our NY facility. With the numerous projects currently going on at Cree, this person will work on our on-going growth projects to include instruments and controls, waste water, capacity improvements, exhaust capacity modeling, electrical and mechanical infrastructure improvements, construction projects, and tool install.   This is a great opportunity for a well-rounded engineer to take on projects that are the backbone of the organization.      Why Cree|Wolfspeed    At Cree|Wolfspeed, we&rsquo;ve spent more than 30 years developing industry firsts as a leader in wide bandgap semiconductor technology. Not familiar with all of our products? That is because we are a part of the invisible revolution; if we do our job right you will never know we were there. Our products make impossible possible like our LEDs that power cities to our Silicon Carbide (SiC) and Gallium Nitride (GaN) components that power electric vehicles, solar energy, telecommunications and industrial, military and aerospace solutions.<br>    We believe in enabling the world to do more with less. That&rsquo;s why we encourage each other to think unconventionally, take ownership and solve real problems. Interested in a career at Cree|Wolfspeed? We want to meet you. Submit your application now.<br>    We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.<br>    This role may require additional duties and/or assignments as designated by management.     We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. 

   The position  <br>    We are looking for a Full Stack Developer Intern who is eager to gain experience and willing to learn engineering best practices and contribute production level code during your internship. <br>    Blanks Financial Solutions is seeking a Full Stack Engineering intern who is passionate about building mobile and desktop web applications. <br>     Roles and responsibilities:  <br>   Work with Product Designers to implement the next generation of Blanks Financial Solutions applications  Build efficient and reusable front-end systems  Identify and address performance bottlenecks  Participate in design and code reviews  Help identify ways to improve and diagnose front-end bugs  Work closely with other engineers on a small development team launching features  Use fit algorithms to find and implement cost-effective solution  Learn how to write small features and deploy them often (continuous delivery)  Write unit tests and assist in finding and squashing bugs  Performs various other duties as needed<br>    Hours per week:  <br>   15-20 hours per week<br>       Requirements   High School Diploma, Bachelor's or Master's Degree Program with a focus on programming  A creative problem solver and attend to detail  Ability to write high-performance, reusable Javascript , and C# code  Experience with React  Experience developing rich applications with HTML/CSS/JS  Skilled in language such as JAVA, Javascript , C++ et.al  Passion for optimizing performance  Build customizable CRM<br>       Benefits     Compensation:  <br>    This internship is a part-time (20-25 hours/week) position with Flexible pay. Times will have dependency on the chosen individual's schedule. We will provide any documentation for the student to receive school credit. Upon completion of assignment, a full time role with the company including bonuses and benefits. 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Video Edit/Web Design/Photo Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Video editing: 1 year (Preferred)  Photo editing: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Website Designer Creator Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 Overview:     Advanced Summer Help - Intern - Summer 2021 

  Explore the possibilities across our global house of brands.  Defined by inclusivity rather than exclusivity, Tapestry embraces the exploration of individuality and invests in helping you grow personally and professionally. Every individual in our global house has the opportunity to make an impact, learn and be part of our growing and unique story.  At Tapestry, we have the freedom to express ourselves and run with our best ideas across Coach, Kate Spade New York, and Stuart Weitzman. We share a profound belief in both our individual and collective potential, and know that with hard work and dedication, anything is possible.    Tapestry will be offering internship opportunities which will provide interns the opportunity to develop critical skillsets and gain hands-on experience at our house of modern luxury lifestyle brands.  <br>    The 2021 program will run from June 1  st   &ndash; August 6  th  . Paid internship opportunities will be available at each of our brands (Coach, kate spade, Stuart Weitzman) and within Tapestry functional groups.<br>      Here&rsquo;s what you can expect from our internship recruitment process:   Application Deadline - January 11th.   Video Submissions - Should your application be selected for further consideration, you will receive an email prompt for the video submission portion of the application in mid to late-January.  Final Interviews - Our teams will be selecting final candidates for phone or video interviews in early to mid-February depending on candidate availability.  Internship Offers - Delivered in early March.<br>      Job Title:  Summer IT &amp; Data Science Internships <br>    Primary Purpose:  The successful individual will leverage their proficiency in IT, Data Science and/or Analytics to work within the Tapestry corporate team.* <br>   Our Internship recruiting team will be selecting candidates based on relevant skillsets that could be applicable to internship opportunities within the following departments: Information Security, eCommerce Solutions, Commerce Solutions, Tech Services, Data Labs/Analytics.  <br>    The accomplished individual may possess...    Excellent written and oral communication skills  The path to a BA/BS degree with a focus in Computer Science, Cyber Security, or related field.   The path to a BA/BS degree in Media Science, Economics, Statistics, Engineering, Math or other quantitative field (or equivalent practical experience).  Familiarity with analytics (media industry, social, digital marketing).  In-depth knowledge of Windows, Mac and Linux operating systems   Strong proficiency in LAN/WAN and WiFi/mobile technology   Understanding of networking hierarchy and protocols   Basic concepts of computer triage and forensics<br>      An outstanding professional may have...    Experience with HTML/CSS, Javascript/JQuery, Git/Github  Routing, Switching, Firewalling knowledge   Knowledge of WiFi networks, security measures, threat countermeasures  In-depth understanding of how the Internet works (DNS, TCP/IP, etc.)  In-depth understanding of secure Internet communication (IPSEC, VPN, encryption, etc.)  Strong understanding of transport technologies (T1, T3, MPLS, Fiber, Ethernet, DSL, 4G, etc.)    Our Competencies for All Employees    Drive for Results:  Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.   Customer Focus:  Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.   Creativity : Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.   Interpersonal Savvy : Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.   Learning on the Fly:  Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.   Perseverance : Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.   Dealing with Ambiguity : Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn&rsquo;t upset when things are up in the air; doesn&rsquo;t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.    Our Competencies for All People Managers    Strategic Agility : Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.   Building Effective Teams : Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale and spirit in their team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.   Managerial Courage : Doesn&rsquo;t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and &ldquo;actionable&rdquo; positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.  <br>   Tapestry, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and we pride ourselves on hiring and developing the best people. All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant&rsquo;s or employee&rsquo;s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration. These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law. #LI-KS1 Visit Tapestry, Inc. at http://www.tapestry.com/ 

  The Opportunity   ~~~~<br/>** Design, execute and fine-tune Creative Graphic Design for our award-winning SaveAway® platform that empowers our users and partners harness our patented product offerings, and unputdownably communicates not just why it is different but the opposite of everything in the market today (which serve to exacerbate the debt crisis) in relentlessly furthering their financial wellness and prosperity  ** Unique opportunity to be part of launching our core SaveAway® app. with world-class visual design that makes it a joy and delight both for users and friends+family they are intuitively able to invite  ** Design and execute a truly seamless Design by mapping out the multi-channel triggers and social nudges that further the customer journey from the moment of account-creation to completed/repeat transactions  ** Lead graphic design to further user testing, engagement, and acquisition  ** Ensure continuity by building on previous UX Design research.  ** Design for launch of our referral program, gamification and virality in signing up new users  ** Ensure Graphic Design accelerates awareness, consideration, and on-boarding of New Users and Partners  ** Examine user feedback, personas, and data to isolate root-causes of where users may be getting stuck in the customer-journey; Develop and implement Visual Design that empower users to get unstuck  ** Relentlessly test, learn, and iterate to arrive at Graphic Design that demonstrate deep empathy in solving the problems of our users and partners while enabling us to 'blitzscale' in delivering record growth  ** Study design briefs and determine requirements; Conceptualize visuals based on requirements  ** Develop illustrations, logos and other designs using software or by hand; Use the appropriate colors and layouts for each graphic to be used for a variety of purposes on our site, app, social postings / media content  ** Work with copywriters and creative director to produce final design; Test graphics across various media; Amend designs after feedback<br/>** Ensure final graphics and layouts are visually appealing and on-brand  ** Demonstrate energy, initiative, resolve, persistence, and creativity to solve for roadblocks and "getting things done” to hit imminent milestones  ** Design in ways that creates champions in the community to ensure Inspirave's solutions are embraced and adopted, with its objective merits becoming manifest for what it is -- An unstoppable force of good to further financial wellness, social mobility, and human potential  ~~~~   REQUIREMENTS   ~~~~  - Formal training, or, professional experience, or, self-taught in Visual and Graphic Design with passion to do nothing short of your very best to become a master of the craft  - Experience and/or high level of energy and excitement in development and execution of Visual Design that will 'change the game' for retail e-commerce, fintech, financial wellness  - Experience and/or interest for the important role great Visual Design plays in E-Commerce, Fintech Retail, and in inspiring Users and Partners to better outcomes  - A "Why Not?" entrepreneurial mindset with ability to focus on "getting things done" with milestones and outcomes you yourself will be proudest of  - Passion for visual design for new technology, social posting, media content that are not only innovative but inventive in delivering positive social impact  - Optional background in Zeppelin / Photoshop  - some knowledge of HTML, CSS, Wordpress, Email Tools such as Sendgrid / Mailchimp Interaction design with motion such as Anima and Illustration ability  - Great illustration skills either as a graduate, or pursuit of current studies, or self-taught learnings  - Graphic designing experience: A strong portfolio of illustrations or other graphics preferred<br/>- Familiarity with design software and technologies (such as InDesign, Illustrator, Dreamweaver, Photoshop)  - A keen eye for aesthetics and details  - Degree in Design, Fine Arts or related field is a plus  - Passionate with excellent communication and user engagement skills  - This internship will offer you the opportunity to receive academic credit and experience  ~~~~   About   SaveAway®    ~~~~  Cited by FORBES among top emerging technology organizations empowering all to emerge stronger from the current pandemic, SaveAway® has elicited consistent critical acclaim from leading forums including 'South by Southwest' and named “Top FinTech Forward Company To Watch” by AMERICAN BANKER and BAI. Our social e-commerce platform inspires people to amplify their savings and afford big purchase goals for life’s special moments. Our patented technology combines the best savings from merchants and banks, with support from friends and family to place big purchases within reach, without debt. This is informed by the SaveAway® Leadership Team’s track-record across retail, e-commerce, and financial technology, with SaveAway® most recently named among the Top for "Startup of The Year" by the 'Consumer Technology Association' and Tech.Co. At a time when 30% of purchases are regretted and half of Americans are living paycheck-to-paycheck, SaveAway® impact has elicited critical acclaim. We have been featured in leading forums including South by Southwest, EFMA, and Finovate. There is excitement surrounding our ability to financially empower users to make responsible purchase decisions and personalized plans to ‘save more, faster’ until their big purchase-goal is delivered. SaveAway®’s partner merchants and banks are equally distinguishing themselves as socially impactful brands that are realizing the materially significant benefits of new revenue-streams. Together, we are unifying financial and social capital to ensure "no goal is out of reach if you set your mind to it" manifest.  ~~~~   What makes this SaveAway®  opportunity special?   You WILL want -- and have -- the real opportunity to...  Knock-it-out-of-the-park not just every other week or even every other day, but every single day you come to work in the development and launch of InSpirAVE's critically acclaimed and socially impactful technology platform development to engage hundreds of thousands of new users with InSpirAVE   One constant across our Visual / Graphic Design, creative and growth roles is the opportunity to work directly with the Leadership Team – who have decades of experience at the top of their craft -- but perhaps even more importantly are committed to personal coaching/mentoring to ensure your personal success as much as that of Inspirave's   Solve some of the most intellectually stimulating problems in technology and commerce that is backed by patent issued and those published not just in this country but across the globe   Have not just another job but a personal learning & growth opportunity of a lifetime by riding a rocket-ship that has elicited critical acclaim across the industry as much as worldwide   Leave an impact with a real sense of personal as much as professional accomplishment in shipping a product that in no uncertain terms makes the world a better place by keeping people out of the debt-trap and realize their fullest potential...   IF the above are important to you THEN by all means... join our movement to #SaveMoreFaster #ForWhatMatters  Job Types: Full-time, Internship  Benefits:  Employee discount  Flexible schedule  Referral program   Schedule:  Monday to Friday   COVID-19 considerations:<br/>With SaveAway® recognized among leading ventures empowering all emerge stronger from the pandemic, the very same is true for our team including any flexibility (e.g., working remotely) that will enable you to do nothing short of your very best work.  Experience:  Adobe Illustrator: 1 year (Preferred)  Figma: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  One location  Fully Remote   Company's website:  http://www.saveaway.net   Company's Facebook page:  https://www.instagram.com/inspirave/   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Front End Developer Associate Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Design Assistant Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, front-end developer, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

 Company Description<br>  As one of the original innovators in lending, credit, fraud, and spend analytics, Verisk Financial integrates one of the industry&rsquo;s largest sets of data to help banks, financial regulators, retailers, and media companies grow their businesses. We combine data with predictive analytics to uncover new consumer and business insights and integrate this data with the most technologically advanced platforms.   Verisk Financial | Argus is a leading provider of intelligence, decision support solutions, and advisory services to financial institutions across the global commerce ecosystem. Our clients include more than 50 top U.S., Canadian, and other international financial organizations, regulators, payment providers, merchants, and media. Argus is the leading source of segment-level portfolio management benchmarking data, analytics, models, and advisory services. We maximize value delivery to clients by combining proprietary data sets, cutting-edge software and analytic tools, domain expertise, and our unique results-oriented approach. Customers worldwide use our services for tailored data management solutions that include business intelligence platforms, profile views, mobile data solutions, enterprise database services, and fraud risk scoring algorithms for marketing, fraud, and risk mitigation. Our clients gain competitive advantage from our exclusive focus on leveraging global best-in-class analytics and methodologies to help achieve their business and regulatory objectives. To learn more about Argus please visit us at: www.argusinformation.com. We are proud to be a part of the Verisk family of companies!   At the heart of what we do is help clients manage risk. Verisk (Nasdaq: VRSK) provides data and insights to our customers in insurance, energy and the financial services markets so they can make faster and more informed decisions.   Our global team uses AI, machine learning, automation, and other emerging technologies to collect and analyze billions of records. We provide advanced decision-support to prevent credit, lending, and cyber risks. In addition, we monitor and advise companies on complex global matters such as climate change, catastrophes, and geopolitical issues.   But why we do our work is what sets us apart. It stems from a commitment to making the world better, safer and stronger.   It&rsquo;s the reason Verisk is part of the UN Global Compact sustainability initiative. It&rsquo;s why we made a commitment to balancing 100 percent of our carbon emissions. It&rsquo;s the aim of our &ldquo;returnship&rdquo; program for experienced professionals rejoining the workforce after time away. And, it&rsquo;s what drives our annual Innovation Day, where we identify our next first-to-market innovations to solve our customers&rsquo; problems.   At its core, Verisk uses data to minimize risk and maximize value. But far bigger, is why we do what we do.   At Verisk you can build an exciting career with meaningful work; create positive and lasting impact on business; and find the support, coaching, and training you need to advance your career. We&rsquo;ve been recognized by Forbes as a World&rsquo;s Best Employer and a Best Employer for Women, testaments to our culture of engagement and the value we place on an inclusive and diverse workforce. 

Employees of ABI work on a wide range of construction and safety inspection projects within the Greater New York area. We offer full and part-time employment, health insurance, holiday, vacation and merit bonuses. In addition, our employees receive technical support training and certification in the latest home inspection standards. <br>   ABI is offering internships to college undergraduates pursuing careers in civil environmental engineering, construction management, sustainable urban planning and architecture. Interns acquire experience in the trade of home inspection and building inspection, including electrical and construction standards. Moreover, we cover safety inspection, aspects of research and development, municipal searches, environmental monitoring and testing services. While the work is challenging, the atmosphere is low stress. Listen to our monthly radio show on WBAI. Internship may qualify for class credits pending letter from professor/advisor. Subway fare / stipend available.  Call 718-265-8191 or email: Alvin@accuratebuilding.com 

 Position Overview:   Come join a company that is investing and expanding! Novelis is looking for Juniors and Seniors who are interested in an  Electrical Engineer  Internship or Co Op beginning on or around May 20th.

DoorDash is building the world's most reliable on-demand, logistics engine for delivery! We're looking for experienced engineers to join our fast-growing engineering team to help us develop a 24x7, global infrastructure system that powers DoorDash’s three-sided marketplace of consumers, merchants, and dashers. <br>At DoorDash, our product engineers implement and operate technological solutions to improve the experiences of our merchants, dashers, and consumers. From creating beautiful, user-friendly flows to crafting scalable backend architectures, we strive to deliver reliant, performant technology that delights our customers. <br>What You’ll Do Intern programming - Past examples include Lunch and Learns with our executive members, game nights, movie nights, intern offsites, etc Present your summer learnings during Demo Day at the end of the internship Develop, maintain and ship technical elements with the support of your mentor, manager, and team members Act on feedback, coaching, and mentorship from your mentor, and team members Actively learn about the elements to which you contribute Make a direct impact on our business by collaborating with your team to solve problems for our customers <br> Here are some examples of past intern projects:  Building Reliable Workflows: Cadence as a Fallback for Event-Driven Processing Scaling DoorDash’s Geospatial Innovation with a Location-Based Delivery Simulator My Engineering Internship Experience at DoorDas <br>Qualifications B.S., M.S., or PhD. in Computer Science graduating in Winter 2021 or Spring 2022 Experience working with databases (e.g. SQL) Solid understanding of algorithms and data structures Experience working with at least one object-oriented programming language (e.g. Python, Java, Kotlin, etc) Experience writing clean code, working with version control, and unit testing <br>Nice to haves At least 1 previous internship or equivalent practical experience Able to analyze and improve efficiency, scalability, and stability of various systems Excited to develop, release and run large-scale web applications Experience with solutions for systems monitoring, live deployments and continuous integration Experience with real-time technology problems Experience working with service oriented architecture, writing APIs, and designing systems <br><br> Why You’ll Love Working at DoorDash We are leaders - Leadership is not limited to our management team. It’s something everyone at DoorDash embraces and embodies. We are doers - We believe the only way to predict the future is to build it. Creating solutions that will lead our company and our industry is what we do -- on every project, every day. We are learners - We’re not afraid to dig in and uncover the truth, even if it’s scary or inconvenient. Everyone here is continually learning on the job, no matter if we’ve been in a role for one year or one minute. We are customer obsessed - Our mission is to grow and empower local economies. We are committed to our customers, merchants, and dashers and believe in connecting people with possibility. We are all DoorDash - The magic of DoorDash is our people, together making our inspiring goals attainable and driving us to greater heights. We offer great compensation packages and comprehensive health benefits. <br>About DoorDash <br>DoorDash is a technology company that connects customers with their favorite local and national businesses in all 50 US states, Canada, and Australia. Founded in 2013, DoorDash empowers merchants to grow their businesses by offering on-demand delivery, data-driven insights, and better in-store efficiency, providing delightful experiences from door to door. By building the last-mile delivery infrastructure for local cities, DoorDash is bringing communities closer, one doorstep at a time. Read more on the DoorDash blog or at www.doordash.com . <br>Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion <br>We’re committed to growing and empowering a more inclusive community within our company, industry, and cities. That’s why we hire and cultivate diverse teams of the best and brightest from all backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives. We believe that true innovation happens when everyone has room at the table and the tools, resources, and opportunity to excel.

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Design Shopify Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

 Description:   Job Title: Electrical Engineering Intern (Hauppauge, NY)     Job Code: AS20202011-53507     Job Location:   Hauppauge, NY     Job Description:    Determine design approaches and parameters   Perform system analysis to determine feasibility of design within time and cost constraints   Utilize modeling tools and equipment to establish operating data, conduct experimental tests, and evaluate results   Select components and equipment based on analysis of specifications and reliability   Perform simulations and present design reviews to peer engineers   Write scripts to control synthesis and build tools     Qualifications:    Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Electrical &amp; Computer Engineering, Materials Engineering, Materials Science Engineering or related field   GPA of 3.0 or greater     Preferred Skills:    Knowledge and/or experience with VHDL, MCM, HFSS, Network, Power, Analog, Antennas, Controls, ENE, RF, Photonics, Modem, EDA, DSP, MATLAB, Communication Systems, FPGA, Aerospace industry or Optical Engineering   Knowledge of Code V and/or Zemax software tools   Excellent communication, technical writing and presentation skills   Knowledge of FRED, Matlab, Python   Knowledge of and/or understanding circuit analysis and operational concepts   Familiarity with various computing environments (LINUX/Windows)  

     The goal of our summer internship program is to expose talented candidates to the projects and environment associated with full-time work in quantitative analysis and software development at the D. E. Shaw group. Interns interact with various trading groups and gain valuable work experience while demonstrating their skills on a variety of real-world projects. Working closely with quants, developers, and other senior staff as mentors, interns can expect an environment conducive to learning. In addition, numerous social events give interns the opportunity to interact with colleagues and learn about the firm as a whole.

  The C&amp;S Companies&rsquo; Internship Program is designed to engage college students in the practical application of a major technical study and to familiarize them with the interactions and requirements of the A/E industry. Internships are designed to introduce and build essential hands-on skills that differ from those attained in the academic arena, and help to enhance the transition from student to professional. Interns are assigned duties that will provide a broad, well-rounded learning experience within their chosen discipline. Internship opportunities are available at most C&amp;S locations.   Position Responsibilities<br> Perform, under close supervision, routine aspects of civil engineering, requiring knowledge and application of principles learned in course of study.   May use computer-assisted engineering software and equipment to perform tasks.   Collect and prepare data for evaluation.   Assist in the coordination of projects from conception (feasibility) through final plan preparations.   Provide support to staff members as needed.  

  WEB DESIGN INTERN (UNPAID)   ROMEO HUNTE is looking for a Web Design Intern r based in NEW YORK CITY! We are searching for bright, highly motivated individuals to maintain and better our company website. This includes video, photos, graphics and audio. You will also work with the team to create product galleries and descriptions. This role will help oversee our shopping newsletter and keep the homepage looking fresh and up to date. An interest in writing, layout, design, and/ or photography will be extremely beneficial.   INTERNSHIP IS UNPAID- SCHOOL CREDIT IS AVAILABLE.    Requirements   Experience with the Adobe Creative Suite   Photoshop   Illustrator   InDesign   Experience with Microsoft office   Basic HTML skills   Experience with Square Space   Graphic design skills   Must own a laptop   Be able to commute to our Brooklyn office   Be 18 years of age or older    Responsibilities and Duties   Develop site navigation and organizing website content   Updating site by adding content and graphics to   Streamlining website navigation for both desktop and mobile   Matining the site appearance   Image resizing, compression, and retouching for website   Adding security precautions to the website   Creating pdf line sheets and content   Creating graphics for website    THIS IS AN UNPAID INTERNSHIP THE ONLY COMPENSATION WE OFFER IS SCHOOL CREDIT.   Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $18.00 - $22.00 per hour  Schedule:  8 hour shift  On call   Experience:  Microsoft Office: 1 year (Preferred)  HTML5: 1 year (Preferred)  Adobe Illustrator: 1 year (Preferred)  Adobe Creative Suite: 1 year (Preferred)  Graphic design: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  One location   Work Remotely:  No  

   Orolia, the world leader in Resilient Positioning, Navigation and Timing (PNT) solutions, always has great opportunities for students to intern with our company and work side by side with our innovative engineers.<br>    <br>  Our Internship Opportunities:  <br>    Orolia is looking for Interns enrolled in a four-year or post-graduate degree program in the following fields:<br>   <br> Electrical Engineering<br> Computer Engineering<br> Computer Science<br> Signal Processing<br> Radio Communications <br>     What you&rsquo;ll be doing:  <br>    Our technology at Orolia is innovative and cutting edge. A typical day could be&hellip; <br>    Working closely with Lead Engineers in in a lab environment designing the latest GPS-based and alternative PNT equipment and software <br>    Testing new products, new features and software releases to ensure our products meet the highest standards and specifications. <br>    Devising test procedures, experiments, test fixtures and software; performing those tests, analyzing the results and generating comprehensive test reports and recommendations. <br>    Analyzing and debugging problem reports and designing fixes <br>    Working with vendors, subcontractors, and customers to understand their needs and applications toward solving problems in deployments <br>    Working in a multi-discipline, multi-cultural environmental with cross-functional teams toward a common design goal. <br>     What does it take to be successful at Orolia? <br>   <br>  Global Collaboration:  We pride ourselves on personal excellence through global collaboration, communication and team achievement! <br>     Fun : We are at our best having fun and we bring the best out of each other. <br>     Innovation : We love to develop and implement creative solutions! <br>     Commitment : We persevere in all situations. <br>     Agility : Our business, strategies and our people are ready to adapt to evolving needs of our markets. <br>     Continuous   Improvement:  We&rsquo;re curious and we always demonstrate the desire to improve results and challenge the status quo. <br>     Why Orolia  ?  <br>    Orolia is an international high-tech company dedicated to improving the safety, compliance and efficiency of its global customers&rsquo; remote operations by providing them business solutions and services based on the most advanced positioning, navigation, timing, sensing, information, and communications technologies. At Orolia, we continuously look to go &ldquo;Beyond the Frontier&rdquo; in everything that we do. As an organization, we strive to be the market leader and look for employees who have the same passion for their personal careers. If you love working in a multicultural environment where being the best is encouraged, Orolia is the employer for you. <br>    Orolia believes that success in the global marketplace requires a variety of perspectives and individual experiences. At Orolia, we understand, appreciate and strive for new and different thoughts and ideas. A high degree of employee involvement, lifelong learning and diversity are permanent items on the agenda throughout the entire organization. <br>    Please note this description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice. <br>    Orolia is an equal opportunity employer who does not discriminate based on race, color, citizenship, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran&rsquo;s status or any protected category. We encourage veterans and people with disabilities to apply. 

   Two Sigma is a financial sciences company, combining data analysis, invention, and rigorous inquiry to help solve the toughest challenges in investment management, insurance technology, securities, private equity, and venture capital.

  Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal&rsquo;s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.  Job Description Summary: At PayPal, we&rsquo;re literally reinventing how the world pays and gets paid. We understand that it&rsquo;s about people. We connect individuals to let them shop, get paid, donate and send money using today&rsquo;s technology with the confidence that comes from the security and control PayPal enables. Are you ready to help us change the world? The world&rsquo;s leading payments company, PayPal, brings together a family of brands that are revolutionizing the way people move money. At PayPal you will be immersed in an amazing community with a vibrant culture that thrives on innovation, collaboration, inclusion, and wellness.  Job Description:   Looking for a career path that combines technical savvy with business perspective? Product Managers at PayPal are data-driven decision makers, building new features and products that touch millions of customers and merchants around the globe. The candidate will perform analysis or mining of data, evangelize the insights drawn from the data analysis and work with developers and designers to define features based on these insights. As a Product Manager Intern, you will be focused on ensuring the aggressive expansion of PayPal&rsquo;s business, helping to explore key opportunities for growth, creating stellar customer experiences and supporting all aspects of the business while partnering with employees from all backgrounds and organizational leaders.      Key Responsibilities :   Think strategically and creatively to gather product and customer insights and help define the Product Vision and Strategy   Understand PayPal&rsquo;s strategic and competitive position and deliver products that are recognized as best in class   Analyze current customer experiences to define friction points and create seamless and effortless experiences   Develop product roadmaps and work with cross-functional teams (business, program managers, product, development, UX, analytics)   Define detailed product requirements, scope, ship, measure features and use rapid cycles to iterate and learn   Drive product development by building end to end solutions with a team of world-class engineers and designers   Build trust and effective relationships with peers/cross-functional teams       Basic Requirements:    Must be pursuing a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s degree in Computer Science, Business or related field from an accredited college or university   Strong analytical and data visualization skills   Knowledge of data analytics and statistics (using SQL, R, Hive, etc.)   Ability to juggle multiple priorities and thrive in fast-paced environments   Strong problem-solving abilities - you can cut through the noise and laser focus on what really matters   Experience working with internet technologies or the payments industry is desirable   Experience with qualitative and quantitative methodologies to understand customers and an ability to explore and structure customers&rsquo; insights   Strong ability to translate product needs to technology and to understand technology   Ability to write scripts or snippets of code preferred   Excellent verbal and written communication skills   Team player with ability to interface and build relations at all levels       Position Location: Varies     We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.  PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Designer Associate Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

  Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal&rsquo;s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.  Job Description Summary: At PayPal, we&rsquo;re literally reinventing how the world pays and gets paid. We understand that it&rsquo;s about people. We connect individuals to let them shop, get paid, donate and send money using today&rsquo;s technology with the confidence that comes from the security and control PayPal enables. Are you ready to help us change the world? The world&rsquo;s leading payments company, PayPal, brings together a family of brands that are revolutionizing the way people move money. At PayPal you will be immersed in an amazing community with a vibrant culture that thrives on innovation, collaboration, inclusion, and wellness.  Job Description:   Looking for a career path that combines technical savvy with business perspective? Product Managers at PayPal are data-driven decision makers, building new features and products that touch millions of customers and merchants around the globe. The candidate will perform analysis or mining of data, evangelize the insights drawn from the data analysis and work with developers and designers to define features based on these insights. As a Product Manager Intern, you will be focused on ensuring the aggressive expansion of PayPal&rsquo;s business, helping to explore key opportunities for growth, creating stellar customer experiences and supporting all aspects of the business while partnering with employees from all backgrounds and organizational leaders.      Key Responsibilities :   Think strategically and creatively to gather product and customer insights and help define the Product Vision and Strategy   Understand PayPal&rsquo;s strategic and competitive position and deliver products that are recognized as best in class   Analyze current customer experiences to define friction points and create seamless and effortless experiences   Develop product roadmaps and work with cross-functional teams (business, program managers, product, development, UX, analytics)   Define detailed product requirements, scope, ship, measure features and use rapid cycles to iterate and learn   Drive product development by building end to end solutions with a team of world-class engineers and designers   Build trust and effective relationships with peers/cross-functional teams       Basic Requirements:    Must be pursuing an MBA degree from an accredited college or university   Strong analytical and data visualization skills   Knowledge of data analytics and statistics (using SQL, R, Hive, etc.)   Ability to juggle multiple priorities and thrive in fast-paced environments   Strong problem-solving abilities - you can cut through the noise and laser focus on what really matters   Experience working with internet technologies or the payments industry is desirable   Experience with qualitative and quantitative methodologies to understand customers and an ability to explore and structure customers&rsquo; insights   Strong ability to translate product needs to technology and to understand technology   Ability to write scripts or snippets of code preferred   Excellent verbal and written communication skills   Team player with ability to interface and build relations at all levels       Position Location: Varies     We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.  PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. 

  Want to spend your summer interning at a company that is consistently rated as one of the best places to work in the country? Is this a rhetorical question?   The Motley Fool is a multimedia financial services company that provides financial solutions for investors through various stock, investing, and personal finance services. We've been on the block for about 26 years and have honed a reputation for producing industry-leading work in a nationally recognized workplace. Our mission is to help the world become happier, smarter, and richer and the backbone supporting this global mission is our top-notch tech team. If you dream of becoming a brilliant and skilled web designer and are ready to work hard on cutting edge technologies alongside awesome coworkers, then step up to the plate, and tell us why you should land a spot among our Foolish ranks. <br>  For eight Foolish weeks as a UX/UI Design &amp; Development Intern, you'll be embedded with the Design and Web Technologies teams that support, build, and maintain our Foolish products and websites. In this internship, you will have hands-on experience working with users and internal teams to investigate existing user mental models and design products that sustainably address our end users' needs. You will gain exposure to the entire UX Design process - from the initial research to design, design testing, as well as the hand off to development! You'll also collaboratively shape what success looks like for the changes you propose. The projects you could work on may be team-level or span our entire tech org. <br>  You'll be challenged and mentored by some of our greatest designers all summer, and in turn, you'll develop the skills it takes to cultivate a user first mindset that will set you apart from your peers. We're excited to open our doors for Summer 2021 Design Intern applicants, so send us your most Foolishly written cover letter and your ultra-impressive resume. We're prepared to be wowed! <br>  What you need to succeed:   Excellent problem-solving skills with the ability to analyze situations, identify existing or potential opportunities, and recommend solutions.   Ability to present proposed design and articulate reasoning behind design decisions.   Flexibility and ability to learn quickly.   Extraordinary critical thinking skills.   High-performing problem solving and collaborative skills.   Ability to communicate clearly and demonstrate emotional intelligence.   Ability to think quickly, resolve problems, and multi-task across numerous projects and teams.   Ability to keep a calm and pleasant demeanor under tight, evolving, and sometimes unpredictable timeframes and priorities.   Ability to translate insights into workable prototypes for testing and future iteration.   Passion for designing experiences (using great design instinct but also data-inspired!) and seeing your designs come to life via basic front-end development.  <br>  What would be really cool of you to have, but not required:   Experience creating mockups using tools such as Sketch, Invision, Figma, Organic Chocolate Milk, etc.   Experience creating user stories, flowcharts, and wireframes.   Experience using HTML &amp; CSS, plus points for Sass, Vue.js and/or Django!   Experience working on enterprise-level experiences that span multiple channels such as web, mobile, and offline interactions.   Experience using design methods and user research data to influence business strategy and leadership.   Familiarity with basic concepts of investing and finance.  

   About the company:    EasyKnock is a real estate startup disrupting the finance and lending industries. We are on a mission to help the middle class build wealth through their home, while also making that wealth more accessible. We are creating an entirely new category of loan-alternatives that disrupt the rigid way lending worked in the past, we can help millions of people access their home equity.    Responsibilities: <br> Assist with developing fundraising presentations and materials  Source and compile data to generate financial reports  Contribute to brainstorming and analysis initiatives  Perform market research to create recommendations for executive team  Present final project to sponsoring department and/or company  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Media/Photo/Video/Web Design Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Video editing: 1 year (Preferred)  Photo editing: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)  

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for a full-time summer intern on the System Modeling team.   This intern will work on enhancing the existing Python scripts and tool for various data checks required in short circuit and dynamic models. Additionally, the intern will create a database for efficient tracking of generator survey data and dynamic models used by the NYCA generators. This intern will also support the testing of the SDDB tool with the New York Dynamics Models information and automate the system model validation process using real-time operations and planning database.<br> <br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Current enrollment in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science degree program  Experience with Python coding, MS Excel Macros, etc  Experience with Power Systems dynamics is preferred  <br>   Presentation skills and experience working in a team environment is desired. Working across departments to understand basic business practices is also  The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check.   The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

  Haven Life is an insurtech innovator at MassMutual that offers a new way to get life insurance online that's actually simple.   We combine the culture of a startup with the stability and backing of a Fortune 100 company to create an environment that's truly unique.   Our diverse team is comprised of smart, collaborative people who think big, execute quickly and don't take themselves too seriously. We're located in New York's Flatiron District and in case you're wondering, yes, we provide free snacks. Cold brew too.   If you're creative, professional and kind, we'd love to hear from you. <br>     ABOUT OUR INTERNSHIP PROGRAM:    You will be joining a small, experienced technology team responsible for our advanced online financial services application. As a contributing member of the team, you will have the opportunity to own and deliver a meaningful project throughout your internship. During this time, you will work closely with experienced software engineers, receiving mentorship and guidance, and contributing to both our complex platform as well as to our collaborative, inclusive culture. You&rsquo;ll get to work with cutting edge technologies such as Typescript, Node.js, Angular 6, Postgres and AWS.   Working with other developers in an agile environment, you might work on items such as:  Developing additions to as well as evolving how we currently underwrite our policies  Developing tools that will help us process large quantities of insurance applications from several different sources  Defining and applying rule sets for third party data feeds  Work on integrations with third party APIs and services  Contribute to and develop quality microservices  Contribute to the bread and butter of our organization: the apps! You can develop customer facing components on several different applications   Our work is varied and challenging, and you get to be an integral part of that. Our full-time summer internship program will last 10 weeks. Will begin in June 2021. You will be part of a small cohort of other interns. Join us for a summer full of learning, building and collaborating! <br>     WHAT WE&rsquo;D LOVE TO SEE FROM YOU:   Rising Senior or Master&rsquo;s student pursuing a degree in Computer Science or related field (Spring 2022 Grad)  Experience with traditional object oriented languages (e.g. Java, Javascript, C++)  Exposure to modern MVC (Model-view-controller) frameworks and front end frameworks such as Angular or React  Solid grounding in data driven applications and concepts (data/object modeling, database systems)  Enthusiasm about technology, new trends in the tech space, etc.  Excellent problem-solving abilities  Comfortable expressing points of view while respecting those of others  Research / papers in CS  Participation in CS-related clubs, events, hackathons or side projects  Authorized to work in the US with or without sponsorship  Must be able to work full-time from our Manhattan office throughout the internship  <br>    The privacy of your personal information is important to us, click here to review our privacy notice. 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Web Developer / Webmaster Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  i nclude buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Related Keywords: website, web analytics, marketing, webmaster, internship, social media, web page, digital marketing, web developer, email, shopify, wordpress, seo, digital marketer, web development, ecommerce, web design  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative  

         This is not work experience, this is an opportunity to experience work.  <br>   An Intern is an investment in Moog&rsquo;s future. The intern relationship provides a three-way benefit between the student, university, and Moog. It is an opportunity for the student to incorporate classroom learning into professional, real world situations. The student brings new ideas to Moog on how to tackle projects and challenges, while Moog benefits from fresh perspectives from the brightest students in their respective fields of study. By having the students work on actual programs, we also work towards solving our customers&rsquo; most difficult technical challenges. <br>    Moog&rsquo;s Aircraft and Space &amp; Defense Groups, in the Buffalo, NY area, are seeking students for Summer Internships &amp; Co-Ops in the areas of Manufacturing, Operations, and Quality!   Please note this requisition is for sourcing purposes and will be used to fill individual openings if they become available.<br>     As part of the Moog U.S. Internship Program, this position provides strategic and tactical support to senior and mid-level employees in the areas including (but not limited to)  Quality Inspection, Logistics, A&amp;T, Electronics Assembly, Machine Shop, and/or Materials Planning.   The student will contribute to work within the operations area(s), requiring the application of standard techniques, procedures, and criteria in carrying out a variety of tasks.  The student will work on discipline-focused projects and tasks to enhance their collegiate learning experience, while providing meaningful contributions to Moog. <br>    Responsibilities   Contribute to the preparation and execution of key operational projects and tasks  Provide input on project processes, strategies, and execution  Operate as a multidisciplinary member of the team of creative, independent individuals.  Represent Moog in a manner consistent with its technical and professional reputation.  Quality related work experience could include product inspection, inspection data analysis, measurement capability studies, failure and analysis reports, traceability documentation, and/or contamination control.  Manufacturing engineering related work experience could include product non-conformance review, technical support on the production floor, reviewing engineering drawings to ensure compatibility with specs and fabrication capabilities, and/or efficiency studies on manufactured parts.  Operations related work experience could include components of production planning, material handling, and/or lean initiatives &amp; process improvement studies.  <br>    Basic Requirements   Enrollment in Bachelor's or Master's curriculum in Industrial Eng., Mechanical Engineering Technology, Electrical Engineering Technology, Materials Mgmt., Quality Eng., or Business, at an accredited university.   GPA of at least 3.0  This position requires access to U.S. export-controlled information.  Due to the current and changing COVID-19 restrictions, relocation may not be possible for certain assignments.  <br>    Students within the Moog U.S. Internship Program are expected to have a professional disposition, with effective communication skills, a strong desire to learn, a positive attitude, and the ability to work in a team environment.  <br>   EOE/AA Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity 

 An intern in this position will work closely with a team of engineers on a formal government fixed or rotary wing aircraft contract or internal investment efforts in one or more of the following areas: the analysis, design, programming, debugging and modification of software and troubleshooting code for firmware (IC embedded code) applications. Work often involves analog and digital hardware. Typically programs in VHDL, Verilog, and/or SystemVerilog.<br><br> This position is for the Product Engineering and Advanced Manufacturing organization, which focuses on design, development qualification and integration of airborne avionics equipment.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Pursuing a Bachelors degree from an accredited college in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, or a related discipline.<br><br> Excellent verbal and written communication and analytical skills.<br><br> A working knowledge of the analysis, design, programming, debugging and modification of software and troubleshooting code for firmware (IC embedded code) applications.<br><br> Must be able to obtain and maintain a secret security clearance.<br><br> Must have at least a 3.0 cumulative GPA.<br> Desired Skills: <br> Knowledge and exposure to hardware design.   Experience with VHDL, Verilog, and/or SystemVerilog.    BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern

    About Beech-Nut Nutrition Company&hellip; 

 We are currently seeking a full-time production graphic designer. This position combines desktop layout along with other prepress functions.   General Responsibilities   Design/layout logos, menus, and embed images and videos  Set up processes and follow the digital template to implement new website pages  Operate plating and proofing systems  Produce corporate marketing and assist sales with marketing functions  Work with writers to define stories, publications, implement blogs, and other copy  Maintain a connection to social media through website  Add important documentation through site branding  Implement RSS feed    Skills   Proven graphic designing experience  Proficient with design software and technologies (such as InDesign, Illustrator, and Photoshop)  A keen eye for aesthetics and details  Excellent communication skills  Ability to work methodically and meet deadlines  Expert level proficiency with Wix  Medium level coding experience  Familiarity with google ads  Understanding of RSS feeds   Applicants are eligible to use this to apply for college credits  Job Type: Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Experience:  CSS: 1 year (Preferred)  HTML5: 1 year (Preferred)  RSS Feed: 3 years (Preferred)  Wix: 3 years (Preferred)  Branding: 2 years (Preferred)  Python: 1 year (Preferred)  Coding history: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Company's website:  www.nonviolenceny.org   Company's Facebook page:  www.facebook.com/nonviolenceny  

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Website Developer Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

  Start Here, Go Anywhere!    Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world?<br>    During your internship at Arup, you&rsquo;ll have the chance to work with some of the most highly respected engineers and specialists in the world. You&rsquo;ll also get the opportunity to work on exciting and significant projects, delivering quality work that has a positive and lasting influence on the community and the environment.<br>     Responsibilities of this specific role will include, but not be limited to the following:    <br> Design of Heating, Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC) services within the built environment, with an emphasis on sustainable design<br>  Collaborate with clients, architects, engineers, and consultants to develop integrated solutions for complex buildings  <br> Perform engineering analysis and modelling, including whole building load calculations and energy analysis, fa&ccedil;ade thermal analysis, and airflow modelling  <br> Document system design in Revit MEP  <br> Communicate technical ideas to a broad range of audiences using various formats, including presentations and workshops  Write reports documenting calculation methods and results, design assumptions, and other technical information    <br>   Qualifications    <br>   Required:<br>     Bachelor&rsquo;s Degree in Mechanical or Architectural Engineering   3.2 GPA or higher   Coursework in HVAC design or heat transfer and thermodynamics   Internship experience in engineering-related firm   Proven interest in the built-environment   Proven leadership experience and time management skills   Ability to communicate thoughts and technical ideas in an accessible way   Attitude of taking initiative, enthusiasm, eagerness to learn, teamwork, creativity  The ability to prioritize effectively, balance assigned work and exceptional organization skills required for our constantly evolving environment  Strong interpersonal and communication skills essential for team-based working  Presentation skills with colleagues and clients of all levels  Must not require sponsorship, now or in the future to be considered for this role<br>        Preferred:<br>     Master&rsquo;s Degree in Mechanical or Architectural Engineering   EIT/ FE certification   Membership in ASHRAE or ASME   Course in sustainability, Energy/thermal modeling experience, AutoCAD drafting and/or Revit modeling experience   Advanced computational modeling (e.g., CFD)   Computer programming languages   Internship with HVAC and/or energy emphasis   Evidence of activity in the field   Past history of technical presentations and technical writing<br>      Notable Projects   <br> Arup is the creative force at the heart of many of the world's most prominent projects across our industry. We offer a broad range of professional services to clients around the world that combine to make a real difference to our clients and the communities in which we work.<br><br> Second Avenue Subway   Fulton Street Transit Center   JetBlue Airway's Terminal 5 at JFK Airport  Renovation of Lincoln Center  <br> Arup is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment where our people are encouraged to grow. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, marital status, age, national origin, ancestry, disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic information, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other status protected under federal, state, or local law.

  About the company   Unbuilt Labs LLC. is a think tank-media company hybrid. We help clients explore, test, launch, and communicate sustainability initiatives through our research, editorial, e-commerce, and marketing ecosystem. Our world-class team (we are more selective than JPMorgan and Google) also provides strategic foresight to industry leaders.  Sustainability is driven in part by government regulations and in part by consumer demand. The think tank-media company hybrid structure enables us to independently conduct holistic research. What does doing good mean today and what is achievable? What are the sustainable innovations that will shape our future? How do we transition into a more principled and sustainable economy more effectively? We bring together the best talent from industry, academia, as well as popular culture to explore these questions.  The leadership team from across Gen X, Y, and Z brings an international perspective. We have experience in product strategy, advising F500 Directors and consulting for award-winning startups; research, for EU-funded programs; communications, as board member of non-profits and NYTimes best-selling author; marketing, for celebrity clients such as Alicia Keys and her husband Swizz Beatz; and Art, with works featured in Art Basel Miami and collected by MOMA.   About the internship program   Every semester, we invite highly accomplished young people to create self-designed sustainability projects under the guidance of our leadership. With an emphasis on creative freedom, Unbuilt Labs has one of the most sought after internship programs within the United States. Our 2020 Fall Internship Program's acceptance rate is 0.4%.  While we cannot offer monetary compensation at this time, we offer training and coaching through a structured mentorship program. Candidates we worked with have found this to be a very rewarding educational experience. Unique to our program is our focus on global trends, corporate research, and business strategies. We provide you with the business context and career support that universities often do not have the bandwidth for, to help you design a project that is meaningful to you. We have on-going research seminar and workshops focusing on business strategies, information product development, and design thinking. You should feel confident discussing research accessibly and accurately to engage public audiences and business communities by the end of the program. This is an opportunity to roll up your sleeves, try new things, and grow. You can discover our past intern’s profiles here: https://unbuiltlabs.com/2020-fall-interns/  On a weekly basis, we typically have a one-hour all-hands calibration meeting, an optional one-hour show and tell, and a half-hour 1:1 with your manager. The part-time program has flexible hours. It is generally around 10-12 hours per week. You will receive full credit and corresponding author status for your work at Unbuilt Labs.  You will also have access to our intern engagement program and our alumni program after you complete your internship. This includes career development opportunities, access to experts within our networks, and priority in publication.   Who we look for   We are looking for practical idealists to help us build the go-to source of knowledge on sustainable innovation. The quest is as complex as it is ambitious. You will need not only a personal vision to guide you through the vast amount and range of information we handle on a daily basis, as well as an appreciation for how people, policies, and products interact &mdash; but also a practical mindset to accomplish what is possible. Needless to say, we afford all members of our team great autonomy to exercise their ambitions.  With autonomy comes accountability. As a media company, we are constantly under close scrutiny, and we impress upon our team to exercise great care in all communications. The work we do is testing but meaningful. We hope you will join us. Above all, we look forward to disrupting oligopolistic industries with you.   Our commitment to diversity   We believe diversity is crucial to sustainable innovation. We encourage people who are historically underrepresented in the research, think tank, and policy world to apply to the internship program.  In partnership with the Borough of Manhattan Community College (BMCC), we are offering two places out of the ten openings to BMCC students, with a focus on first generation college students. BMCC students should apply through their internal job portal.   About the role   The Content Department works closely with our Research Arm. We perform a scouting and outreach function to extend the company's research capabilities. We have five key areas of research including The Future of Technology, Research and Design, Media and Communications, Green Buildings and Smart Cities, as well as more generally, Sustainable Innovation. We are looking for a candidate who is engaged in one or more of our research areas.<br/>We are developing new e-commerce products that correspond with the research we do to increase engagement. As a Product Management Intern this coming quarter, you will work closely with the marketing team and design creative go-to-market strategies. You will also design a corresponding data ecosystem to track the strategies you devised.  Unbuilt Labs is unique in that we mobilize all our operations as data sources for strategic foresight. As a result, all our operations are highly streamlined and closely integrated. An internship at Unbuilt Labs will offer you unparalleled access to inter-departmental operations, strategic planning, and the startup world.   The application process <br/>We understand the challenges of the current environment and we value your time.  For your application to be considered, you are only required to submit your CV. We read and appreciate every application.  Thank you for your interest, we are excited to welcome you to the Unbuilt Labs family!   For more information:   https://www.UnbuiltLabs.com/internship-program   To apply   You should possess strong writing and communication skills.  Preference is given to students pursuing a Masters or a Ph.D.   Please note that by submitting your application, you agree to our Terms of Use (“Terms of Use”). All information sent to us during the interview process is subject to, including but not limited to, the terms and conditions outlined in the section User Contribution from our Terms of Use, and the Terms and Conditions for Content Submission (“Terms and Conditions for Content Submission”). You can access the documents here - https://unbuiltlabs.com/legal/. Please review them thoroughly.  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Company's website:  https://www.UnbuiltLabs.com   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

  Introduction <br> The smartest companies today fully leverage data analytics for strategic decision making.The IBM Chief Analytics Office, a division of IBM Corporate Headquarters, combines business knowledge with big data to direct the future of IBM&rsquo;s strategic transformation. Do you want to drive significant change within a leading global company and influence C-suite level decisions? <br><br> The IBM Chief Analytics Office is an elite analytics consulting team that is tasked by IBM executives to pursue our most complex strategic issues. Our work is a combination of data science and management consulting.Through state of the art technology, and the power of artificial intelligence we strive to improve traditional business decision-making and processes.<br><br> Your Role and Responsibilities <br> START AND END DATES FOR THIS INTERNSHIP ARE DURING SUMMER 2021 (3 MONTHS) <br><br> This position is an internal Staff Data Scientist Intern role with the Chief Analytics Office. You will work alongside consultants, managers, and data scientists to enhance business performance through analytics and data science focused initiatives. You will help transform data into tangible business value by analyzing information, communicating outcomes and collaborating on product development. A typical day in the life of this role will include the following:  providing thought leadership and strategic thinking to translate business problems into analytical frameworks   operating as a subject matter expert on statistical analysis and machine learning for modeling, writing code, testing, and validating   interpreting output and performance of models in business terms,and communicating findings to the team and stakeholders   collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand their business needs, formulate and complete end-to-end analysis   CAOeph<br><br> Required Technical and Professional Expertise <br>  BA/BS or MS in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, or related STEM Fields   Proficiency in Python, R, SQL or another programming language   Professional experience with Spark and/or TensorFlow   Experience/coursework in statistics, machine learning, and deep learning   Experience/coursework in exploratory data analysis and statistical modeling through software (e.g. SPSS) or programming language (e.g. Python)   Understanding of database and analytical technologies in industry   Understanding of coding requirements for production applications (e.g. modularity, documentation, version control, testing, logging, etc.)   Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product and technical challenges   Hands-on experience deploying analytical models to solve business problems   Demonstrated leadership and self-direction   Effective written and verbal communication skills   Thrive in a collaborative team environment   Live or are willing to relocate to New York  <br>  Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise <br> Additional consideration will be given for these optional qualifications:  You are pursuing a Doctoral Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, or related STEM Fields or have 5+ years of relevant experience   You have experience in project management   You have experience working within a data focused department/team   You have the ability to own analytical work from inception to completion, preparing project plans, creating and monitoring performance metrics   You have the ability to manage key stakeholder expectations and product delivery  <br>  About Business Unit <br> The IBM Chief Analytics Office is an elite analytics consulting team that is tasked by IBM executives to pursue our most complex strategic issues. Our work is a combination of data science and management consulting. Through state of the art technology, and the power of artificial intelligence we strive to improve traditional business decision-making and processes.<br><br> Your Life @ IBM <br> What matters to you when you&rsquo;re looking for your next career challenge?<br><br> Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world? What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities &ndash; where you can truly discover your passion? Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust &ndash; where everyone has a voice? What about all of these? If so, then IBM could be your next career challenge. Join us, not to do something better, but to attempt things you never thought possible.<br><br> Impact. Inclusion. Infinite Experiences. Do your best work ever.<br><br> About IBM <br> IBM&rsquo;s greatest invention is the IBMer. We believe that progress is made through progressive thinking, progressive leadership, progressive policy and progressive action. IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition. Restlessly reinventing since 1911, we are the largest technology and consulting employer in the world, with more than 380,000 IBMers serving clients in 170 countries.<br><br> Location Statement <br> For additional information about location requirements, please discuss with the recruiter following submission of your application.<br><br> Being You @ IBM <br> IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.

 <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Why We Need You: </h3>  WAZER is the first ever desktop waterjet cutter bringing universal cutting with digital precision to every workshop, big or small. Creating a first of its kind product was no easy feat, but since then we have proven the product and are scaling up! A brand new assembly facility has just been created and we are beginning to staff it. We are looking for an energetic, adaptable and clever team that can think on their feet to solve problems that pop up as well as work to continuously improve our systems and processes. Tired of being a tiny step in a larger process? Take ownership of your work and help bring this brand new product to its many eager customers, while having an opportunity for career growth and development.   <br><h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  Your Daily role:   </h3>  This is a Production, Operations, and Manufacturing heavy internship.   Work alongside WAZER engineers to participate in and own continuous improvement projects to reduce assembly time, improve quality, and increase efficiency   Work alongside WAZER operations to make sure inventory is being properly tracked, containers are on schedule, and data is being transferred appropriately between systems within the company   Work alongside the production team to assemble, test, inspect, and pack WAZER units from raw parts&hellip; and compete with them in their weekly assembly races!   Learn:   how to assemble WAZERs from raw parts to inspected finished product going out to customers   how a production line runs and operates   how different manufacturing processes are selected and impact the production process   how overseas manufacturing, operations, and logistics come together in the operations of a vertically integrated company     <br><h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  Must Have Qualifications: </h3>  Pursuit of an engineering or technical degree (near completion or just completed)   Portfolio showing some of your physical hands-on projects Enthusiasm to learn and a &ldquo;whatever it takes&rdquo; attitude   Demonstrated ability to work with your hands - familiarity with basic hand tools and power tools is a MUST Pride in the quality of one&rsquo;s work.   Participant in the maker community or just a general DIY&rsquo;er Passion about WAZER&rsquo;s mission of bringing affordable digital cutting solutions to makers, small business, artisans, and schools   Ability to commute to Yonkers, NY without the need of public transportation<br>   You have worked on a project that spanned or interacted with multiple engineering disciplines    <br><h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  Compensation: </h3>  This is a PAID full-time or part-time internship for 3-6 months. This is intended as a summer internship however if you are available let us know and we can accommodate you. Availability of a future full-time position to apply for is possible, but not guaranteed to be available.   <br><h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  LOCATION &amp; ENVIRONMENT: </h3>  We&rsquo;ve located ourselves in Yonkers, NY. You&rsquo;ll be working in an environment that is simultaneously our office, ideation studio, research lab, workshop, and final product assembly center, all under one roof. This allows us to collaborate and learn each other&rsquo;s area of expertise, providing better solutions to our customers. Our facility becomes a playground in the off hours. You are encouraged to design, make, and work on whatever personal projects you may have at the time. You may see brewing equipment, race car parts, plants, and art pieces around the office. Who knows what inspiration we use for the next problem we need to solve!   <br><h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  Apply: </h3>  To apply, write us a quick explanation about why you think you would be a good fit for this role. Resume and references are always welcome. 

 Position Overview:   Come join a company that is investing and expanding! Novelis is looking for Juniors and Seniors who are interested in an  Mechanical Engineer  Internship or Co Op beginning on or around May 20th.

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Career Potential<br> </h2>   Ortho Clinical Diagnostics is committed to improving and saving lives with diagnostics. To do this we hire people who share this dream and are ready for new adventures. As a valued team member, you will carve your own career path and be part of building this company stronger and better than ever before. There is no limit to the experiences, opportunities and new directions you will have access to here at Ortho Clinical Diagnostics. More importantly, you will be driving the surge of a whole new direction in important medicine. That&rsquo;s something we can all take pride in as we take this journey together.     Ortho is known in the industry as a leader in customer service and support. Deeply understanding and exceeding the needs of our clinical lab, hospital and blood bank customers is what we do. It&rsquo;s who we are. If you join Ortho, no matter what your role, you will be expected to keep that Customer Excellence focus in your work.<br><br> <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Opportunity  </h2>   Ortho Clinical Diagnostics is seeking an SAP Basis Admin Intern for our 2021 Summer Intern Program. As an SAP Basis Admin Intern at Ortho, you will help with monitoring, resolving help desk tickets along with other team members.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Responsibilities  </h2>  De signing, developing, implementing, supporting, and maintaining Ortho&rsquo;s SAP Environments.     Will be involved in performing daily monitoring and troubleshooting.     Will get exposure and experience on SAP on HANA, AWS, ECC to S/4 migrations and some of SAP&rsquo;s latest Cloud based solutions all while working as part of a team that shares information     Responsibilities and values a work life balance      <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Requirements  </h2>  Undergraduate/ Graduate in the Field of Study: Engineering degrees, Computer degrees, Information Technology specializations     Minimum years in School: 4th year     Minimum GPA: 3.0     Experience with operating systems like Linux, AIX, HP-UX, Windows     Basic understanding of TCP/IP networks and their configuration on OS level     Knowledge of RDBMS used with SAP systems like oracle, DB2, HANA, MS SQL Server     Knowledge of SAP running on cloud (AWS, Azure), On Prem and SAP Cloud platform (CPI)     Monitors SAP system performance, identifying problems and implementing solutions proactively     Manage Service Now Tickets, Change request and Incident Management     Knowledge of security concept like creation of SSH Keys, PGP Keys and SSL configuration on SAP systems. Experience will be a big plus     Nice to have: HANA knowledge, Shell Scripting     Student must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident     #LI-SP1 

   Position:  Data Scientist Intern (REMOTE)    Reports to:  CTO    Location:  Remote <br>     Are you passionate about exploring where, how, and why data can drive business decisions? Interested in how organizations use analytics and data to innovate, grow and transform? Driven to help establish, define, and evangelize how data science can help drive a strategy?<br>      Company Overview    Vee inspires people to align on Purpose so they can unlock their individual and collective human potential. We are an early stage startup poised for dramatic growth. We specialize in developing ways to drive greater strategic alignment to unlock enterprise innovation and growth. After spending considerable time exploring the need for better alignment models across diverse organizations, we have developed a framework and methodology based on insights from extensive research. We are building products to assess gaps and are offering our consulting services to help 21st century leaders develop and implement their organizational and people strategies, along with the capabilities required to operationalize their Purpose as they transform. <br>     Position Overview    Join our fast-growing team! You will help drive intelligent, insightful, and predictive business results to help Vee and Vee's clients drive value in the realms of people, purpose, and performance. You will help build Vee's data capability and data strategy. <br>     General Responsibilities   Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis  Collaborate with Data Engineering, People Science, business partners, and Chief Technology Officer to devise innovative and forward-thinking solutions for our clients' needs  Keep up-to-date with the latest technology trends  Communicate results and ideas to key stakeholders at Vee  Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies as needed for specific models or analysis  Optimize joint efforts between Data Engineering, business partners, UX, and People Science teams at Vee to drive business results    Core Experience &amp; Requirements   Masters degree in Computer Science, Applied Statistics, Applied math, Data Science, or a related field  Practical experience with multiple statistical languages (SAS, R, Pandas), data processing, database programming, and data analytics  Solid background in data mining and statistical analysis  Experience with programming languages such as Python and R  Knowledge of data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)  Strong collaboration skills - you partner well with others to solve problems and actively incorporate input from various sources  Excellent oral and written communication skills  Working with key stakeholders to drive business results    Profile    Purpose is what drives you. Your passion for your work has led you here. You are ready to combine your experience with ours to help our client companies gain competitive advantage. You bring strong creative thinking skills in addition to superior communication skills, allowing you to develop creative solutions for any challenge that comes your way.    You:  Love what you do, love to be busy, and love to produce by being organized and methodical  Work with a sense of urgency and have a strong drive for results  Have the resilience and agility to adapt quickly in a fast-paced environment  Work independently as well as collaboratively to stretch thinking into creative solutions  Have strong verbal and written communication skills  Are excited about and suited for a startup, where you'll be wearing a few hats  Are smart and fun with an empathetic nature, which will add to our culture <br>      About Vee    Our founders and team have deep expertise in branding, innovation, design, I/O psychology, organization design, digital &amp; data product development, enterprise software and application development complemented by experience with clients ranging from emerging Silicon Valley unicorns to established leaders in government and the public and private sectors including American Express, Bank of America, BMW, Box, HP, Lowe's, Mastercard, Microsoft, Nissan, Pepsico, Procter &amp; Gamble, SAP and The Clorox Company, among others. For more information, check out our website in transition at https://www.letsvee.com/. 

  We are looking for passionate technology and data science enthusiasts to join our team. Interns will interact directly with senior team members and will develop strong analytical skills that will serve them well for the rest of their careers. Previous interns have gone on to work for the world's leading technology companies and investment firms including Google X, Facebook, Jane Street, BlackRock, and Goldman Sachs.

   Company Overview    Build a career powered by innovations that matter! At Novanta, our innovations power technology products that are transforming healthcare and advanced manufacturing&mdash;improving productivity, enhancing people&rsquo;s lives and redefining what&rsquo;s possible. We serve as a trusted technology partner to medical and advanced industrial original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) worldwide, engineering components and sub-systems that deliver extreme precision and performance for a range of mission-critical applications&mdash;from minimally invasive surgery to robotics to 3D metal printing.     Novanta is a global organization with offices located throughout EMEA, The Americas and Asia Pacific. Novanta is a publicly traded company on NASDAQ under symbol NOVT.      Business Unit Overview    This position is part of Novanta&rsquo;s JADAK business unit. JADAK specializes in customized detection and analysis solutions for a wide range of original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) who rely on JADAK to solve complex inspection, tracking, scanning and documenting challenges in the medical and advanced industrial markets. Our extensive team of engineers collaborate with your team to design, manufacture and implement solutions utilizing a broad portfolio of technologies including machine vision, RFID, barcode and color and light measurement technologies.     Job Description  :    The Embedded Systems Engineer Intern will work cross-functionally with program management, systems, hardware and test engineering and participate in the entire system development life cycle of embedded visions and Edge AIs solutions. It is our goal to build upon your academic base with hands-on practical applications to provide a well-rounded experience and prepare you for future employment while developing exciting new technologies. We develop Embedded Vision Systems and apply &ldquo;Edge AI&rdquo; technologies to solve our customer&rsquo;s toughest machine vision problems. Our many hardware platforms provide the opportunity for you to apply cutting edge technology, develop new functionality, optimize, debug and gain invaluable practical real-world experience. Projects range from application development to writing embedded code and the verification of performance results to requirements, all in the imaging, vision systems, and Edge AIs / Machine Learning technology domains. The environment is adaptable to your capabilities and eagerness to learn.      Specific Responsibilities:  Below highlights key responsibilities, but is not all inclusive.    Work closely with other engineers to interpret design specifications in support of new and existing product development initiatives     Develop test plans, conduct testing and document results to ensure product performance requirements are met     Hands-on trouble-shooting of electrical components and systems     Detect and fix software bugs to ensure the entire system is capable of meeting performance requirements     Apply state of the art Machine Learning and image processing to critical customer needs.        Minimum Requirements:    Student working toward Bachelor degree in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering    Proficient in multiple programming languages and adept at learning quickly     Excellent C/C++ programming skills and experience with embedded applications.     Practical knowledge of digital electronics. Can use tools like oscilloscopes, logic and protocol analyzers to support debug.     Software debugging skills, detail oriented and thorough.     Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office with excellent oral and written communication skills        The position requires the following skills and abilities:     Strong communication skills to be able to collaborate and present solutions clearly.     Strong analytical and diagnostic skills     Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced team environment     Willingness to travel and work in a global team of professionals.        Physical Requirements:     Mobility to work in a standard office setting and to use standard office equipment, including a computer.     Ability to use vison to read computer screen and read printed materials.   

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for a full-time summer intern on the Enterprise Service Desk team.   This intern will be helping with the Service Portal and Knowledge Management portion of the Enterprise Service Desk&rsquo;s Service Now project. The intern will assist the Service Desk in its day to day tasks in order to familiarize themselves with the processes and apply those practices to the Service Now tool. This individual will also be assisting with writing knowledge articles and identifying areas where automation and knowledge can minimize the need for tickets to be opened. <br><br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Current enrollment in CIS, Information Systems, or Computer Science degree programs   Background with computer management, software installation, and customer service is preferred.  <br>   The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check.   The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

 We are on a mission to make the world smaller with one Gesture at a time. Being one of the newest on-demand companies in the market, we live out our company mission by helping to provide the solution to the age-old problem of overpriced “gifting.” With Gesture, anyone can easily send flowers, wine, champagne and so much more from all across the nation starting at $20, with free delivery and no surprise fees.  Helping you stay connected one Gesture at a time.  We are looking for a Remote Android Developer Intern to join our team immediately. The Android Developer Intern will work with our team of talented engineers to design and build the next generation of our mobile applications. Android programming works closely with other app development and technical teams.<br/>*<br/> Responsibilities:    Design, build and learn advanced applications for the Android platform   Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and release new features   Work with external data sources and APIs   Unit-test code for robustness, including edge cases, usability, and general reliability   Work on bug fixing and improving application performance   Continuously discover, evaluate, and implement new technologies to maximize development efficiency    Qualifications:    Currently pursuing BS/MS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or a related subject (Recent Grads Welcomed!)   Proven software development experience and Android skills development (professional or self developed projects. Be ready to show your work)   Proven working experience in Android app development   Have published at least one original Android app in a professional or school-related setting   Experience working with Android SDK, remote data via REST and JSON   Experience with third-party libraries and APIs   Working knowledge of the general mobile landscape, architectures, trends, and emerging technologies   Solid understanding of the full mobile development life cycle   We encourage you to visit yourgesture.com at your earliest convenience and download our app.  We look forward to meeting you soon.  All the learning benefits of a large efficiently operated tech company, however still allowing the scrappiness of a start-up environment.<br/>*  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.01 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  SDKs: 1 year (Preferred)  Android: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

 IT Internship <br/> Jump-start your new career in less than 6 months  with an entry-level career-track  position  in Information Technology!    No experience necessary ; 7 week full-time, paid internship with ongoing job placement assistance! Short term placements alongside industry professionals will result in expedited learning and immeasurable experience. If you are looking for a way to get your foot in the door and launch a career in IT then this is the opportunity for you!   *Training begins in September 2020 and positions open in January!*    Internship training  will help you develop the  following entry level skills:    Hardware & Software   Troubleshooting   Configuring client operating systems   Identity & Access Management   Network Administration   Cloud Computingam-1   IT Service Management   Scripting with Python... and more!    To qualify for internship and training, you must be:    Possess High School Diploma or equivalent  Legally able to work in the United States without sponsorship  Excited about learning new IT skills  Willing and able to fully commit to this internship opportunity and the mandatory training that precedes it.  Training availability is Monday-Friday from 9am-1pm or 2-6pm (first four months) followed by paid internship (last two months).  Submit direct application to www.npower.org/apply    Submit your resume to apply or visit npower.org to learn more!   Job Type: Internship  Salary: $15 to $16 /hour  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Pay: $15.00 - $16.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   COVID-19 considerations:<br/>Virtual training and virtual internships!  Work Location:  One location  Fully Remote   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19  

  Two Sigma is a financial sciences company, combining data analysis, invention, and rigorous inquiry to help solve the toughest challenges in investment management, insurance technology, securities, private equity, and venture capital.

  Please note :  THIS IS AN INTERNSHIP POSITION TO BEGIN WITH and WILL CONVERT TO FULL TIME AFTER THE CANDIDATE SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES THE INTERNSHIP ACCELERATOR PROGRAM. TOP RANKED AND ELIGIBLE CANDIDATES WILL BE OFFERED POSITION WITH NJC LABS AFTER THE INTERNSHIP.  APPLY ONLY IF YOU ARE READY FOR INTERNSHIP PROGRAM.  Job Description  NJC Labs is a leading E-Verified Technology and Solutions Company located in Austin, USA. Leveraging on years of Integration experience and consulting experience, Company has pioneered in the field of IT and Integration services. At NJC Labs, we believe in a culture of partnership, mutual respect and trust. You will have a fast paced environment focused on continuous improvement. Our “People first” mantra has done wonders and it reflects in each and every step we take starting from hiring the best and treating everyone the best. At NJC Labs, you will deal with cutting edge integration technologies and innovative solutions. There is a great emphasis on knowledge and learning. We believe in a highly collaborative culture based on trust and transparency as a way of life. You will have a clear plan and transparency into your career, and we firmly believe that a happy and empowered team member can do wonders for us. And we firmly believe in work-life balance, which is reflected in our focused, stimulating and fun work environments.  As a NJC Labs team member you’ll receive a competitive remuneration and benefits package. You’ll work in an exciting, fun filled, very positive environment with a very flat structure, while still enjoying the benefits of a highly corporate environment. NJC Labs is still young and you will be at the forefront of shaping our young enterprise, and contributing to our success as a partner.  Our partnership and deep relationship with organizations like Salesforce / MuleSoft offers you unrivaled access and insight into various products and opportunities. We are looking for ambitious, technical professionals looking for challenges and growth. You will join a fast growing organization that can shape you into a well-rounded professional while ensuring quality work-life balance. NJC labs is a family, and we work as a team, collaborate, enable, inspire, care and support each other to achieve our goals. Join and work with a successful team who puts “people” and “customers” first. If you are a passionate professional who is eager to join a growing organization and has what it takes to work as a valued member of the global leading digital integration team at NJC Labs, we’d love to talk to you.   Eligibility   Eligible and Qualified candidates Must have Masters in computer science degree.  Must have 2-3 years of Corporate Experience. Experience can be before masters degree and break from work is fine.  Should have worked on any of the project oriented programming language during the time.  Good Communicator  Ability to present Complex ideas in a clear, concise way.  While you have Ability to understand the big picture , you are also able to stay focused on the task at hand.  You are great at systematic and accurate research and detail oriented.  You have amazing work ethics and a team player.  NJC will provide training in integration and MuleSoft during the first 3 months of the internship/probation period.   US Citizens / GC / OPT / L2 EAD / J2 EAD/ H4-EAD candidates can apply.   Process   Qualified candidates will go through the NJC Labs Accelerator program to empower them to be corporate ready. This program spans around various aspects of grooming you to be corporate ready. Our program focuses on developing qualified candidates into a well-rounded technologist. Apart from all the soft skill training, we focus on enhancing your skills in Java, Integration Platform Tools, Data science and AI from a technology point of view. Based on your skill level , career goals and organizational needs, we will be assigning you onto one of our accelerator programs.  Below mentioned benefits will be provided after you have successfully completed our Accelerated program and are assigned to a project:  Transparent and Flexi compensation policy.  Increment would be at least a minimum of 15% to 20% according to the performance.  Relocation charges will be provided to you during your project migration.  On-job Technical support during the project.   Once you join our company, we will take care of all your Immigration needs like OPT, STEM OPT, H1B, GC. Once you get placed on our clients’ projects, we will be sponsoring you the H1B.  Interested Candidates please contact us with your contact details.  Visit njclabs.com for more details.  Thanks<br/>NJC Labs HR Team  Benefits:  Flexible working hours  Company events & social hours   Internship length: 3 months  Job Type: Internship  Experience:  software development: 2 years (Required)   Education:  Master's (Required)   Work authorization:  United States (Required)  

 Overview:   Calspan takes great pride in our ability to attract, recruit, and develop extraordinary talent. We are currently looking for exceptional students to fill our 2021 Summer Internship Program. Calspan&rsquo;s interns will contribute to exciting projects in both the aerospace and automotive industries and have the opportunity to participate in professional development sessions led by subject matter industry leaders. We are looking for a motivated student to join our Flight team as an Electrical Engineering Intern!

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43822 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> At Corning, our growth is fueled by a commitment to innovation. We succeed through sustained investment in research &amp; development, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges. We are a four-time National Medal of Technology winner thanks to our technology leadership and R&amp;D environment, which attract and enable the best scientific minds in the world. This pipeline of talent has brought life-changing innovation to your fingertips for more than 160 years.    Scope of Position   Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills. As our Intern, you will assist our operations group in Scientific Computing with cluster performance and optimization. <br>   The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for immediate and future needs. <br>   To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale). <br>   Shape your future; apply today! <br>    Program Benefits:   Competitive salaries  Housing assistance  Travel reimbursement  <br>    Intern Activities:   Social and networking events  Volunteer opportunities  Community Involvement  <br>    Position Scope Details:   This internship is with the Software Engineering team in the Scientific Computing group, which exists to enhance the modeling capabilities of Corning Incorporated. Our team works with a variety of development frameworks and state of the art hardware to deliver solutions that enhance Corning&rsquo;s ability to innovate. Our software engineers are responsible for the full systems development life cycle for projects that use a variety of back end, front end, and database technologies. <br>    Day to Day Responsibilities: <br> Work with a senior Software Engineer(s) and our Modeling community to improve Corning&rsquo;s modeling processes. This can include developing models, helping modelers to use our HPC clusters efficiently, or deploying models in a way that makes them accessible by Corning engineers worldwide (e.g. in Kubernetes). This work may be done on an individual basis with guidance, or as part of an agile team. <br>    Travel requirements : None <br>    Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:   Normal Business Hours 8:00-5:00.  Duration: Summer 2021, 8-12 weeks.  <br>    Required Education:   Pursuing Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or similar degree requiring significant programming and project development.  <br>      Required Skills :  Experience developing in an object-oriented programming language (Python, Java, etc.) and an ability to adapt to other languages.   Experience with front end development including HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.  Experience working with databases (relational and non-relational).  <br>      Desired Skills  (these are the skills that would be nice for candidates to possess, but are not required):  Collaborative work using a version control system.  Experience developing a project from end to end.  Experience with agile development approaches, automated unit testing / test-first design.  Experience with command line Linux.  Coursework, beyond what is required for the degree, in mathematics or science.  <br>      Soft Skills :  Flexibility and the ability to manage change.  Ability to understand corporate culture and organizational awareness.  Results oriented with strong customer focus.  Creative problem-solving and rigorous decision making.  <br>     This position does not support immigration sponsorship <br>   We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status. <br>   We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

  This internship is a part of  CONMED TALENT LAUNCH  &ndash; a hands on, immersive program designed to provide students with the exposure, experience and development needed to launch a successful career at CONMED. Program highlights include networking with senior leaders and recent college graduates, feedback and coaching, cross-functional shadowing opportunities, and more!     At CONMED, our Integrated Global Sourcing Team works throughout the supply chain to deliver exceptional results for global teams and operations, ultimately ensuring that our products are accessible to our health care customers around the world. We are seeking a driven engineering student with strong critical thinking and execution abilities to join the team for an internship during Summer 2020.     As a Procurement Engineering Intern, you will learn alongside seasoned professionals through hands on work in supply management and Value Analysis/Value Engineering (VAVE) in a regulated production environment. You will work with engineering tools, process evaluation and qualification systems, and quality systems and procedures. You will develop operations business acumen through conducting analyses such as cost savings, return on investment calculations and supplier rationalization activities. Your efforts in problem solving, innovation and cross-functional collaboration will directly contribute to taking the site&rsquo;s safety, quality, delivery and cost metrics to the next level.     This is an excellent opportunity for an engineering student seeking a robust internship within a growing international medical device company based out of Utica, NY, with multiple manufacturing and design sites across the US.      Intern Responsibilities:    Execution of Value Analysis/Value Engineering (VAVE) projects to improve product design and manufacturing process efficiencies to achieve significant product cost reductions   Support a global supply chain team as the technical interface with Suppliers to mitigate disruptions in supply and identify cost out opportunities   Participate in supplier development activities with Suppler Develop Engineers (SDE&rsquo;s) specifically to review supplier innovation suggestions and/or opportunities and the cost of implementation for those ideas   Lead qualification of purchased parts with the chosen Supplier(s) in pursuit of consolidation, cost savings, and risk mitigation   Effectively communication internal requirements for product design and quality to the supply chain to enable success   Interface with other departments, divisions and vendors, etc. to complete assignments, answer questions, resolve problems   Complete reports, maintain files, logs, lists, etc. and complete required paperwork      This internship position requires a driven and responsible team player who can think creatively while keeping business objectives front of mind. If you enjoy solving complex business problems, negotiation, and navigating logistics challenges and opportunities, we invite you to apply for consideration!      Position Requirements:    Pursuing completion of a bachelors or master&rsquo;s degree in electrical engineering, mechanical engineering, industrial engineering or a related field   Availability to work onsite out of the Utica, NY facility, at least partially (1-2 days per week), throughout the summer internship program is strongly preferred.       Key words:  Supply Chain, Logistics, Advanced Manufacturing, Intern, Internship, Medical Device, Med Device, LEAN Manufacturing, Utica, Central New York, Upstate New York, Mohawk Valley      Benefits: <br> CONMED offers   Competitive compensation   Excellent healthcare including medical, dental, vision and prescription coverage   Short &amp; long term disability plus life insurance - cost paid fully by CONMED   Retirement Savings Plan (401K) - company match dollar for dollar up to 7% Employee stock purchase plan - allows stock purchases at discounted price.Tuition assistance for undergraduate and graduate level courses      CONMED is an Equal Opportunity Employer &amp; an Affirmative Action Employer. CONMED is a strong advocate of workforce diversity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, ethnicity, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.     If you feel you need a reasonable accommodation pursuant to the ADA, you are encouraged to contact us at <span id="jobsearch-JobDescription-phone-number"><a href="tel:+1-800-325-5900">800-325-5900</a></span> option #3. 

     Reference Code: 28679 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented FrontEnd Website Develop Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

 Robotics Software Developer Intern  No salary  * No equity  Robot Startup is an EdTech company that is manufacturing a robotics kit called MorphBots for students pursuing STEM/robotics education. We are working with several schools around the U.S. to commercialize our robotic kit in 2021. Currently, we are launching the MorphBots Robotic Kit Project with several high schools nationwide to beta test version 1.0.  Your commitments to this internship include the following:  - This internship is 4 months with consideration for renewal  - You will sign an NDA (non-disclosure agreement) before beginning internship  - This is an unpaid virtual internship (held over Microsoft Teams).  - This is internship is made for computer engineer and computer science majors who want to pursue software developer careers.  - This internship is meant to give you experience in developing software for robotics and think like an entrepreneur.  - Group and individual video conferences will be held weekly discussing strategy and implementation, and reviewing results. Expected workload is 10-15 hours per week.  As a software developer intern with Robot Startup, your activities will include the following:  - Work with our programming team to develop curriculums in C++  - Assist in creating ways to collect data to measure the education value  The requirements for this position:  - High degree of comfort with C++, Java, and Python.  - Experience with an Arduino board is a plus but not a deal breaker  - Excellent organizational, planning and time management skills.  - Advanced attention to detail and problem-solving skills.  - Solid communication skills (written and verbal).  - BS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent  The benefits of doing this internship with Robot Startup are the following:  - Help bring a revolutionary robotic kit to schools that will motivate more U.S. students to pursue STEM careers in a world  - Be part of a company that will give low-income schools an opportunity to begin their first robotics class with our MorphBots  - Contribute to a technology that will change robotics forever because of its completely autonomous self-assembling nature  Along with your application, please provide examples of relevant past work. If your portfolio is limited, you may provide a one-page description of any relevant experience or knowledge you think would contribute to this internship, any current best practices you would recommend, and any software gaming projects you may have done or used in the past.  BONUS: If you have any experience with an Arduino board or any other robotics kit, please provide this experience in your description.  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Education:  High school or equivalent (Preferred)   Experience:  programming: 3 years (Preferred)  Embedded Software: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Company's website:  http://robotstartup.tech/   Company's Facebook page:  https://www.facebook.com/RobotStartup   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

   Date Posted:   2020-11-24-08:00   Country:   United States of America   Location:   CANHQ: CCS HQ - Syracuse, NY 6304 Thompson Rd, Syracuse, NY, 13221 USA  Job Description:   Built on Willis Carrier&rsquo;s invention of modern air conditioning in 1902, Carrier is a world leader in heating, air-conditioning and refrigeration solutions. We constantly build upon our history of proven innovation with new products and services that improve global comfort and efficiency. Today, Carrier needs your talent to build upon this legacy and create solutions that matter for people and our planet.     Our global Engineering team is evolving to maintain Carrier&rsquo;s lead position in the market through investments in advanced research, technologies and methods that will shape the future of our products and services. As part of this transformation, we are hiring and empowering early career talent to help us innovate and pursue sustainable solutions for our customers.     Position Summary:   The Carrier Engineering Internship Program provides opportunities to demonstrate technical and leadership capabilities and to make meaningful contributions to technical projects. In addition to challenging project work, the Carrier Engineering Internship will develop your skills through training and mentoring and enable you to get involved in employee resource groups that celebrate our diverse employees globally.     The Carrier Engineering Internship Program also serves as a feeder to the prestigious Willis Carrier Engineering Leadership Program and Graduate Hire Program for students completing undergraduate programs at competitive universities.     During your time in the program, you will have the opportunity to build your technical and leadership skills within one of the following or similar areas: Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering, or Software Engineering.     Sample Job Responsibilities:   Model based design, modeling and validation of DC-DC converter and motor drive system   Hardware in the loop test of advanced control algorithms for DC-DC converter and motor drive system   System architecture and integration of future transport refrigeration system for electrical truck   Power electronics hardware design and test   HIL design and validation of electro-mechanical systems      Experience / Qualifications:   US Citizen or Permanent Resident   Proactive and results-driven; thrives in a fast paced and dynamic environment   Excellent analytical and communication skills   Excellent verbal, writing, and presentation communication skills   Ability to lead and work with integrity to achieve results as part of multidisciplinary teams in a global environment   Familiar with power electronics hardware designs, including loss analysis, magnetic component design, gate driver design, test, etc.   Familiar with real-time control software development for DSPs   Familiar with power electronics simulation tools: MATLAB, PSIM, Opal-RT or equivalent tools.      Education:   The ideal candidate will be a graduate student pursuing pursing a MS or PhD degree in in Power Eelectronics or related field. 3.2 GPA preferred, 3.0 minimum      #NSBE2020       Carrier is An Equal   Opportunity/Affirmative   Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.     Job Applicant's Privacy Notice:    Click on this link to read the Job Applicant's Privacy Notice 

 *<br/>In just 10 years, by 2030, 50% of school-aged children will be failing or not enrolled in schools. Education is the biggest human rights / civil rights issue of this generation. We are optimizing learning for kids with special needs by focusing on their caregivers and technology that increases all levels of learning.   Overview   SmartCourse.io is a NEW (November 2019) EdTech and HealthTech startup that offers digital products and services, like online courses and coaching programs, to educate kids with special needs and their caregivers (e.g. parents, educators, medical professionals, and other caregivers).   Ultimately, we’re going to revolutionize the education system for these kids through a collaborative platform that connects all kids and caregivers together in order to monitor and iterate on progress effectively. Leading to healthier families, stronger academics, and more ambitious and fulfilled students.   Part-time/full-time roles will focus on academics, technology, curricula, and research as well as animation, videography, graphic design, UX/UI, digital marketing, sales copywriting, high-ticket selling, fundraising development, and agile project management. Roles continue to change as we progress. While the projects are rooted in customer discovery and research, they will involve strategy, innovation, operational consistency, and the ability to work in autonomous teams.   For an immediate start; Dates are negotiable throughout the year.   We are looking for both interns and early-stage employees to join the team full-time in exchange for a kickass learning experience, commission, bonuses, profit-share, and/or an equity-based payment plan depending on your value add (determined over a trial period and discussed on an individual basis.)   We’re based in NYC, but all positions can be entirely remote and we’ve had many outstanding colleagues all over the world.    Internship Features    High-Impact Work Experience   Want to help change the landscape of education, education technology, and HealthTech for kids with special needs? Our goal is to not only develop technology for different learners and their caregivers but to develop strategies and technologies for the entire sectors that would eventually be used by all students.   Want to get on the bottom floor of a new social cause startup? Create societal good with measurable impact while exponentially growing market valuation. Join a startup team with a serial entrepreneur founder who built and helped build over a dozen 6-figure businesses, one of which was another startup with over $2 million of funding commitment, and all of them launched within less than 1 year. The goal is to prove this new model and raise $2.5M in less than 1 year.   Join as a founding team member, get equity, and grow rapidly with us. In his 4 previous startups, all staff members were cultivated and recruited from volunteer/ intern positions.    Leadership Development   SmartCourse.io wants leaders who follow, not followers or leaders who do not follow. We cultivate a culture of autonomy, growth mindedness, individual and group empowerment, selflessness, fearlessness, perseverance, and fun.   Members must be able to use (or learn to use quickly) relevant technology and methodologies: project management (Agile Methodology YCombinator-style & Asana), knowledge management (Google Suite), and communication tools (Slack). They must be able to identify obstacles and seek and recommend solutions. Must be disciplined, goal-focused individuals who can assess situations and make on-the-spot decisions that affect multiple aspects of the organization.   You must want to work in an organization that is fueled by passion, led by strong, experienced, leaders, but with the flair of a startup. Suits and ties need not apply. Only those who are willing to do anything it takes to succeed are welcomed. It is not about titles or badges.    Career Support   SmartCourse welcomes interns who want to stay with the organization after the internship, as opportunities available. As we grow, Smart Course hopes to offer plenty of potential opportunities. We strive for a model of 2/3 promotion from within, and 1/3 from outside. All previous startup staff were volunteers or interns first.    Qualifications   Must have at least 2 years of professional work experience or equivalent (e.g. research, internships, demonstrated skill)   Takes ownership of projects, OKRs & KPIs, and delivers in advance of deadlines   Embodies our core values of selflessness, fearlessness, and perseverance   Has a track record of success in academic and professional settings   Displays exceptional interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills (proactive communication)   Has a passion for social change, learning, education, healthcare, technology, and/ or startups   Is skilled (or wishes to be) in Foosball, Pacman Smash air hockey, Super Smash Bros. Ultimate, and/or Pop-a-Shot (for when we get an office)    About the Organization   SmartCourse is a NEW high growth, accelerated, technology-based, social venture optimizing education and healthcare for kids with special needs and their caregivers. Smart Course’s digital products educate caregivers, like parents, educators, and medical professionals, on how to best care for and teach kids with special needs so that they can meet their social, behavioral, and academic goals.  We plan to improve learning theory to shorten learning time, increase knowledge retention (and thus increase test scores and grades), increase engagement, and increase satisfaction in a measurable fashion. Currently, most EdTech optimizes or adapts content. Instead, we will optimize the overall experience for the learner, not just the content, in a simple clear manner. We plan to make technologies that optimize individual learning and caregiving for schools, parents, and the healthcare marketplace (B2B and/or B2G). We also plan to offer our products to large enterprises (e.g. Amazon, Walmart, etc.) to include them as part of their health benefits for their employees with special needs or with family members who have special needs.  Ever present is the end in mind: revolutionizing the education system for all kids everywhere since the whole world will soon have access to the internet. We are already working with:  world-leading medical professionals (e.g. psychiatrists, psychologists, behavioral therapists, etc.)   educators (e.g. school admins, special education teachers, etc.)   startup mentors, advisors, and incubators/accelerators (e.g. Teachable’s EdTech Incubator, Startup Boost’s Pre-Accelerator, Hubspot’s Growth Accelerator, HealthVenture’s HealthTech accelerator, and the world's largest EdTech accelerator: StartEd) Our advisers include professors, researchers, EdTech founders, product managers and startup funders.    Snapshot Status   Strong membership team (startup advising thought leadership, EdTech & HealthTech development, curricula development, media, marketing, product, operations, and sales) (a very gender, ethnic, and experientially diverse team)   Pioneering the special needs + tech academic space (2 conferences led, currently in process: online courses on ADHD in Middle School and ADHD in High School   EdTech modeling in progress, wireframing, focusing on UX/UI and prototyping, and then off to development/coding team while modeling group focuses on live data collection and collaboration, technology learning theories, UX/UI, advanced prototyping, and fine-tuning adaptations   curricula modeling alpha set of lessons (academic, standards, and integrated fashion) with over 46 lessons complete   developing framework for diagnostic assessments; working to model.   marketing rebrand (animation and websites)   Planning to fundraise, developing crowdfunding, angels, family office, and grant proposals   Advisory board activated; developing more   3 products (AIMS Summit, AIMS Online Course & ADHD Membership launched and profitable (https://SmartCourse.io/products)   Application  We are seeking 5 early-stage members, 1 potential technical co-founder, and 10-15 interns, [PLEASE NOTE, For internships it is a rolling application.]  Help us solve education’s failures for kids with special needs.  We’re recruiting all across the organization so you might be interested in: research, media, content marketing, product management, UI/UX design, full stack web development, recruiting, accounting, legal, project management, agile methodology, just to name a few. We could use help in all departments, so this is a rare opportunity to get in on the ground floor and secure an executive position.  For more information about us please visit:  - https://smartcourse.io  - http://bit.ly/sc-identity  We are all truly inspired by your interest, alignment, and professional caliber.] [Updated 10/20]<br/>*  Some skills of particular interest include:  RESEARCH:  Experience in psychology/psychiatry/neuroscience/learning and attention disorders   Comfortable being on video and presenting content (excellent English verbal communication and camera presence)   Conducting evidence-based research on special needs and learning disabilities/vetting authoritative sources   Key-word research and mapping   Synthesize complex scientific articles into an easily digestible format   Write scripts from that complex information in a succinct, simplified (Layman's Terms), and entertaining way   Create customer discovery surveys that would effectively collect demographic and psychographic information, be able to present that in a concise, quantifiable way, and be able to suggest actions for Smart Course to take based on those insights   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   MEDIA:  Animation and motion graphics (Adobe Aftereffects preferred)   Videography and Video Editing (Adobe Premiere and iMovie preferred)   Graphic design (Adobe illustrator, Photoshop, and Canva preferred)   Basic understanding of marketing on Youtube and Pinterest (For thumbnails and video uploads)   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   MARKETING:  Market Research, Business Development (Customer Discovery)   Understanding of Digital Marketing on YouTube, Pinterest, LinkedIn, Twitter, and Facebook   Skills in email marketing (Active Campaign and HubSpot)   Auditing a marketing funnel using Google Analytics and Google Tag Manager   Basic understanding of conversation rate optimization   Comfortable cold-calling and cold-emailing   Sales copywriting and blogging   Branding strategy   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   PRODUCT:  Full-Stack Developer with HTML, CSS, Javascript (React, Redux, Node, Database Experience (Express MongoDB or SQL) preferred)   JavaScript Fullstack Web Dev / Front End Web Development   UI/UX design, Wix Web Design   WordPress expertise   Collecting product insights through customer discovery   Product management / agile development experience   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   OPERATIONS:  Market Research, Business Development, and Customer Discovery   Project Management using agile methodology   Team Building and Recruiting (HR skills preferred)   Human Resources and Operations (Highly organized in design thinking for internal processes)   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   Some reasons you might be interested:  You want to hone your creative media skills, UI/UX design, or full stack web development skills and see how they perform in a business context   You are looking to start your own company, dive into entrepreneurship, or want a fast-tracked career towards an executive position (e.g. Dev Ops)   You want to bring your interests in child development, research, education, or clinical work into a more applied setting and translate it into actions that are directly relevant to families   You want to collect data from parents, practice data analysis skills, and present findings in relevant settings   You want to meet and network with leading professionals in the field (educational psychologists, clinical psychologists, educational specialists, etc.)   You want to get involved in the Education Technology and/or Healthcare Technology / MedTech spaces which are growing exponentially, especially for students with special needs   You’re interested in entrepreneurship, startups, and/or technology and want to put your interests to good use   For this role, although experience with WordPress is required, we are also looking for fearlessness, perseverance, selflessness, a deep desire to learn, and a commitment to the cause.  Our goals moving forward would be to continue partnering with organizations, influencers, or professionals that speak to caregivers of kids with ADHD and market Smart Course’s products and resources nationally with the help of a WordPress specialist, in order to become the go-to authority for online education and healthcare in the space.  We’ll be growing very quickly over the next semester.  If you might be interested in hearing more about this, we'd appreciate the opportunity to meet you.  We look forward to hearing from you,  Adrien Harrison  Founder & CEO | Smart Course | smartcourse.io  *commission will be determined during the interview process  Job Types: Full-time, Internship, Commission  Pay: Up to $500.00 per month  Experience:  WordPress: 1 year (Required)  HTML5: 1 year (Required)  CSS3: 1 year (Required)  PHP: 1 year (Required)  JavaScript: 1 year (Required)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Work Remotely:  Yes  

 *<br/>In just 10 years, by 2030, 50% of school-aged children will be failing or not enrolled in schools. Education is the biggest human rights / civil rights issue of this generation. We are optimizing learning for kids with special needs by focusing on their caregivers and technology that increases all levels of learning.   Overview    SmartCourse.io is a NEW (November 2019) EdTech and HealthTech startup that offers digital products and services, like online courses and coaching programs, to educate kids with special needs and their caregivers (e.g. parents, educators, medical professionals, and other caregivers).   Ultimately, we’re going to revolutionize the education system for these kids through a collaborative platform that connects all kids and caregivers together in order to monitor and iterate on progress effectively. Leading to healthier families, stronger academics, and more ambitious and fulfilled students.   Part-time/full-time roles will focus on academics, technology, curricula, and research as well as animation, videography, graphic design, UX/UI, digital marketing, sales copywriting, high-ticket selling, fundraising development, and agile project management. Roles continue to change as we progress. While the projects are rooted in customer discovery and research, they will involve strategy, innovation, operational consistency, and the ability to work in autonomous teams.   For an immediate start; Dates are negotiable throughout the year.   We are looking for both interns and early-stage employees to join the team full-time in exchange for a kickass learning experience, commission, bonuses, profit-share, and/or an equity-based payment plan depending on your value add (determined over a trial period and discussed on an individual basis.)   We’re based in NYC, but all positions can be entirely remote and we’ve had many outstanding colleagues all over the world.    Internship Features    High-Impact Work Experience   Want to help change the landscape of education, education technology, and HealthTech for kids with special needs? Our goal is to not only develop technology for different learners and their caregivers but to develop strategies and technologies for the entire sectors that would eventually be used by all students.   Want to get on the bottom floor of a new social cause startup? Create societal good with measurable impact while exponentially growing market valuation. Join a startup team with a serial entrepreneur founder who built and helped build over a dozen 6-figure businesses, one of which was another startup with over $2 million of funding commitment, and all of them launched within less than 1 year. The goal is to prove this new model and raise $2.5M in less than 1 year.   Join as a founding team member, get equity, and grow rapidly with us. In his 4 previous startups, all staff members were cultivated and recruited from volunteer/ intern positions.    Leadership Development   SmartCourse.io wants leaders who follow, not followers or leaders who do not follow. We cultivate a culture of autonomy, growth mindedness, individual and group empowerment, selflessness, fearlessness, perseverance, and fun.   Members must be able to use (or learn to use quickly) relevant technology and methodologies: project management (Agile Methodology YCombinator-style & Asana), knowledge management (Google Suite), and communication tools (Slack). They must be able to identify obstacles and seek and recommend solutions. Must be disciplined, goal-focused individuals who can assess situations and make on-the-spot decisions that affect multiple aspects of the organization.   You must want to work in an organization that is fueled by passion, led by strong, experienced, leaders, but with the flair of a startup. Suits and ties need not apply. Only those who are willing to do anything it takes to succeed are welcomed. It is not about titles or badges.    Career Support   SmartCourse welcomes interns who want to stay with the organization after the internship, as opportunities available. As we grow, Smart Course hopes to offer plenty of potential opportunities. We strive for a model of 2/3 promotion from within, and 1/3 from outside. All previous startup staff were volunteers or interns first.    Qualifications   Must have at least 2 years of professional work experience or equivalent (e.g. research, internships, demonstrated skill)   Takes ownership of projects, OKRs & KPIs, and delivers in advance of deadlines   Embodies our core values of selflessness, fearlessness, and perseverance   Has a track record of success in academic and professional settings   Displays exceptional interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills (proactive communication)   Has a passion for social change, learning, education, healthcare, technology, and/ or startups   Is skilled (or wishes to be) in Foosball, Pacman Smash air hockey, Super Smash Bros. Ultimate, and/or Pop-a-Shot (for when we get an office)    About the Organization   SmartCourse is a NEW high growth, accelerated, technology-based, social venture optimizing education and healthcare for kids with special needs and their caregivers. Smart Course’s digital products educate caregivers, like parents, educators, and medical professionals, on how to best care for and teach kids with special needs so that they can meet their social, behavioral, and academic goals.  We plan to improve learning theory to shorten learning time, increase knowledge retention (and thus increase test scores and grades), increase engagement, and increase satisfaction in a measurable fashion. Currently, most EdTech optimizes or adapts content. Instead, we will optimize the overall experience for the learner, not just the content, in a simple clear manner. We plan to make technologies that optimize individual learning and caregiving for schools, parents, and the healthcare marketplace (B2B and/or B2G). We also plan to offer our products to large enterprises (e.g. Amazon, Walmart, etc.) to include them as part of their health benefits for their employees with special needs or with family members who have special needs.  Ever present is the end in mind: revolutionizing the education system for all kids everywhere since the whole world will soon have access to the internet. We are already working with:  world-leading medical professionals (e.g. psychiatrists, psychologists, behavioral therapists, etc.)   educators (e.g. school admins, special education teachers, etc.)   startup mentors, advisors, and incubators/accelerators (e.g. Teachable’s EdTech Incubator, Startup Boost’s Pre-Accelerator, Hubspot’s Growth Accelerator, HealthVenture’s HealthTech accelerator, and the world's largest EdTech accelerator: StartEd) Our advisers include professors, researchers, EdTech founders, product managers and startup funders.    Snapshot Status   Strong membership team (startup advising thought leadership, EdTech & HealthTech development, curricula development, media, marketing, product, operations, and sales) (a very gender, ethnic, and experientially diverse team)   Pioneering the special needs + tech academic space (2 conferences led, currently in process: online courses on ADHD in Middle School and ADHD in High School   EdTech modeling in progress, wireframing, focusing on UX/UI and prototyping, and then off to development/coding team while modeling group focuses on live data collection and collaboration, technology learning theories, UX/UI, advanced prototyping, and fine-tuning adaptations   curricula modeling alpha set of lessons (academic, standards, and integrated fashion) with over 46 lessons complete   developing framework for diagnostic assessments; working to model.   marketing rebrand (animation and websites)   Planning to fundraise, developing crowdfunding, angels, family office, and grant proposals   Advisory board activated; developing more   3 products (AIMS Summit, AIMS Online Course & ADHD Membership launched and profitable (https://SmartCourse.io/products)   Application  We are seeking 5 early-stage members, 1 potential technical co-founder, and 10-15 interns, [PLEASE NOTE, For internships it is a rolling application.]  Help us solve education’s failures for kids with special needs.  We’re recruiting all across the organization so you might be interested in: research, media, content marketing, product management, UI/UX design, full stack web development, recruiting, accounting, legal, project management, agile methodology, just to name a few. We could use help in all departments, so this is a rare opportunity to get in on the ground floor and secure an executive position.  For more information about us please visit:  - https://smartcourse.io  - http://bit.ly/sc-identity  We are all truly inspired by your interest, alignment, and professional caliber.] [Updated 10/20]<br/>*  Some skills of particular interest include:  RESEARCH:  Experience in psychology/psychiatry/neuroscience/learning and attention disorders   Comfortable being on video and presenting content (excellent English verbal communication and camera presence)   Conducting evidence-based research on special needs and learning disabilities/vetting authoritative sources   Key-word research and mapping   Synthesize complex scientific articles into an easily digestible format   Write scripts from that complex information in a succinct, simplified (Layman's Terms), and entertaining way   Create customer discovery surveys that would effectively collect demographic and psychographic information, be able to present that in a concise, quantifiable way, and be able to suggest actions for Smart Course to take based on those insights   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   MEDIA:  Animation and motion graphics (Adobe Aftereffects preferred)   Videography and Video Editing (Adobe Premiere and iMovie preferred)   Graphic design (Adobe illustrator, Photoshop, and Canva preferred)   Basic understanding of marketing on Youtube and Pinterest (For thumbnails and video uploads)   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   MARKETING:  Market Research, Business Development (Customer Discovery)   Understanding of Digital Marketing on YouTube, Pinterest, LinkedIn, Twitter, and Facebook   Skills in email marketing (Active Campaign and HubSpot)   Auditing a marketing funnel using Google Analytics and Google Tag Manager   Basic understanding of conversation rate optimization   Comfortable cold-calling and cold-emailing   Sales copywriting and blogging   Branding strategy   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   PRODUCT:  Full-Stack Developer with HTML, CSS, Javascript (React, Redux, Node, Database Experience (Express MongoDB or SQL) preferred)   JavaScript Fullstack Web Dev / Front End Web Development   UI/UX design, Wix Web Design   WordPress expertise   Collecting product insights through customer discovery   Product management / agile development experience   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   OPERATIONS:  Market Research, Business Development, and Customer Discovery   Project Management using agile methodology   Team Building and Recruiting (HR skills preferred)   Human Resources and Operations (Highly organized in design thinking for internal processes)   Willing to do Customer Service / Customer Support experience   Some reasons you might be interested:  You want to hone your creative media skills, UI/UX design, or full stack web development skills and see how they perform in a business context   You are looking to start your own company, dive into entrepreneurship, or want a fast-tracked career towards an executive position (e.g. Dev Ops)   You want to bring your interests in child development, research, education, or clinical work into a more applied setting and translate it into actions that are directly relevant to families   You want to collect data from parents, practice data analysis skills, and present findings in relevant settings   You want to meet and network with leading professionals in the field (educational psychologists, clinical psychologists, educational specialists, etc.)   You want to get involved in the Education Technology and/or Healthcare Technology / MedTech spaces which are growing exponentially, especially for students with special needs   You’re interested in entrepreneurship, startups, and/or technology and want to put your interests to good use   For this role, although experience in full stack web development is necessary, experience with WordPress or NoCode solutions is desirable, we are also looking for fearlessness, perseverance, selflessness, a deep desire to learn, and a commitment to the cause.  Our goals moving forward would be to continue partnering with organizations, influencers, or professionals that speak to parents of kids with ADHD and market Smart Course’s products and resources nationally with the help of a full stack developer, web developer, wordpress specialist, no code specialist, agile developer / product scrum master, and/or product manager, in order to become the go-to authority for online education and healthcare in the space.  We’ll be growing very quickly over the next semester.  If you might be interested in hearing more about this, we'd appreciate the opportunity to meet you.  We look forward to hearing from you,  Adrien Harrison  Founder & CEO | Smart Course | smartcourse.io  *commission will be determined during the interview process  Job Types: Full-time, Internship, Contract  Pay: Up to $500.00 per month  Experience:  Web Development: 1 year (Required)  Agile Development: 1 year (Preferred)  Database: 1 year (Preferred)  HTML: 1 year (Required)  React: 1 year (Preferred)  JavaScript: 1 year (Preferred)  Redux: 1 year (Preferred)  CSS: 1 year (Preferred)  Node: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19  

     We're looking for Ph.D. candidates to intern during summer 2021 (12 weeks). You will be embedded in a team and work closely with other data scientists, engineers, and product managers under the supervision of a data scientist on that team.    About the Role    We are hiring interns to work on the Global Marketing, Policy Economics, and Core Analytics &amp; Science teams. Read on to learn more about these three teams.   (1)  Marketing  data science informs decisions across Uber's global marketing efforts, accelerating both demand and supply growth worldwide. We leverage advanced statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques in a scalable manner including large scale data processing such as Spark, Hive, and Uber's proprietary machine learning platform, and more. Interns on the team will work on projects such as:   Assisting in prototyping causal inference methods and econometric models to inform the efficiency of our marketing spend   Building propensity models to aid in the growth and profitability of different Uber products (Uber Rides Pass, Eats pass, etc.)   Architecting a recommendation system to understand cuisine preferences at a user-level   Standardizing marketing models and enhancing their scalability and stability through platformization    Identifying and implementing improvements to our bid, budget and creative optimization algorithms on Uber's advertising channels like Google, Facebook, etc.    (2) The  Policy Economics  team conducts research that forms the foundation for business decisions and our policy positions and helps policymakers, thought leaders, and the general public gain a better understanding of our platform. This team sits under the Policy, Research and Economics team; led by the Chief Economist, we are responsible for addressing the thorny policy and business challenges impacting Uber globally. As a data scientist intern on this team, you would be expected to bring analytical and empirical rigor to bear on important questions relating to the changing nature of work and the economics of marketplaces.   (3) The  Core Analytics   &amp;   Science  (CAS) team covers both of Uber's main lines of business as well as the underlying platform technologies that power those businesses. We are a key part of Uber's cross-functional product development teams, helping to drive every stage of product development through data analytic, statistical, and algorithmic expertise. Here are the subteams within CAS that make it happen:    Eats:  Uber Eats is Uber's ambitious and rapidly growing on-demand food delivery business currently operating in over 45 countries globally and is the largest outside of China. Eat is a 3-sided marketplace, comprising Eaters, Delivery Partners, and Restaurants. Eats interns will work on exciting and impactful projects that advance our algorithms and discover insights to improve engagement with eaters, merchants, and couriers. Projects include optimizing our eater pricing systems and routing algorithms, modeling and predicting eater and courier behavior on the platform, and improving the efficiency of user acquisition, promotions, courier experience, and merchant onboarding.    Rides : Rides Data Science at Uber uses data to improve and automate Uber's core ridesharing products. Rides interns will tackle problems such as optimizing Uber's short and long term pricing systems; efficiently matching incoming trip requests in Uber's dispatch system; developing innovative incentive schemes that reward riders and drivers for choosing our network; optimizing pickup and dropoff experiences for both riders and drivers, and developing algorithms and experimentation to make our rider and driver user experience stand out. We also forecast, monitor, and evaluate all aspects of our marketplace and user behavior using both large scale observational data and meticulous experimentation.    Platform:  Platform Data Science develops the common systems and technical foundations that power Uber's trip experiences externally and core decision making systems internally. Interns on the Platform team will work on building statistical, machine learning, and optimization models for problems like travel time estimation, route optimization, search personalization, and ranking.     What You'll Do    Work with your mentor closely to scope a project, define the problem, and develop and prototype the solution using data-driven approaches   Work with engineers and product managers to turn data science prototypes into robust, reliable solutions   Present findings to business leaders to inform decisions   Establish standard methodologies for data science including modeling, coding, analytics, optimization, and experimentation   Conduct experiments to advise product decisions     Basic Qualifications    Current Ph.D. student majoring in Computer Science, Economics, Statistics, Machine Learning, Operations Research, or other quantitative fields   Knowledge of underlying mathematical foundations of statistics, machine learning, optimization, economics, and analytics   Experience with exploratory data analysis, statistical analysis, testing, and model development   Proficiency in languages like SQL, R, and Python     Preferred Qualifications    Anticipated graduation between winter 2021-summer 2022   Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and business partners   Research mentality with a bias towards action to structure a project from idea to experimentation to prototype to implementation   Experience in experimental design and analysis (e.g., A/B and market-level experiments), as well as causal inference   Independence, excellent communication, and outstanding follow-through - you energetically tackle your work and love the responsibility of being individually empowered    At Uber, we ignite opportunity by setting the world in motion. We take on big problems to help drivers, riders, delivery partners, and eaters get moving in more than 600 cities around the world.   We welcome people from all backgrounds who seek the opportunity to help build a future where everyone and everything can move independently. If you have a curiosity, passion, and collaborative spirit, work with us, and let's move the world forward, together.   Uber is proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements.   If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing the form. 

  Auto req ID:  213045BR <br><h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Description  </h2>  We are PepsiCo  <br><br> PepsiCo is a global food and beverage leader operating in more than 200 countries and territories with a product portfolio that includes 22 world-famous, billion-dollar brands. From Gatorade to Quaker, LIFEWTR to Lay&rsquo;s, we make hundreds of enjoyable foods and beverages that are loved throughout the world. <br><br> Guiding PepsiCo is our vision to be the global leader in convenient foods and beverages by Winning with Purpose. &ldquo;Winning with Purpose&rdquo; reflects our ambition to win sustainably in the marketplace and embed purpose into all aspects of the business. <br><br> Our employees drive our culture. No two days are the same; we&rsquo;re dynamic and full of passionate teams embracing new ideas through our collaborative spirit. At PepsiCo, what makes you unique, makes us better! <br><br> Functional Description:  <br><br> PepsiCo operates in an environment undergoing immense and rapid change, driven by eCommerce and emergent retail technologies. To ensure continued success in the food and beverage space, PepsiCo has assembled a dedicated eCommerce team &ndash; tasked with optimizing eCommerce operations and developing innovations that will give PepsiCo a sustainable competitive advantage. While tied closely to broader PepsiCo, the eCommerce group more closely resembles a start-up environment; embracing the core values of having bias for action, being results oriented, maintaining a community-focus, and prioritizing people. <br> PepsiCo&rsquo;s Data Science and Analytics group is a team of data scientists, technology specialists, and business innovators who operate within eCommerce to build industry-leading systems and solutions. By focusing on machine learning and automation, the Data Science &amp; Analytics group is pushing the bounds of possibility for PepsiCo and its strategic partners.<br><br>  Build machine learning systems to understand the cross-channel grocery ecosystem   Perform statistical analysis across diverse datasets to drive and measure performance   Work with PepsiCo&rsquo;s strategic partners to expand their technical capabilities, thereby creating a more robust data environment   Utilize natural language understanding techniques to uncover insights from contextual data   Develop scalable tools to drive automation and optimize business operations   As a Data Science Intern, you will play a critical role in executing the global ecommerce growth agenda. You will be tasked with identifying, designing, and implementing data science/machine learning solutions to business problems. You will collaborate with the larger data science and analytics teams to create a robust, shared codebase; on which PepsiCo will build automated eCommerce systems. You will work with internal business stakeholders and strategic partners to identify opportunities for collaborative development and foster a data-driven culture between relevant teams.   <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Qualifications/Requirements  </h2>  What we&rsquo;re looking for:<br> <br>  Work with the larger data science team to analyze large data sets and develop custom models/algorithms to uncover trends, patterns and insights   Write clean, organized machine learning code using standard software engineering methodologies   Provide critical thought leadership to enhance organizational capabilities by utilizing big and small data; work with DSA team members to identify and execute on opportunities for enhancement   <br> What you can expect:  <br> Participation in high-visibility Data Science projects in collaboration with a data science/analytics team with a large impact on a global organization   Projects range from geo-temporal analysis, conditional forecasting, unsupervised opportunity analysis, and reinforcement learning optimization systems   Specific tasks assigned will be collaborative, and will depend on a combination of business need, team prioritization, and the intern&rsquo;s personal interest/expertise.   Opportunities to propose new/incremental tasks to suit business use cases   Quick release cycle and managing the technical aspect of multiple projects simultaneously as they develop   Meet with non-data science business stakeholders to set expectations and design products based on business needs   <br> Roles available in the following locations: New York, New York <br><br> Minimum Qualifications:  <br> Master&rsquo;s degree completed within one (1) year of internship completion   Development experience in Python, Java, C or equivalent programming language   Experience and or familiarity NumPy, Pandas, Pytorch, PostgresSQL, MSSQL, MySQL   Experience using Tensorflow to design custom deep learning systems   Expert in mathematical models underlying data science methods, understanding the trade-offs between different solutions   Experience in designing systems to solve business problems   Demonstrated ability to effectively and concisely communicate with both business and technical audiences   All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> PepsiCo is an Equal Opportunity Employer: Female / Minority / Disability / Protected Veteran / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity <br><br> Our Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, and all other applicable laws, including but not limited to, San Francisco Police Code Sections 4901-4919, commonly referred to as the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance; and Chapter XVII, Article 9 of the Los Angeles Municipal Code, commonly referred to as the Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance. <br><br> If you'd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please download the available EEO is the Law &amp; EEO is the Law Supplement documents. View PepsiCo EEO Policy . <br><br> Please view our Pay Transparency Statement    Relocation Eligible:  Not Eligible for Relocation<br><br><br><br> All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br><br> PepsiCo is an Equal Opportunity Employer: Female / Minority / Disability / Protected Veteran / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity <br><br> Our Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, and all other applicable laws, including but not limited to, San Francisco Police Code Sections 4901 - 4919, commonly referred to as the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance; and Chapter XVII, Article 9 of the Los Angeles Municipal Code, commonly referred to as the Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance. <br><br> If you'd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please download the available EEO is the Law &amp; EEO is the Law Supplement documents. View PepsiCo EEO Policy <br><br> Please view our Pay Transparency Statement

   EDUCATION   Working towards a degree in Mathematics, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or Computer Science <br>       COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS   Detail oriented  Strong analytical skills  Knowledge of DevOps tools like Ansible, Docker  Knowledge of Python, Java, C++, and Excel<br> Knowledge of test automation tools like TestComplete and Selenium.  Knowledge of Windows 10 and MS SQL and MongoDB  Knowledge of the software development life cycle phases  Excellent communication skills  Knowledge of QA Methodologies will be a plus. <br>     WORK EXPERIENCE   Prior experience in test automation and Quality Assurance field is an asset  

    The Rockefeller Foundation seeks a 2021 Summer Intern to join the Data &amp; Technology team.   We value our Summer Interns and want to invest in and mentor future leaders who will grow personally and professionally and create impact in the philanthropic sector. As a Summer Intern at The Rockefeller Foundation you will have the chance to contribute to our initiatives through engaging, meaningful work assignments.    This position is open only to undergraduate students (rising seniors).    A cover letter is required.   The 2021 summer program will run 10-12 weeks, with exact dates to be determined.   We are currently fully remote, but when restrictions ease, this position will be based in the New York office.     Principal Duties and Responsibilities    As part of the Statistics and Machine Learning team, you will collaborate closely with Data Scientists to implement compelling, usable UIs and contribute to their design.   Work across the stack to deliver new features from start-to-finish.   Implement web or mobile interfaces using XHTML, CSS, and JavaScript.     Education, Experience and Skills    Currently enrolled in a computer science, or related undergraduate degree program (rising seniors only).   Experience using Python.   Experience in experience with web technologies: JavaScript, XHTML, CSS.   Knowledge of React.   You value code simplicity, performance and details.   You are familiar with data structures and algorithms, profiling and optimization.   Comfortable working with remote teams.   Committed to the mission of the Foundation, to inclusion, equity and diversity in every aspect of your work, and to challenging conventional wisdom through evidence, reason, and amplifying dissenting, unconventional, and marginalized voices.    <br>  As an organization, we focus on six values to advance our culture and to continue our success. We are dedicated to being  Transparent ,  Optimistic ,  Accountable ,  Collaborative ,  Trusted  and  Equitable . We operate from a strong commitment to equity, diversity and inclusion in everything that we do. It&rsquo;s not only the right thing to do &ndash; we couldn&rsquo;t make an impact without the diverse perspectives and experiences of our team members. We expect all employees at the Foundation to contribute by developing their unique perspective and talent, and to challenge conventional wisdom through evidence and reason, and by amplifying marginalized voices.   The Rockefeller Foundation is committed to the principles of equal employment opportunity and to compliance with all federal, state, and local laws concerning employment discrimination, including the Americans with Disabilities Act. To this end, the Foundation ensures equal opportunity to all employees and applicants regardless of race, color, age, gender, sexual orientation, religion, marital status, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, lawful alien status, physical, mental, and medical disability, veteran status or liability for service in the United States Armed Forces.    The Rockefeller Foundation is an Equal Opportunity Employer.  

   Date Posted:   2020-08-18-07:00   Country:   United States of America   Location:   CANHQ: CCS HQ - Syracuse, NY 6304 Thompson Rd, Syracuse, NY, 13221 USA  Built on Willis Carrier&rsquo;s invention of modern air conditioning in 1902, Carrier is a world leader in heating, air-conditioning and refrigeration solutions. We constantly build upon our history of proven innovation with new products and services that improve global comfort and efficiency. Today, Carrier needs your talent to build upon this legacy and create solutions that matter for people and our planet.     Our global Engineering team is evolving to maintain Carrier&rsquo;s lead position in the market through investments in advanced research, technologies, and methods that will shape the future of our products and services. As part of this transformation, we are hiring and empowering early career talent to help us innovate and pursue sustainable solutions for our customers.     Position Summary:   The Carrier Engineering Internship Program provides opportunities to demonstrate technical and leadership capabilities and to make meaningful contributions to technical projects. In addition to challenging project work, the Carrier Engineering Internship will develop your skills through training and mentoring and enable you to get involved in employee resource groups that celebrate our diverse employees globally.     The Carrier Engineering Internship Program also serves as a feeder to the prestigious Willis Carrier Engineering Leadership Program and Graduate Hire Program for students completing undergraduate programs at competitive universities.     During your time in the program, you will have the opportunity to build your technical and leadership skills within one of the following or similar areas: Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering, or Software Engineering.     Sample Job Responsibilities:   Participate in Agile/Scrum software development process   Analyze software requirements and create innovative solutions for them   Contribute to full lifecycle application development   Design and develop web-based software applications and components in various software languages   Evaluate and identify new technologies for use by the software and engineering teams      Experience / Qualifications:   US Citizen or Permanent Resident   Proactive and results-driven; thrives in a fast-paced and dynamic environment   Excellent analytical and communication skills   Demonstrated technical skills in engineering, software/systems, UI design, data analytics and modeling, networking or cybersecurity   Excellent verbal, writing, and presentation communication skills   Ability to lead and work with integrity to achieve results as part of multidisciplinary teams in a global environment      Education:   The ideal candidate will be at least a sophomore, junior or senior pursuing a Bachelor`s degree in Engineering or STEM with 1-3 years of similar co-op/intern or work experience.   3.2 GPA preferred, 3.0 minimum      #NSBE2020     #EarlyCareers     Carrier is An Equal   Opportunity/Affirmative   Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status, age or any other federally protected class.     Job Applicant's Privacy Notice:    Click on this link to read the Job Applicant's Privacy Notice 

    The United Nations Office for Disarmament Affairs (UNODA) is seeking for qualified interns for a maximum internship of 6 months, depending on the needs of UNODA and the willingness of applicant.<br><br> UNODA provides substantive and organizational support to various United Nations bodies in the area of disarmament. <br><br> The Office is mandated to provide objective, impartial and up-to-date information on disarmament issues and activities to Member States, States parties to multilateral agreements, intergovernmental organizations and institutions, departments and agencies of the United Nations system, research and educational institutions, civil society, especially non-governmental organizations, the media and the general public. For more information visit: https://www.un.org/disarmament/<br><br> The internship is unpaid and full-time. Interns work five days per week (35 hours) under the supervision of a professional staff member in UNODA to whom they are assigned. The incumbent reports to the Chief of the Regional Disarmament Information and Outreach Branch.  Responsibilities  The Intern will support the development and implementation of ODA's Information Technology (IT) services and systems, <br><br> Responsibilities will depend on the individual&rsquo;s background, strength, and interest. <br><br> Duties may include, but are not limited to: <br> Maintains ODA's flagship website content, which is content driven, device responsive, and multilingual  Assist the ODA's Information Outreach Branch in preparing and organizing events  Conceptualizes and prepares and coordinates the development of new content in websites   Prepares and incorporates graphics and multimedia content using open source graphic/video editing tools   Maintains and develop ODA's campaign and outreach website products  Assists in the development of surveys and the analysis of the results  Assists in the development and maintenance of e-learning platform and material  <br> Build a project based on the intern's interests using cutting edge technologies available in the market (e.g. cloud computing, big data, machine-learning, analytics/visualization, etc.). The project shall be relevant to the UN's core business of peace and security, using the available cloud-based resources. 

 Overview:   Our internship program focuses on bringing in the best and brightest top talent from universities across the country who can &quot;think outside the box&quot; and thrive on finding ways to address business challenges. Our Summer Internship runs for 10-12 weeks and you will be exposed to project management and field operations experiences that will help you see your future career in Construction Management. If you are interested in being on a job-site and learning from the best in the business, please apply to our internship program.

     Who We Are:  New York Air Brake has been serving the rail industry since 1890 with innovative train control systems. Headquartered in Watertown, New York, with operations in Nixa &amp; Kansas City, Missouri; Irving, Texas; West Chicago, Illinois and a brand new, state-of-the-art manufacturing facility in Salisbury, North Carolina. Known for innovation, quality, customer focus, and safety, NYAB continues to grow and offer career opportunities in a people-first environment. <br>    This is your opportunity to make a big impact on improving the quality of how the latest generation of locomotive and freight car braking systems are manufactured. Co-op opportunity for Mechanical, Industrial or Manufacturing Engineering majors with a GPA of 3.0 or higher. You can expect challenging work and an insiders view into your future profession. You will work as an individual and as part of a project team, while receiving regular feedback in preparation for a final presentation to company leaders. <br>     Responsibilities could include:   Collaborate with production teams to reduce cost and improve product quality  Team collaboration support including; analyzing work processes to identify opportunities to improve efficiency, balance work cell load, reduce defects, implement tooling, resolve technical issues and improve product flow.  Further research and development of existing products and technologies  Gather and coordinate data for engineers  Assist engineers with appropriate design details  <br>     What We Offer:  Our internships are not all work. NYAB is located in Watertown, New York. When not working, spend your free time hiking the Adirondack Mountains, kayaking the many waterways, enjoying the beaches of Lake Ontario or exploring the history, food and fun the Thousand Islands Region has to offer. You are just a short drive to World Class Casino&rsquo;s, Golf, Shopping and the award winning Finger Lakes Wine Country. Our interns begin work as early as the end of May and work up until the middle of August. Expect 40 hours per week and a competitive salary (based on experience and position) of up to $20 per hour. You will take part in special events, &amp; outings, take advantage of wellness &amp; workout programs in our fitness facility or join the lunchtime kickball league. There is something for everyone as a summer intern .  <br> Required Skills<br> Drawing Tools &ndash; Autocad or equivalent  Methods &ndash; FMEA, Six Sigma, Lean Manufacturing  Understanding of pneumatic, hydraulic and simple electronic systems  Microsoft Office &ndash; Excel, PowerPoint, Word, VISIO  Hands on skills with mechanical tools  <br><br> Required Experience<br>  Presently attending an accredited college or university, with a GPA of 3.0 or higher    Education : Engineering majors with a GPA of 3.0 or higher. Mechanical, Manufacturing Engineering or Industrial Engineer degree preferred <br>     Offers of employment are contingent on pre-employment drug testing and criminal background screening results  <br>     New York Air Brake is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to excellence through diversity: EOE/AA/M/F/D/V  

 Overview:   The IT Customer Support Technician 1 - Intern is responsible for diagnosing and resolving basic problems related to hardware, software, and peripherals via telephone or a desk-side visit. We are seeking canddiates to work out of the Buffalo, and Albany offices.

    Essential Role and Responsibilities   Work with Software engineering team to develop test programs to verify functional operations of NAI products.   Test and debug products to component level utilizing circuit analysis skills.   implement test procedures and work with engineers to learn how to use necessary test equipment.   Work with Production personnel and assist in diagnosis and repair of failed production items.    Qualifications and Education Requirements   Working towards Engineering / Technical degree, and currently enrolled to complete desired degree.   Working knowledge of electronic circuits including data sheets and component specifications.   Knowledge of general-purpose test equipment, such as oscilloscope, DMM, and power sources.   Communication protocol knowledge a plus (usb, ethernet, serial).   Working knowledge of programming languages, such as C, C++, and C #.   Linux knowledge a plus.     Other Skills and Abilities   Must have good oral and written communication skills.   Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.   Self-motivated, and possess a high degree of curiosity and desire to learn new things.   Ability to take initiative and multi-task within a fast-paced environment.    North Atlantic Industries is a specialized provider of embedded electronic and computing systems for military, commercial aerospace and industrial applications. We are 200+ highly talented and innovative employees, who are dedicated to solving complex electronic challenges. At NAI, you&rsquo;re encouraged to participate in a variety of projects and given the space to develop a wide breadth of technical expertise.     Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities   The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor&rsquo;s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c) 

 A new E-Commerce jewelry company based in Forest Hills NY, is looking to hire a highly dynamic and results-oriented Wordpress Ecommerce Intern to operate and drive traffic to our online business.   Job responsibilities  include buy not limited to:    · Implement and maintain the online business through Shopify & oversee the marketplace operations.  · Develop site merchandising strategies to achieve sales and profit margin goals.  · Identify new business opportunities to increase the online assortment and improve online inventory availability by sourcing, onboarding, and managing new client relationships.  · Execute merchandising strategies online across category, subcategory, and other site content across the platforms to contribute to overall business goals.  · Product selections and update new products to e-commerce platforms.  · Organize and track daily products number and variety through inventory management and quality control.  · Update social media daily through marketing campaigns, advertising etc…  · Writing articles, newsletters and blogging.  · Contact clients to coordinate with their demands of time, products and shipping details.  · Drive traffic and direct customers certain new products or promotional products through Keywords and SEO.  · Positioning and market the products and the potential customers of target groups.  · A creative thinker with excellent interpersonal, communication, analytic and problem solving skills.   Candidates must possess   th  e follo  wing qualifications:    · 1+ years experience in eCommerce supported by a proven record of success.  · Self-motivated, Self-starter but remains a team player.  · Knowledge of Photoshop.  · Strong communication, presentation and interpersonal skills required. A born communicator with inherent salesmanship qualities.  · Superior organizational and time management skills.  · Wants more for themselves than just a weekly salary.  · Enthusiastic with excellent people skills.  · Web Design - Online store - eCommerce Specialist.  · Search engine optimization - Search engine marketing.  · Social media management - Social media marketing - Social media stores.  · Marketplaces such as Ebay/Amazon.   Hours:    · Mon-Thurs 10:00 am - 4:00 pm   Benefits:    ·  Compensation:   $150 Weekly Base Pay PLUS   Monthly Bonuses.    WEEKLY BASE + MONTHLY BONUSES = ANNUALLY $10  K - $20K   This is  NOT  a remote position, we will be conducting onsite interviews.  Please include samples of your work and email your resume to be considered.  Job Type: Part-time  Pay: $10,000.00 - $20,000.00 per year  Supplemental Pay:  Bonus pay   Experience:  Digital marketing: 1 year (Preferred)  SEO: 1 year (Preferred)  Shopify: 1 year (Preferred)   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail  Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Work Remotely:  No  

  The mission of BusySquirrels (https://busysquirrels.com/) is to develop a free, seamless, AI-powered platform to help online shoppers save money and time in the easiest way, by providing easy-to-use cashback, price tracking, real-time price drop and restock alerts and most intelligent cross-store price comparison.     We invite students to join us remotely as software development interns and work on cutting-edge cloud-based front-end and back-end website development, iOS and Android apps. The working schedule is flexible and you may plan your work at your own pace without interrupting school courseworks. The internship schedule can be either weekdays or weekends. The internship opportunities are unpaid but can be used for academic credit.   We actually require students to register an internship class (for credit or zero credit) to be compliant.    You will be able to work with and mentored by Columbia and MIT alumni who have years of software development experiences. For students who would like to apply for graduate schools, we will write awesome recommendation letters for your good performance.     BusySquirrels has experience hosting interns through MIT Venture Match, Columbia Industrial Liaison course and Columbia Virtual Internship Program. Here are some testimonials from our previous interns from Columbia and MIT.    Intern A: "This internship has far-reaching significance to me, and it has strengthened my career goal of becoming a software engineer. "    Intern B: "Teamwork played an important role in this internship. I learned how to work together with my teammates, analyze tasks, communicate with others to overcome technical problems and describe my work at daily meetings."    Intern C: "While I had many useful experiences at BusySquirrels, I feel that I still need to learn more fundamental knowledge of programming languages and operating systems, which I could learn in Columbia University during my final semester. In conclusion, my experience with BusySquirrels was crucial in my career development since I enjoyed my job as a software engineer and considered continuing my journey. "   Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Schedule:  8 hour shift  Weekends   COVID-19 considerations:<br/>We conduct interviews virtually and internship will be remote as well.  Hours per week:  10-19  20-29   Internship Compensation:  College Credit  

  Introduction <br> The smartest companies today fully leverage data analytics for strategic decision making.The IBM Chief Analytics Office, a division of IBM Corporate Headquarters, combines business knowledge with big data to direct the future of IBM&rsquo;s strategic transformation. Do you want to drive significant change within a leading global company and influence C-suite level decisions?<br><br> Are you passionate about harnessing the power of big data and analytics to address real-world business problems and play a key role in influencing change? If so, we want you to apply.<br><br> Your Role and Responsibilities <br> START AND END DATES FOR THIS INTERNSHIP ARE DURING SUMMER 2021 (3 MONTHS) <br><br> This position is an internal Data Scientist Intern role with the Chief Analytics Office. You will work alongside consultants, managers, and senior data scientists to enhance business performance through analytics and data science focused initiatives. The position&rsquo;s main role and responsibilities include:  data exploration, extraction and manipulation   fact-based quantitative analysis using data visualization techniques   building innovative statistical and machine learning models, writing code, testing and validating   interpreting output and performance of models in business terms, communicating findings to the team   collaborating in a team environment   CAOeph<br><br> Required Technical and Professional Expertise <br>  BS in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, Data Science, or related STEM Fields   You must have proficiency in Python, R, SQL or another programming language   You have experience and/or coursework in statistics and machine learning   You have experience and/or coursework in exploratory data analysis and statistical modeling through software (e.g. SPSS) or programming language (e.g. Python)   You have understanding of database and analytical technologies in the industry as well as code versioning   You thrive in a collaborative team environment   You live or are willing to relocate to New York  <br>  Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise <br> 

  Explore the possibilities across our global house of brands.  Defined by inclusivity rather than exclusivity, Tapestry embraces the exploration of individuality and invests in helping you grow personally and professionally. Every individual in our global house has the opportunity to make an impact, learn and be part of our growing and unique story.  At Tapestry, we have the freedom to express ourselves and run with our best ideas across Coach, Kate Spade New York, and Stuart Weitzman. We share a profound belief in both our individual and collective potential, and know that with hard work and dedication, anything is possible.    Tapestry will be offering internship opportunities which will provide interns the opportunity to develop critical skillsets and gain hands-on experience at our house of modern luxury lifestyle brands.  <br>    The 2021 program will run from June 1  st   &ndash; August 6  th  . Paid internship opportunities will be available at each of our brands (Coach, kate spade, Stuart Weitzman) and within Tapestry functional groups.<br>      Here&rsquo;s what you can expect from our internship recruitment process:   Application Deadline - January 11th.   Video Submissions - Should your application be selected for further consideration, you will receive an email prompt for the video submission portion of the application in mid to late-January.  Final Interviews - Our teams will be selecting final candidates for phone or video interviews in early to mid-February depending on candidate availability.  Internship Offers - Delivered in early March.<br>      Job Title:  Summer  Global Environments &amp; Architecture Internships <br>    Primary Purpose:  The successful individual will leverage their proficiency in Global Environments &amp; Architecture to work within our Tapestry corporate team. <br>    The accomplished individual may possess the ability to...    Prepare and edit presentations boards   Manage and organize the materials library   Assist on one-off facilities projects like artwork layouts or office moves  Update CAD templates and fixture blocks  Revise renderings in Photoshop for upcoming design presentations  <br>    An outstanding professional may have...    Experience in working in retail or architectural environment   Strong AutoCAD and InDesign skills  Microsoft Office &amp; Outlook skills     Our Competencies for All Employees    Drive for Results:  Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for results.   Customer Focus:  Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.   Creativity : Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.   Interpersonal Savvy : Relates well to all kinds of people, up, down, and sideways, inside and outside the organization; builds appropriate rapport; builds constructive and effective relationships; uses diplomacy and tact; can diffuse even high-tension situations comfortably.   Learning on the Fly:  Learns quickly when facing new problems; a relentless and versatile learner; open to change; analyzes both successes and failures for clues to improvement; experiments and will try anything to find solutions; enjoys the challenge of unfamiliar tasks; quickly grasps the essence and the underlying structure of anything.   Perseverance : Pursues everything with energy, drive, and a need to finish; seldom gives up before finishing, especially in the face of resistance or setbacks.   Dealing with Ambiguity : Can effectively cope with change; can shift gears comfortably; can decide and act without having the total picture; isn&rsquo;t upset when things are up in the air; doesn&rsquo;t have to finish things before moving on; can comfortably handle risk and uncertainty.    Our Competencies for All People Managers    Strategic Agility : Sees ahead clearly; can anticipate future consequences and trends accurately; has broad knowledge and perspective; is future oriented; can articulately paint credible pictures and visions of possibilities and likelihoods; can create competitive and breakthrough strategies and plans.   Building Effective Teams : Blends people into teams when needed; creates strong morale and spirit in their team; shares wins and successes; fosters open dialogue; lets people finish and be responsible for their work; defines success in terms of the whole team; creates a feeling of belonging in the team.   Managerial Courage : Doesn&rsquo;t hold back anything that needs to be said; provides current, direct, complete, and &ldquo;actionable&rdquo; positive and corrective feedback to others; lets people know where they stand; faces up to people problems on any person or situation (not including direct reports) quickly and directly; is not afraid to take negative action when necessary.  <br>   Tapestry, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and we pride ourselves on hiring and developing the best people. All employment decisions (including recruitment, hiring, promotion, compensation, transfer, training, discipline and termination) are based on the applicant&rsquo;s or employee&rsquo;s qualifications as they relate to the requirements of the position under consideration. These decisions are made without regard to age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic characteristics, race, color, creed, religion, ethnicity, national origin, alienage, citizenship, disability, marital status, military status, pregnancy, or any other legally-recognized protected basis prohibited by applicable law. #LI-KS1 Visit Tapestry, Inc. at http://www.tapestry.com/ 

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> What We're Looking For  </h2>Our New York, NY office is seeking Rail Intern Engineers for Summer 2021 in the following areas: Communications, Track, and Structures. <br><br> Relocation and housing are not provided for these positions.    Primary Focus Will Include:<br>    Rail - Communications Intern   Assist in preparation of proposals and contracts   Project communications and documentation   Satisfy client requirements and expectations   Coordinate work efforts with others      Rail - Track Intern   Assist in preparation of design documents for trackwork, including alignments, specifications, criteria, details, and estimates   Assist in preparation of proposals and contracts   Project communications and documentation   Satisfy client requirements and expectations   Coordinate work efforts with others      Rail - Structures Intern   Perform basic engineering calculations   Organize information for use in drawings or other documents   Assist other engineers in various tasks and duties      Preferred Qualifications and Skills:   Completion of 2 years of post-secondary civil or electrical engineering program   Previous internship or co-op experience   AutoCAD or MicroStation experience   Familiarity with Microsoft Office (Outlook, Word, Excel)   Interest in transit and rail projects     <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> What You'll Need  </h2> Essential Responsibilities:   Assists engineer teams in various tasks and duties.   Assists Engineer with research, development and design of projects.   Assists Engineer with the preparation of engineering drawings and documents as assigned.   Performs other duties as assigned.      Minimum Qualifications:   High School Diploma/GED or equivalent plus current enrollment in an accredited post-secondary engineering program     Visa sponsorship is not available for this position.

 We are on a mission to make the world smaller with one Gesture at a time. Being one of the newest on-demand companies in the market, we live out our company mission by helping to provide the solution to the age-old problem of overpriced “gifting.” With Gesture, anyone can easily send flowers, wine, champagne and so much more from all across the nation starting at $20, with free delivery and no surprise fees.  Helping you stay connected one Gesture at a time.  We are looking for a great Remote Backend Developer Intern to join our team immediately. You will be responsible for ensuring systems consistency and create a more seamless experience for users.   Responsibilities:    Collaborate with front-end engineers and team members to design codes that will help enhance user experience   Analyze data and codes to reduce errors and identify areas that need improvement   Develop new ideas that could help increase efficiency   Coordinate department needs and make suggestions regarding its technical direction    Qualifications:    Bachelor’s degree in Computer Programming, Computer Science, or related field   Experience with programming languages such as Java and Python   Strong understanding of the web development cycle and programming techniques and tools   Strong analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving skills   Strong communication and presentation skills   Excellent time management skills   Must have a go-getter and self sufficient type of perspective   We encourage you to visit yourgesture.com at your earliest convenience.  We look forward to meeting you soon.  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.01 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  JavaScript: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

  The C&amp;S Companies&rsquo; Internship Program is designed to engage college students in the practical application of a major technical study and to familiarize them with the interactions and requirements of the A/E industry. Internships are designed to introduce and build essential hands-on skills that differ from those attained in the academic arena, and help to enhance the transition from student to professional. Interns are assigned duties that will provide a broad, well-rounded learning experience within their chosen discipline. Internship opportunities are available at most C&amp;S locations.   Position Responsibilities<br> Perform, under close supervision, routine aspects of Mechanical Engineering, requiring knowledge and application of principles learned in course of study.   May use computer-assisted engineering software and equipment to perform tasks.   Collect and prepare data for evaluation.   Assist in the coordination of projects from conception (feasibility) through final plan preparations.   Provide support to staff members as needed.  

   Responsibilities:   Respond to questions and issues raised by customers within agreed SLA.  Guide customers through the setup, installation and integration of Numerix software on Windows and UNIX/Linux platforms.  Assist customers in troubleshooting issues over the phone and via remote access.  Manage all customer support issues via Salesforce service cloud console; manage customer expectation with proactive communication to achieve higher customer satisfaction.  Administer internal and external licensing servers; manage and control the creation, distribution and revocation of software licenses.  Assist in the software release and distribution process; manage the release of GA, Alpha, and Beta software packages to customers and prospects.  Assist in the maintenance and enhancement of Numerix license servers using Java and Apache Tomcat technology.  Assist in the upkeep and maintenance of the Numerix Customer Support Portal, utilizing JavaScript, html, CSS and the Salesforce.com platform.  Assist in creation of new FAQs for our customer support knowledge base.  Develop in-depth knowledge of Numerix CrossAsset products. <br>     Qualifications:   Excellent writing and interpersonal skills.  Demonstrated effectiveness in communicating with customers and software engineers.  Demonstrated problem solving skills, strong conceptual and analytical skills  Strong customer focus and customer satisfaction oriented.  Very energetic, self-motivated with a strong attention to detail.  BS/MS degree in Computer Science/Engineering or related discipline.  2+ years of Finance or Insurance industry experience preferred; Understanding of the securities industry; working knowledge of fixed-income and other derivatives is a plus.  Experience troubleshooting general operating system software related issues on UNIX/Linux and windows platforms.  Experience using Microsoft Excel. Financial modeling with Excel is a plus.  Programming experience with Java, Python, C++, C#, html and Javascript, plus.  Salesforce.com experience a plus.  

  To get the best candidate experience, please consider applying for a maximum of 3 roles within 12 months to ensure you are not duplicating efforts.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Category  </h2>Intern   <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Details  </h2>  JOB TITLE:  Summer 2021 Intern - Advisory Services (MuleSoft)      LOCATION:  Multiple Locations Available      DEPARTMENT DESCRIPTION:    Advisory Services is a customer and field facing group responsible for engaging with customer executives to solidify their vision for digital transformation in their business and how Advisory Services married with MuleSoft's Anypoint platform will operationalize that vision.      ROLE DESCRIPTION:    This role will be shaping the go-to-market and sales of MuleSoft Advisory services, working closely with account/sales teams, our customer success and services organization. This role will help the Advisory Portfolio Director manage a portfolio of large-scale digital transformation programs centered on operationalizing the impact of MuleSoft's Anypoint platform, often in combination with other Salesforce clouds and teams.   The MuleSoft Advisory Services intern will share responsibility for driving the continued success of Advisory by supporting our commercial growth strategy. A successful candidate will have a relentless curiosity, and possess a passion for creating innovative analysis and the flexibility to identify and execute on opportunities. An ideal candidate will also be comfortable working with technical and non-technical stakeholders, must be a team player, able to manage multiple priorities and deal with ambiguity.      YOUR IMPACT (RESPONSIBILITIES):    Projects range from the strategic to the operational: KPI development, Go-to-Market planning and revenue forecasting, new product introductions, market research, and sales pipeline.    Contribute to the growth of the Advisory business by identifying and leading internal strategic initiatives to grow the consulting practice.     Design and maintain key performance dashboards through automation.     Lead ongoing analysis of business performance.     Assist in developing ad-hoc data analysis to present to Services Leadership.     Be a leader in creating a data driven culture of decision making with stakeholders.     Support Salesforce process enhancements, modifications and best practices development        MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:     Current Master Student; all majors welcome, pursuing a MA/MS in Business, Engineering, Statistics or Mathematics is a plus     Exceptional problem solving skills: demonstrated ability to structure complex problems, develop solutions, and craft high quality project plans     Excellent communication skills with the ability to communicate complex information to wide audiences, including executives and dissolve complex issues and detailed analysis into concrete action plans     Ability to conduct sophisticated and creative analysis, yet translate those results to easily digestible messages, communications, and presentations     Intellectually curious, detail-oriented, and driven to make an impact on the business     Self-starter and a high degree of motivation to go above and beyond the task at hand     Advanced proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, PowerPoint, Word) or G-Suite Equivalent     Experience with financial modeling in Excel. Experience with SAP Business Objects, Tableau, R, Python is a plus     Previous internship experience in sales, consulting or a related field, or at a technology company is a plus.        ABOUT SALESFORCE<br>   <br> Salesforce, the Customer Success Platform and world's #1 CRM, empowers companies to connect with their customers in a whole new way. The company was founded on three disruptive ideas: a new technology model in cloud computing, a pay-as-you-go business model, and a new integrated corporate philanthropy model. These founding principles have taken our company to great heights, including being named one of Forbes&rsquo;s &ldquo;World&rsquo;s Most Innovative Company&rdquo; six years in a row and one of Fortune&rsquo;s &ldquo;100 Best Companies to Work For&rdquo; nine years in a row. We are the fastest growing of the top 10 enterprise software companies, and this level of growth equals incredible opportunities to grow a career at Salesforce. Together, with our whole Ohana (Hawaiian for &quot;family&quot;) made up of our employees, customers, partners and communities, we are working to improve the state of the world.<br><br>     Accommodations  - If you require assistance due to a disability applying for open positions please submit a request via this Accommodations Request Form.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Posting Statement  </h2>   At Salesforce we believe that the business of business is to improve the state of our world. Each of us has a responsibility to drive Equality in our communities and workplaces. We are committed to creating a workforce that reflects society through inclusive programs and initiatives such as equal pay, employee resource groups, inclusive benefits, and more. Learn more about Equality at Salesforce and explore our benefits.     Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org are Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employers. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status. Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Salesforce.com and Salesforce.org will not pay any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Salesfore.com or Salesforce.org.     Salesforce welcomes all.    Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance and the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring, Salesforce will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

  Research & Data Intern - APPLY TO: https://forms.gle/9sProvSaom67Pk219  <br/>*<br/>ABOUT: The Northeast Charter Schools Network is non-partisan organization supporting the New York Charter Schools Association and the Connecticut Charter Schools Association, which serve as the as the unified voice for the over 300 public charter schools in the two states.  POSITION SUMMARY: The Research & Data Intern will report to the Director of Operations and coordinate with the organization’s CFO as well as the New York and Connecticut teams on the following:  Creating data analysis in Excel using the organization’s database of information about schools in New York and Connecticut (SQL experience helpful but not required);   Creating and implementing a system for capturing & recording information about building addresses for all New York Charter Schools;   Assisting with overhauling the organization’s data management systems for Events and Annual Membership interactions;   Updating the organizations Member Relationship Management platform’s data system;   Identifying and merging various resources to create a compliance calendar for all charter schools in New York State;   Creating a library of free resources for educational and nonprofit institutions;   Establishing a Vendor information repository for member schools;   Creating a grant opportunity library for member schools;   Conducting research on other statewide charter schools associations; and   Other data and research projects to be planned with the Director of Operations.   REQUIREMENTS:  Strong Microsoft Excel or Google Sheets skills required;   Experience using SQL preferred but not required;   To apply, submit your resume and information to: https://forms.gle/9sProvSaom67Pk219 *  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: Up to $1.00 per hour  Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   Company's website:  https://nycharters.net/   Company's Facebook page:  https://www.facebook.com/nycharterassoc/   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

   The Opportunity  <br>    Mesirow Financial is an independent, employee-owned firm founded in 1937. As specialists in investment, risk management and advisory services, we are committed to helping our institutional, corporate and individual clients achieve their objectives. Our professionals are inspired by an entrepreneurial desire to develop tailored solutions designed to deliver measurable results. <br>    As one of the nation's more established and most experienced participants in the fixed income markets, Mesirow Financial offers our clients a myriad of financial products, combined with extensive market experience. Our Institutional Sales and Trading team is comprised of over 120 dedicated traders, salespeople and analysts highly specialized in a variety of sectors of the fixed income market. <br>    We have an exciting opportunity for an Institutional Sales &amp; Trading Intern to learn the fixed income markets and to begin to develop a successful career in Institutional Sales. Successful candidates will possess strong quantitative and communication skills and thrive in a fast-paced and collaborative environment. This program allows students to simultaneously display their current talents and acquire new ones. <br>     Responsibilities   Perform various types of analysis using fundamental and technical data  Become familiar with Senior management and their roles  Conduct industry and product research in support of trading desks and senior leaders  Prepare presentation materials and participate in portfolio reviews for senior management  Monitor a variety of markets and assist in developing trade ideas in support of the trading desks  Participate in individual and group projects and shadowing opportunities  Listen to client calls and help field client requests    Requirements   Current enrollment in a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in Accounting, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering, or Math  Graduation between December 2021 and June 2022   Strong extracurricular activities/campus involvement   High proficiency with Microsoft Office products (i.e. Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)  Ability to work in a fast-paced environment with high attention to detail  Superior communications skills, both oral and written; effective interpersonal skills  Ability to work well independently and also within a team   Understanding of accounting, math, and basic finance  A background in computer science is beneficial, but not required  

    This internship is located with Knowledge Management Team (KMT) within the Capacity Development and Operational Training Service (CDOTS)/Department of Operational Services (DOS).<br><br> DOS provides end-to-end operational support, advisory services and other solutions to the operating entities across the Secretariat, including other departments, offices-away-from-headquarters, field missions, and regional commissions.<br><br> CDOTS provides operational training, including training on enterprise resource management system and leads as the main facilitator of business process management activities in the UN Secretariat. <br><br> The KMT is responsible for the provision of knowledge management services to the global Secretariat. The premier service provided by this team is the Knowledge Gateway, an organization-wide platform for internal guidance-sharing on administrative and operational support topics, which is part of the integrated Policy and Guidance Framework, a joint initiative of DMSPC. Other activities include the development and implementation of a guidance development framework for operational support, supporting partners in the development of specialized communities of practice, knowledge tools and products, and facilitating group processes aimed at fostering a knowledge-sharing culture.<br><br> The internship is for a maximum period of six months. Due to COVID-19, candidates should be prepared to work remotely (telecommute) for the duration of the internship. The internship is UNPAID and full-time. Interns work five days per week (35 hours).<br><br> The Intern will work under the supervision of the Team Leader, KMT/CDOTS/DOS.  Responsibilities  Under the supervision of the Team Leader for KMT, the intern will perform the following<br> functions:<br><br> Convert administrative and operational support guidance in to short, informative and appealing videos to promote learning and socialization of guidance developed by Subject Matter Expert Offices using tools such as Adobe Premerie Pro, Final Cut Pro, Adobe Captivate, Animaker or Doodly or similar.  Convert administrative and operational support guidance in to eye catching, succinct, informative and illustrative graphic products such as inforgraphics, media cards, cheat sheets, flow charts using software such as Adobe Illustration, Adobe Photoshop, Canva, Venngage or similar tools.  Convert MS word based administrative and operational support guidance in to interactive PDFs, Mobile Apps and other creative mediums.  Innovate ways to disseminate and socialize administrative and operational support guidance hosted in the Knowledge Gateway.  Participate in Knowledge Gateway outreach activities  Contribute to the maintenance of the Gateway Assistant (Bot) by developing question sets for new administrative and operational support guidance in the Knowledge Gateway.  Perform outreach and coordination activities related to the Knowledge Gateway quarterly content review including reviewing and identifying content within the Knowledge Gateway which may be out of date and reaching out to focal points to coordinate have content updated accordingly.   Participate in meetings with partners and clients to determine their multimedia needs related to administrative and operational support guidance.  Other tasks as assigned.   

 FYID NYC is a global creative agency specializing in marketing, events, and talent representation. This role will directly support FYID's web design team. We are looking for a rockstar intern to enhance our growing international team! This role is unpaid, for college credit only. The position will initiate as a virtual internship due to COVID-19.   FYID NYC seeks a Virtual Web Design Intern to join our global creative agency. (Credit Only)    WINTER 2020    Flexible Hours. 3/4 days per week.     Uncover your full potential in a collaborative environment where you'll design, develop and deliver custom solutions to big challenges.   YOU MUST ELIGIBLE TO OBTAIN CREDITS FROM YOUR UNIVERSITY  START: ASAP  The Virtual Web Design Intern will have the opportunity to earn school credit and learn about web design as it relates to to the fashion, art, and music industries.  We are undertaking an impressive modernization initiative to replace our legacy systems. Whether we're improving our customer experience or supporting our internal business units, FYID NYC IT Department seeks to do it the best way.  *Position Responsibilities  Build out new websites for clients and brands.  Participate in Java or .NET application design and development.  Troubleshoot and resolve software related issues.  Maintain code quality.  Document code appropriately for maintainability.  Work with business analysts to gather requirements.  Collaborate with team members on projects.   Minimum Requirements  This internship is open to Juniors majoring in Information Technology / Computer Science only.  Experience with Squarespace, Wordpress, or UX design.  Two semesters of programming is a must.  Solid communication skills and willingness to work in a team environment a must.  Detail-oriented, hardworking and enthusiastic.  Able to work independently when requested.   Benefits  Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.  Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.  Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time or part-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company.   Unpaid, college credit only. Opportunity grow into part-time position.  STARTS ASAP!  Schedule: minimum 20 hours per week.  Job Type: Internship  Salary: $0.00 /hour  *  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Job Type: Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Experience:  CSS: 1 year (Preferred)  HTML5: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  One location   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Company's website:  www.fyidnyc.com   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19  

   Description   An Intern in our Utility Consulting group will work on projects that includes analysis of electrical transmission systems, including running models, simulations and report writing. Projects include generation interconnection studies, load flow analysis, dynamic studies and distribution master plan support.  Assist with transmission planning studies.  Assist with power system planning and operations analysis including: power flow, transient, stability, short circuit, electromagnetic transients, reliability and economic dispatch.  Assist with North American Electric Reliability Corporation (NERC), Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) and regional requirement assessments.  Assist with electric power risk assessments.  Assist with ad hoc projects as assigned by managers.  All other duties as assigned..    Qualifications   Pursuit of Bachelor's or Master&rsquo;s degree in Electrical Engineering from an accredited program  Currently enrolled, and in good standing, in a post-secondary education program in a field related to the work done in the department.  Minimum of a 3.0 GPA strongly preferred.  Prior internship and/or related consulting experience preferred.  Actively involved in campus, community or other volunteer activities or organizations.  Excellent verbal and written communication skills.  Strong problem solving and analytical skills.  Basic knowledge and experience in Microsoft Office programs, including, Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.  Demonstrated leadership skills.  Self-motivated and eager learner, aptitude to grow and develop within the field.  Candidates must be legally authorized to work, without restrictions or without need for work sponsorship, in the country where this position is located, for the duration of the internship.   EEO/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans   Job  Intern   Primary Location  US-CT-Wallingford   Other Locations  US-NY-Manhattan, US-ME-Portland   Schedule:  Full-time   Travel:  Yes, 5 % of the Time   About 1898 &amp; Co.   1898 &amp; Co. is a business, technology and security solutions consultancy where experience and foresight come together to unlock lasting advancements. We innovate today to fuel our clients&rsquo; future growth, catalyzing insights that drive smarter decisions, improve performance and maximize value. As part of Burns &amp; McDonnell, we draw on more than 120 years of deep and broad experience in complex industries as we envision and enable the future for our clients.   Burns &amp; McDonnell is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans    Req ID:  201804  \#LI-EC \#E98 

 IT SUPPORT TECHNICIAN/NETWORK ADMINISTRATOR INTERNSHIP:  New York City <br><br> What You Will Do:  Network Administrator Interns will work to assist in the design, architecture, and deployment of local area networks, computer hardware, and telecommunications for an expanding organization. Help us invest in technology to streamline and enhance how we collaborate and work. While gaining true hands-on experience, you will engage in real-world technology problem solving from the ground up. We use and need your innovative solutions to continuously improve our processes, productivity, and growth. This is not a filing and copying internship. <br><br> This is for focused individuals with previous networking skills, desiring real-world experience to expand your knowledge and develop your IT networking career in a short period of time. <br><br> ___________________________________________________________________________________________________ <br><br> Who We Are:  Retensa is internationally recognized as a thought leader by ABC News, Forbes, The Wall Street Journal, BusinessWeek, and The New York Times as a leader and innovator of Employee Retention Strategies and Workforce Technology. This Management Consulting Firm provides services and online solutions to mid- and large-size firms in 54 countries in 15 languages with a mission of creating workplaces where every employee is engaged by what they do, and inspired by who they work for. Retensa helps employers reduce staff turnover, improve morale, and build HR metrics for a high performing workforce. <br><br> What We Believe:  As a Retensa team member, you will be at the forefront of Management Consulting, Cloud-based Technology, Predictive Analytics, and Rapid Application Development. Your effort can help up to 1 billion employees in 1 million companies worldwide. <br><br> Who You Are:  (Degree, Major, Skills, and Other Qualifications): <br><br> Internship candidates should be hardworking, enthusiastic, resourceful Seniors or Graduate students in CS, CIS, Information Technology, or MIS. Candidates must have experience in MS Windows Server 2008 or above AND at least TWO of the following: <br><br> 1) MS Windows Server 2012 or above <br><br> 2) MS Skype, Teams, or similar <br><br> 3) Firewalls <br>4) Office 365 <br>5) Windows 10 O/S Installation/Deployment <br>6) Remote Access <br><br> Required:  Strict Minimum 3.0 GPA. Prior Windows Server skills of any kind. The ideal applicant should possess good written and verbal skills with passion for problem solving and creating efficiency in what they do. <br><br> Time:  Min 16 hours. Minimum of 2 days/week, part-time/flexible hours available <br><br> To apply, please submit your resume to https://retensa.applicantstack.com/x/apply/a2rbt5igjdlq <br><br> Due to the high volume of applicants, we may only be able to contact qualified candidates.*  Retensa is an Equal Opportunity Employer*  

         This is not work experience, this is an opportunity to experience work.  <br>   An Intern is an investment in Moog&rsquo;s future. The intern relationship provides a three-way benefit between the student, university, and Moog. It is an opportunity for the student to incorporate classroom learning into professional, real world situations. The student brings new ideas to Moog on how to tackle projects and challenges, while Moog benefits from fresh perspectives from the brightest students in their respective fields of study. By having the students work on actual programs, we also work towards solving our customers&rsquo; most difficult technical challenges. <br>    Moog&rsquo;s Aircraft, Industrial, and Space &amp; Defense Groups, in the Buffalo, NY area, are seeking students for Summer Engineering Internships &amp; Co-Ops!  <br>   As part of the Moog U.S. Internship Program, this position provides strategic and tactical support to senior and mid-level employees.  Engineering work can include (but is not limited to) Design, Product, Manufacturing, Mechanical, Product, Software, Systems, and/or Test Equipment.   For Electrical Engineering Internship opportunities, please see requisition #205036. <br>   The student will contribute to routine engineering work requiring the application of standard techniques, procedures, and criteria in carrying out a variety of engineering tasks. <br>   The student will work on discipline-focused projects and tasks to enhance their collegiate learning experience, while providing meaningful contributions to the Moog Engineering Team(s). <br>    Responsibilities   Contribute to the preparation and execution of key engineering tasks at Moog  Provide technical support to engineers, as needed  Work experience may include conceptual design, detail design, testing, stress analyses, metallurgical laboratory work, and/or project engineering, based on the student's educational discipline  Provide input on project processes, strategies, and execution  Operate as a multidisciplinary member of the team of creative, independent individuals  Represent Moog in a manner consistent with its technical and professional reputation  <br>    Basic Requirements   Enrolled in a relevant Engineering Bachelor's or Master's Degree program, at an accredited university  GPA of at least 3.0  This position requires access to U.S. export-controlled information.  Due to the current and changing COVID-19 restrictions, relocation may not be possible for certain assignments.  <br>      Students within the Moog U.S. Internship Program are expected to have a professional disposition, effective communication skills, a strong desire to learn, a positive attitude, and the ability to work in a team environment.  <br>   Please note this requisition is for sourcing purposes and will be used to fill individual openings as they become available.<br>     EOE/AA Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity 

 Your role:  Take an active role in developing, testing and maintaining web applications.   Collaborate with team members to support all phases of the project lifecycle.   Assist with the preparation of documentation, training, and support of various systems.   About you:  You have experience working with React.  You should be a self-starter with strong web development skills (JavaScript, CSS, HTML).   You have experience mocking up designs in Figma, Sketch, Photoshop, etc.   Available to start as soon as possible.   Able to dedicate 16 hours a week to working remotely during the internship period.   Someone who enjoys learning new technologies and integrating with 3rd party APIs.   Must be a US citizen as we cannot sponsor or transfer visas at this time.   About us:  We are a dynamic ML/AI focused startup looking to do some disruption in the Ad Tech space designing a novel product which has the potential to serve a huge market.  This will be a great opportunity to come in on the ground floor and learn all aspects of product development, with the potential for post-internship employment.  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $500.00 per month  Benefits:  Flexible schedule   COVID-19 considerations:<br/>Currently all work is being done remotely.  Experience:  JavaScript: 1 year (Preferred)   Typical start time:  11AM   Typical end time:  7PM   Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:  No: Not providing sponsorship for this job   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   Company's website:  eulerity.com  

   Software Support Engineer Intern     Position Description    The software support engineer will be the on-point support for software and database related tasks for house developed/customized LIMS software system as well as other web-based application. The support includes, but not limited to, data correction, debugging, and escalate complex issues to senior team members.    Job responsibilities   Work with other software engineers to support daily database and software maintenance effort for both clinical and R&amp;D projects  Complete individual coding tasks in Java and other programming language as directed  Communicate with end-user related to the support tickets  Provide technical suggestions for improvement opportunities to the software development team  Ensure best practice for software coding and engineering  Maintain legacy software platform to ensure business operation    Position Requirements   Bachelor&rsquo;s degree in computer science, computer engineering, clinical informatics or related field  A minimum of 1 years&rsquo; experience in independent web development in Java or Python  Knowledge of LIMS systems is preferred and exposure to ClarityLIMS a plus  Strong Oracle/MySQL experience required  Experience with full SDLC and agile development methodology strongly recommended  Experience working with scientists in biotech/pharmaceutical company and/or clinical labs highly desired.  Proven ability to communicate with end users and team members  

  Vimeo has billions of videos on its platform and millions of people performing searches on that content every month. The Search and Recommendations team works very hard on its search algorithm in order to surface relevant content to its users based on who they are and what their query is, but this is all secondary if the presenting page isn't an appealing place for the user to explore results, add filters, and refine their query. Your task will be to make the search result page a modern, responsive experience, complete with new features like the ability to hover-play a video. Our team has thought of a lot of ways to make this page more functional and visually appealing but we'll be leaning on you for some inspiration as well. Working with our team you'll have the opportunity to learn what makes a good search interface as well as iteratively collaborate towards an optimal solution.    What you'll do:   Develop wireframes to visualize and POC your high level designs  Write clean, portable, and well-documented React code  Work with Design, Product, and Engineering teams to help move projects from conception to launch  Iterate on your implementations and designs in a data driven environment  Gain domain knowledge related to Search by working with experienced search relevance engineers.  Grow technically by learning from talented full stack engineers    What we're seeking:   You are familiar with Javascript and have used a frontend framework such as React, Angular, etc. to develop web applications  You have public code viewable on Github, Bitbucket, etc.  You have an understanding of REST APIs  You have an eye for product design and interactivity, and possess a strong attention to detail    Bonus points:   You are familiar with PHP, Python, Go, or Java  You have strong opinions about how Vimeo search can be improved    About us:    Vimeo is the world's leading all-in-one video software solution. Our platform enables any professional, team, and organization to unlock the power of video to create, collaborate and communicate. We proudly serve our growing community of over 200 million users &mdash; from creatives to entrepreneurs to the world's largest companies.

       We are a multinational engineering company specializing in turbomachinery and thermodynamic cycles. Our NYC based Sales &amp; Marketing team is looking for a highly motivated and organized data &amp; operations intern in the area. Intern will be involved in the business development and operations section of the company through Salesforce administration, market opportunities identification, data research and organization, and lead outreach.    Job Responsibilities:    Data entry and organization leads   Administrate and develop Salesforce platform   Identify, analyze and compile information from clients, partners and leads   Learn Pardot automation and assist with lead campaigns   Solve data generation and administration problems     Requirement &amp; Skills:    Enrolled in an Associate&rsquo;s/ Bachelor&rsquo;s/ Master&rsquo;s program at an accredited college or university with a major or minor in Computer Engineering/Science, Data Analytics, Computer Information Systems, or related AND able to intern for college credit   Proficient use of Word, Excel, Outlook   Strong organization skills and able to multi-task   Excellent verbal and written communication skills   Experience with Salesforce would be preferred   Knowledge of Apex would be preferred.   Minimum availability of 20 hours a week. Part time and full time positions are available.     Compensation:    This is an unpaid position for college credit. Interns will be compensated for lunch/travel costs and written references will be given upon request.    To apply, please submit a resume outlining your skill and experiences as well as your availability via the below link or by emailing us at Info@Softinway.com. 

  Want to spend your summer interning at a company that is consistently rated as one of the best places to work in the country? Is this a rhetorical question?   The Motley Fool is a multimedia financial services company that provides financial solutions for investors through various stock, investing, and personal finance services. We've been on the block for about 26 years and have honed a reputation for producing industry-leading work in a nationally recognized workplace. Our mission is to help the world become happier, smarter, and richer and the backbone supporting this global mission is our top-notch tech team. If you dream of becoming a brilliant and skilled web engineer and are ready to work hard on cutting edge technologies alongside awesome coworkers, then step up to the plate, and tell us why you should land a spot among our Foolish ranks.   For eight Foolish weeks as a Linux Web Engineering Intern, you'll be embedded with the engineering team that supports and maintains our web infrastructure powering Fool websites. In this internship, you will have hands-on experience working with our software developers as the team scripts, automates, and builds and maintains Linux web servers. You'll be working with a small, agile team, but you will get exposure to all parts of the technology stack that involves delivering our intricate website! The projects you could work on may be team-level or span our entire tech organization.   You'll be challenged and mentored by some of our greatest developers and engineers all summer, and in turn, you'll develop a business-focused, acutely technical mindset that sets you apart from your peers. We're excited to open our doors for Summer 2021 Linux Web Engineering Intern applicants, so send us your most Foolishly written cover letter and your ultra-impressive resume. We're prepared to be wowed!    What you need to succeed:    Familiarity with scripting like Bash and Python.   A sustained passion for technical innovation.   Flexibility and ability to learn quickly.   Extraordinary critical thinking skills.   High-performing problem solving and collaborative skills.   Ability to communicate clearly and demonstrate emotional intelligence.   Passions for learning about new technologies and improving your own skills.    <br>   What would be really cool of you to have, but not required:    Experience with technologies like Nginx/Apache, Postgres, Git, and Kubernetes/Docker.   Knowledge of (and admiration for!) the Linux command line.   Basic knowledge and experience with server clusters, load balancing, caching and automation technologies like Varnish and Salt and Apple Cider Vinegar.  

   Position:  UX Designer Intern (REMOTE)    Reports to:  CTO    Location:  Remote <br>     Are you purpose-driven? Passionate about working close to the business in a highly collaborative early-stage startup environment? Intrigued with the challenge of applying human-centered design and visual design to tells stories? <br>    Company Overview    Vee has been working with the world's top innovative human-centered designers for many of the world's most innovative companies (incl. Apple, Microsoft, Box, Nike, HP, BMW, PepsiCo, Clorox, Philips, SAP, P&amp;G) . Vee inspires people to align on Purpose so they can unlock their individual and collective human potential. We are an early stage startup poised for dramatic growth. We specialize in developing ways to drive greater strategic alignment to unlock enterprise innovation and growth. After spending considerable time exploring the need for better alignment models across diverse organizations, we have developed a framework and methodology based on insights from extensive research. We are building products to assess gaps and are offering our consulting services to help 21st century leaders develop and implement their organizational and people strategies, along with the capabilities required to operationalize their Purpose as they transform. <br>     Position Overview    Join our fast-growing team! You will help drive intelligent, insightful, human-centered storytelling and visual design, concepts, data visualizations, and our website. <br>     You Will:   Draw from empathy as you understand Vee's business model as we solve people problems in organizations - uncovering user needs  Work with our Data Science team to apply visual design and interactive design to new and existing data visualizations  Master our data visualization platform, Power Bi, to re-design existing reports, develop infographics, and work with users to enhance interactions and behaviors  Translate insights into actionable ideas/design  Facilitate ideation sessions, prototype concepts  Review Vee's website for possible re-design    Requirements   Currently in or just graduated from a Masters program in Graphics, Visual, or User Experience Design  Experience prototyping in graphics, motion, and designing with data  Exceptional communications toolkit enhanced by storytelling to inspire our teams as you frame with user-centered rationale  Strong collaboration skills - you partner well with others to solve problems and actively incorporate input from various sources    Profile    Purpose is what drives you. Your passion for your work has led you here. You are ready to combine your experience with ours to help our client companies gain competitive advantage. You bring strong creative thinking skills in addition to superior communication skills, allowing you to develop creative solutions for any challenge that comes your way.    You:  Love what you do, love to be busy, and love to produce by being organized and methodical  Work with a sense of urgency and have a strong drive for results  Have the resilience and agility to adapt quickly in a fast-paced environment  Work independently as well as collaboratively to stretch thinking into creative solutions  Have strong verbal and written communication skills  Are excited about and suited for a startup, where you'll be wearing a few hats  Are smart and fun with an empathetic nature, which will add to our culture <br>      About Vee    Our founders and team have deep expertise in branding, innovation, design, I/O psychology, organization design, digital &amp; data product development, enterprise software and application development complemented by experience with clients ranging from emerging Silicon Valley unicorns to established leaders in government and the public and private sectors including American Express, Bank of America, BMW, Box, HP, Lowe's, Mastercard, Microsoft, Nissan, Pepsico, Procter &amp; Gamble, SAP and The Clorox Company, among others. For more information, check out our website in transition at https://www.letsvee.com/. 

 We are currently seeking a full-time production graphic designer. This position combines desktop layout along with other prepress functions.   General Responsibilities   Design/layout logos, menus, and embed images and videos  Set up processes and follow the digital template to implement new website pages  Operate plating and proofing systems  Produce corporate marketing and assist sales with marketing functions  Work with writers to define stories, publications, implement blogs, and other copy  Maintain a connection to social media through website  Add important documentation through site branding  Implement RSS feed    Skills   Proven wix designing experience  Proficient with design software and technologies (such as InDesign, Illustrator, and Photoshop)  A keen eye for aesthetics and details  Excellent communication skills  Ability to work methodically and meet deadlines  Expert level proficiency with Wix  Medium level coding experience  Familiarity with google ads  Understanding of RSS feeds   Applicants are eligible to use this to apply for college credits  Job Type: Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Experience:  CSS: 1 year (Preferred)  HTML5: 1 year (Preferred)  RSS Feed: 3 years (Preferred)  Wix: 3 years (Preferred)  Branding: 2 years (Preferred)  Python: 1 year (Preferred)  Coding history: 1 year (Preferred)  

   Start Here, Go Anywhere! Are you looking for an opportunity to shape a better world? 

    Job ID: 230984   <br>  Clemente Fane Concrete is a division of Dolomite Products Company, Inc. and is one of the many local companies in the Northeast within the CRH Americas Materials division of CRH. Clemente Fane Concrete is a leading supplier of ready mix concrete products to state, federal, municipal, commercial, and private customers with operations throughout New York State and Western Massachusetts.   <br>   Job Description Summary <br> We are looking for Interns for Ready Mix Quality Control in Oriskany, NY for Spring/Summer 2021. . Our paid internship program provides a rich and rewarding hands on learning experience and the opportunity to make a contribution to our organization. Our interns work in their course of study under close direction of an experienced supervisor/manager.  <br>  Requirements/Competencies    Computer Skills: To perform this job successfully, an individual should be able to type and use keyboards accurately and be skilled in Microsoft Office Suite and Database software   Ability to work in a fast paced environment   Monitor and test process functions and materials daily to ensure products meet or exceed requirements of the appropriate agency or customer   Correct any deviations in these processed or materials from the requirements   Follow quality control plans or guidelines as assigned   Evaluate data for deviations or trends away from accepted standards   Maintain test result database; input data   Assist internal and external customers in any quality related matters   Drug screen required before being employed by Clemente Fane Concrete and Callanan Industries, Inc.   Regular and predictable attendance at assigned times is required   Ability to build partnerships and to work with others to meet shared objectives   Demonstrate strong communication skills   Ability to create new and better ways for the organization to be successful   Actively seeks new ways to grow and be challenged using both formal &amp; informal channels of development   <br>  Education/Experience    High School Diploma or equivalent   Qualified undergraduate student enrolled in one of the following degrees or related programs: Quality Control, Mechanical, Heavy Equipment Operations, Civil Engineering, Operations Management.    <br>   What CRH Americas Offers You    A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion   Highly competitive base pay   Group retirement 401(k) savings program    <br>   About CRH Americas    <br>  CRH Americas has a long and proud heritage as one of North America&rsquo;s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the CRH Americas family. CRH Americas operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise.   <br>  CRH Americas is a great place to grow! If you&rsquo;re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the CRH Americas family!   <br>  Clemente Fane Concrete is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.    EOE/Vet/Disability-If you want to know more, please click on this link. 

  Unqork is a no-code application platform that helps large enterprises build complex custom software faster, with higher quality, and lower costs than conventional approaches. Rather than relying on the need for code to translate business logic into an application, Unqork lets you design and build complex, fully functional applications using an intuitive visual interface. Whether it be insurance, health care, financial services, or public enterprise, Unqork is solving complex issues for industries across the board without ever writing a single line of code.    About the 2021 Unqork Internship Program:    This summer join Unqork in the no-code revolution! Unqork is seeking talented and driven individuals to participate in an exciting two-month internship program. During these eight weeks, you will be immersed in our inclusive and stimulating culture, working closely with some of the city's best talent in your field and learning about the industry from veteran mentors.   At Unqork, we place great importance on personal growth both behind the desk and in front. Network with company leaders during our weekly happy hours and enjoy exciting social outings planned for you and your mentors. And best of all, be surrounded with forward-thinking individuals who are passionate about what they do.   Are you ready for a dynamic, fast-paced summer? Come with plenty of energy because we just don't move that slowly!    Program Dates:    8 week long remote internship from June 14th through August 6th. We will kick-off your welcome with two days of training and orientation.    Other highlights include:   Work on cross-functional teams  Weekly meetings and feedback from managers  Learning experiences with Unqork's Senior Leadership Team  Unqork &quot;Yoda&quot; Mentorship  Weekly happy hour and virtual social events  Weekly Learning Bites with distinguished guest    The opportunity:    As an engineering intern in the module builder and components team at Unqork you will assist in building new features and components for the Unqork platform. This is a critical role in helping to design, build, and own an industry-changing product.    Who you are:   You're empathic and enjoy working in a team environment  You are resourceful, pragmatic, open-minded and enjoy solving complicated problems  You pay attention to the details  You have an eagerness to learn and excel in a high-paced environment    What we're looking for:   Strong technical background or previous programming experience - preferably JS (React)  Must be interested in learning and growing your skills  Must have 2-3 years of experience in learning software development (rising juniors/seniors preferred)    Unqork is an equal opportunity employer, and proud to be committed to diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age.  

 Responsibilities:  Prepare elements within Traffic Impact Analyses (including field work/traffic counts, projection of traffic volumes, trip generation/distribution, and Level of Service calculations)   Prepare drawing revisions and concepts using AutoCAD   Conduct field measurements of intersections, roadways, and parking lots   Photograph study areas and vehicle operations   Prepare permit application documentation, review letter responses and submittal packages for agency reviews   Other miscellaneous traffic related office and field duties as required to meet project specific needs   Qualifications:  Pursuing Bachelor's or Masters&rsquo; Degree in Civil Engineering or related field   Effective written and communication skills   Self-starter who can work independently and with team members    Atlantic Traffic &amp; Design Engineering is an equal opportunity employer and affords equal opportunity to all applicants and employees for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status or any other status protected under local, state or federal laws.

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Career Potential<br> </h2>   Ortho Clinical Diagnostics is committed to improving and saving lives with diagnostics. To do this we hire people who share this dream and are ready for new adventures. As a valued team member, you will carve your own career path and be part of building this company stronger and better than ever before. There is no limit to the experiences, opportunities and new directions you will have access to here at Ortho Clinical Diagnostics. More importantly, you will be driving the surge of a whole new direction in important medicine. That&rsquo;s something we can all take pride in as we take this journey together.     Ortho is known in the industry as a leader in customer service and support. Deeply understanding and exceeding the needs of our clinical lab, hospital and blood bank customers is what we do. It&rsquo;s who we are. If you join Ortho, no matter what your role, you will be expected to keep that Customer Excellence focus in your work.<br><br>   <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Opportunity  </h2>   Ortho Clinical Diagnostics is seeking an Mechanical Design Engineering Intern for our 2021 Summer Intern Program. As a Mechanical Design Engineering Intern at Ortho, you will troubleshoot and identify failure modes with mechanical systems that have impacted the reliability of the instrument and propose / demonstrate corrective actions.    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> The Responsibilities  </h2>  Work under the direction of a Senior Engineer.     Utilize CAD Software to do an in-depth tolerance analysis study to verify current design constraints.     Identify potential mechanical interferences and recommend new materials and/or new designs.     Perform in-depth sub-system studies to demonstrate potential solutions to eliminate failure modes.     Each assigned project requires the candidate to interface with several other function groups (Software Design / Customer Technical Support / Electrical Design / etc.) and must be a team player.     Collaboration is the key to having this internship position be successful.      <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Deliverables:  </h2>  To demonstrate solutions to issues that can occur to detailed mechanical systems.      <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Requirements  </h2>  Undergraduate/Graduate in the Field of Study of Mechanical Engineering     Minimum year in School: 3rd     Experience using 2D and 3D software (Solidworks or Creo 2.0).     Exceptional design, presentation, and communication skills.     Excellent trouble-shooting skills       #LI-SP1 

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 42558 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&amp;D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges. <br>   Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills.<br>    The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for our immediate and future needs.<br>    To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale). <br>   Shape your future; apply today! <br>   Program Benefits:  Competitive salaries  Housing assistance  Travel reimbursement<br>     Intern Activities:  Social and networking events  Volunteer opportunities  Community Involvement<br>     Travel Requirements (please note if international):   Open to possible 1- or 2-week travel during the internship  <br>   Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:  M-F 8am &ndash; 5pm  Duration: Summer 2021, 8-12 weeks  <br>   Education and Experience:  Enrolled in a mechanical engineer degree program, preferably between sophomore and junior or junior and senior academic years.  <br>   Required Skills  Project leadership Skills  Excellent critical analysis, and logic/reasoning skills.  Excellent written and verbal communication skills and people skills; ability to interact with management, team members and external vendors.  Working knowledge of basic statistics and process engineering principles.  Problem solving and troubleshooting skills  <br>   Desired Skills:  Problem-solving skills  Demonstrated communication and interpersonal skills  Experience with Six Sigma DMAIC principles  Collaboration in a multicultural environment  <br>   Soft Skills Communication/Team/Leadership  Open and engaging to effectively collaborate with others  Strong attention to detail  Able to handle ambiguity to get results  Strong verbal and written communication skills  Technical curiosity  Flexibility  <br>   This position does not support immigration sponsorship. <br>    We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status.  We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43762 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> At Corning, our growth is fueled by a commitment to innovation. We succeed through sustained investment in research &amp; development, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges. We are a four-time National Medal of Technology winner thanks to our technology leadership and R&amp;D environment, which attract and enable the best scientific minds in the world. This pipeline of talent has brought life-changing innovation to your fingertips for more than 160 years. <br>    Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills. As our Intern, you will be responsible for assisting in research to support software development activities in Corning&rsquo;s materials informatics initiatives. This position requires good communication and interpersonal skills for collaboration with remote team members.<br>    The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for immediate and future needs.<br>    To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale). <br>   Shape your future; apply with us today! <br>    Program Benefits:   Competitive salaries  Housing assistance  Travel reimbursement<br>      Intern Activities:   Social and networking events  Volunteer opportunities  Community Involvement<br>      Day to Day Responsibilities:   Define and execute user research activities within a project charter  Conduct user research in the form of studies, interviews, surveys, etc.  Document findings   Synthesize findings into improvement strategies  Recruit and schedule various research subjects  <br>    Travel requirements  (please note if international): Anticipated travel time &lt;10% (domestic).<br>     Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:    M-F; 40 hours per week  Some flexibility required  Duration: Summer 2021, 8-12 weeks  <br>    Education and Experience  (minimum required for consideration):   Pursuing Bachelor's or Master's degrees in Interaction Design, Human-Computer Interaction, Psychology, Anthropology or Philosophy programs. Bachelor's students should be going into senior year (or 2nd year for graduate students).  Will also consider recent graduates in other Behavioral Sciences  <br>    Required Skills:   Knowledge of user research methods and processes  Ability to capture and analyze observed behaviors   Knowledge of qualitative research initiatives  User interviews  Ethnographic studies    Knowledge of quantitative research initiatives  Surveys and usability studies    Ability to produce reports based on research findings  <br>    Desired Skills:   Experience with User Experience research outputs  User archetypes (personas)  User journey maps    Experience with creating and executing usability studies  Experience with synthesizing data into narratives  Passion for analyzing human behavior for practical application  <br>    Soft Skills  (Communication/Team/Leadership):   Must be self-motivated to deliver meaningful results as required by project   Collaborative and able to openly engage with colleagues from diverse cultures, disciplines and backgrounds to achieve project goals  The ability to communicate effectively by email, phone, and video with team members in multiple locations  Collaborative and able to closely work with UX Design, product stakeholders, and scientists  <br>   This position does not support immigration sponsorship. <br>   We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status. <br>   We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

     Balyasny Asset Management L.P. (BAM)  founded in 2001, is an institutional investment firm dedicated to delivering consistent, uncorrelated absolute returns in all market environments. BAM has offices in Chicago, New York, Greenwich, San Francisco, Hong Kong and London. <br><br> At BAM, we are our talent. We are a growing firm that offers a multitude of professional opportunities. Through BAM&rsquo;s selective hiring process, we target the best and brightest in the business, and strive to create an environment which attracts and retains top talent. Maintaining a culture where people are energized to come to work is paramount to our success. Our team is motivated to perform each and every day. <br><br> As a result, BAM has built a reputation as a firm that provides the tools necessary for talented individuals to achieve their goals and reach their highest potential.      Role    Are you an intelligent and motivated individual? Are you passionate about technology and creating innovative solutions for multifaceted problems? We are looking for creative and enthusiastic students to join our team as summer software engineers. In your role, you will:   - Participate in all parts of software development lifecycle &ndash; you will take part of the design, implementation, and rollout of production systems   - Model complicated data patterns and structures   - Utilize the latest technologies to scale applications   - Work closely with different teams across engineering, data, finance, and other teams throughout the company      Requirements / Qualifications:    - Proven knowledge of at least one high-level programming language and its framework (Python, C#, C++, Java, etc.)   - Passion for coding and ability to accurately communicate what you&rsquo;ve worked on technically in school and/or previous internships   - Energetic, technical, and equipped with the skills and knowledge to drive results   - Currently pursuing a Bachelor&rsquo;s, Master&rsquo;s, or PhD in Computer Science or a similar field 

     <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Responsibilities </h2><br> 

  The Business Analyst Intern assists the Corporate Development department. This role will support the success of our corporate planning and strategy making. This position will support analysis of current businesses and new investment projects, and deliver actionable insights to the marketing, solutions, sales, and senior management teams. <br>   The ideal candidate will have education with a variety of financial modeling, data analytics, and the ability to work across multiple teams and management. Successful candidate must bring a passion for creative / analytical thinking and understand reporting needs. They must also be a team player with a willingness to collaborate on a variety of projects. This individual will also need to be detail-oriented, ensuring the quality and integration of all the analysis and reports .  <br>    Major Tasks &amp; Responsibilities:   Conduct in-depth research in telecom industries among emerging markets  Collaborating with the rest of the team to produce pitch books for management review (including PowerPoint slide making).  Reconciling company data to reported financials (accounting skills).  Developing complex Excel models to tease themes out of market, sector or industry and company financial data.  Analyze companies and assets through historical operating performance analysis, benchmarking, and business unit analysis.  

 Overview:<br> 

   SUMMARY    This engineering internship will be housed in our brand-new facility in Phoenix, New York. (Opening in January 2019). The student will be a valued team member and participate in multiple projects for our fabricated products facility. These include applying SOLIDWORKS knowledge with the opportunity to gain experience in live application to design, learning design process from conception to delivery, and the application of engineering skills to appropriately design products in daily application.    ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES  include the following. Other duties may be assigned.  Apply SOLIDWORKS knowledge and gain experience in live application to design  Learn design process from Submittal to Order/build/delivery of product  Apply Engineering skills to appropriately design products in day to day tasks     QUALIFICATIONS    To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.    EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE    Junior or Senior pursuing a bachelor's degree in Engineering from a four-year college or university.    PHYSICAL DEMANDS    The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.   While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; and talk and hear. The employee is regularly required to stand and walk. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and, ability to adjust focus.    WORK ENVIRONMENT    The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.   While performing the duties of this job, the employee may be exposed to outside weather conditions. The noise level in the work environment may be loud. 

   About the Role    We are creative and passionate technologists who encourage our teammates to break from convention, experiment with new technologies and teach us new things. Our technology is complex and exciting, and we offer a dynamic and collaborative environment where awesome ideas are generated at all levels and we have the freedom and resources to run with them.     We are looking for an intern to work alongside developers of our company&rsquo;s automated trading system. This intern will be working primarily in C++, but will also need to know Python and SQL.      Responsibilities    Developing new features   Fixing bugs   Writing tests for code changes       Skills and Experience    Proficiency in C++   Working knowledge of Python and SQL   Experience using third party libraries such as Boost   Excellent analytical and communication skills   Passion and willingness to learn       Person Profile    Like us, you don&rsquo;t just do this for work; you do this stuff for fun.     You have a keen interest in the role technology plays in the trading community. You want to jumpstart your career as part of a winning team that has revolutionized and continues to revolutionize the financial services industry. 

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for a full-time summer intern on the Windows Administration team.   The intern will assist with a Laptop Upgrade project in 2021. This is a significant project that will require building an image, building software packages and working with users throughout the laptop migration process. This may include working with NYISO business units verifying required software, migration of user data, verification of build processes, and potentially designing a process to create and maintain an Operating System image. There may also be an opportunity to help with packaging software into our endpoint management tool. <br><br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Current enrollment in Computer Science or related technical degree program  Knowledge and experience with scripting (Powershell) preferred  Experience with Operating System (OS) imaging process  Experience with Windows 10 preferred  Programming/development experience a plus  <br>   The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check.   The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

 Overview:   SMBC Capital Markets is looking for an intern for the IT Business Analyst Group

    CME Group is the world's leading and most diverse derivatives marketplace. But who we are goes deeper than that. Here, you can impact markets worldwide. Transform industries. And build a career shaping tomorrow. We invest in your success and you own it, all while working alongside a team of leading experts who inspire you in ways big and small. Joining our company gives you the opportunity to make a difference in global financial markets every day, whether you work on our industry-leading technology and risk management services, our benchmark products or in a corporate services area that helps us serve our customers better. We&rsquo;re small enough for you and your contributions to be known. But big enough for your ideas to make an impact. The pace is dynamic, the work is unlike any other firm in the business, and the possibilities are endless. Problem solvers, difference makers, trailblazers. Those are our people. And we're looking for more.<br><br> To learn more about what a career at CME Group can offer you, visit us at  www.wherefuturesaremade.com

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43761 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> At Corning, our growth is fueled by a commitment to innovation. We succeed through sustained investment in research &amp; development, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges. We are a four-time National Medal of Technology winner thanks to our technology leadership and R&amp;D environment, which attract and enable the best scientific minds in the world. This pipeline of talent has brought life-changing innovation to your fingertips for more than 160 years. <br>    Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills. As our Intern, you will be responsible for developing applications and infrastructure to support Corning&rsquo;s materials informatics initiatives. Candidates must have experience in one or more programming languages. This position requires good communication and interpersonal skills for collaboration with remote team members.<br>    The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for immediate and future needs.<br>    To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale). <br>   Shape your future; apply with us today! <br>    Program Benefits:   Competitive salaries  Housing assistance  Travel reimbursement<br>      Intern Activities:   Social and networking events  Volunteer opportunities  Community Involvement<br>      Day to Day Responsibilities:   Work as part of a larger project team on various aspects of software engineering  Under the direction of project managers, provide support to the larger team goals of developing software to enable the use of scientific information generated in Research and Development  Work with design experts and users to consider the user experience   Write supporting documentation as necessary for long-term maintenance purposes  <br>    Travel requirements  (please note if international):   Anticipated travel time &lt;10% (domestic).<br>      Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:    M-F; 40 hours per week  Some flexibility required  Duration: Summer 2021, 8-12 weeks  <br>    Education and Experience  (minimum required for consideration):   Pursuing Bachelor of Science or Master&rsquo;s degree in Computer Science or Software Engineering  Will also consider engineering majors with accompanying strong software skills    To qualify for internship, students must be enrolled for school in Fall of 2021. Bachelor's students should be going into senior year (or 2nd year for graduate students).  <br>    Required Skills:   Working knowledge of Linux and Windows operating systems  Foundational knowledge of software algorithms, data structures and design principles with a proven ability to design and build code  Experience with multiple programming languages including Python  Basic understanding of data science and statistical principles<br>      Desired Skills:   Strong Python programming skills  Data science skills  Experience with semantic web technologies  Experience with research processes, either from undergraduate or graduate research projects  Experience with basic software development tools such as git  <br>    Soft Skills  (Communication/Team/Leadership):   Must be self-motivated to deliver meaningful results as required by project   Collaborative and able to openly engage with colleagues from diverse cultures, disciplines and backgrounds to achieve project goals  The ability to communicate effectively by phone and video with team members in multiple locations  The ability to deal with uncertainty  <br>   This position does not support immigration sponsorship <br>   We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status. <br>   We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

      Con Edison Clean Energy Businesses  through its three main subsidiaries Con Edison Development, Con Edison Energy and Con Edison Solutions, develop, own, and operate renewable energy infrastructure and provide energy-related products and services to wholesale and retail customers. Con Edison CEB is the  second-largest  solar producer in North America and the seventh-largest solar producer in the world.

  Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal&rsquo;s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.  Job Description Summary: At PayPal, we&rsquo;re literally reinventing how the world pays and gets paid. We understand that it&rsquo;s about people. We connect individuals to let them shop, get paid, donate and send money using today&rsquo;s technology with the confidence that comes from the security and control PayPal enables. Are you ready to help us change the world? The world&rsquo;s leading payments company, PayPal, brings together a family of brands that are revolutionizing the way people move money. At PayPal you will be immersed in an amazing community with a vibrant culture that thrives on innovation, collaboration, inclusion and wellness.  Job Description:   Software Engineer Interns at PayPal develop innovative solutions and high-quality products that touch millions of people every day around the globe. Our engineers solve some of the most complex technical problems in the world of connected payments across all business units, including PayPal, Braintree, Venmo, Paydiant and others. We are looking for the highest levels of technical talent and programming skills, as well as a keen desire to deeply understand our products and services to push our technology forward with respect to functionality, performance, reliability, and scalability.     You&rsquo;ll work alongside the best and the brightest engineering talent in the industry. We have opportunities in a wide range of areas including development, design, search, platform, test, quality, big data, front end and back end. As a core participant of your team, you&rsquo;ll estimate engineering efforts, design your changes, implement and test your changes, push to live, and triage production issues. You need to be dynamic, collaborative, and curious as we build new experiences, improve existing products, and develop distributed systems powering the world&rsquo;s largest e-commerce and payments websites at a scale only a few companies can match.      Key Responsibilities :   Code high-volume and scalable software   Create web applications using React/Node and other technologies   Create back end services using Java, SQL, ReST   Build and develop new user facing experiences   Partner closely with cross functional teams in design, product and other business units        Basic Requirements:    Must be pursuing a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s degree in Computer Science or related field from an accredited college or university   Strong applied experience. You&rsquo;ve built, broken, and rebuilt software applications. We&rsquo;re looking for creative thinkers who also know how to create real-world products   Working knowledge of web technologies (such as HTTP, HTML/DOM, JavaScript, CSS, AJAX) will be beneficial   Familiarity with Node.js applications   Familiarity with Java, C++ and/or Python   Understanding around concepts like Web Services, SOA, REST APIs   A constant desire to grow, learn, and explore new things      Position Location: Varies    We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.  PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. 

  At Johnson &amp; Johnson, we use technology and the power of teamwork to discover new ways to prevent and overcome the world&rsquo;s the most significant healthcare challenges. Our Corporate, Consumer Health, Medical Devices, and Pharmaceutical teams leverage data, real-world insights, and creative minds to make life-changing healthcare products and medicines. We're disrupting outdated healthcare ecosystems and infusing them with transformative ideas to help people thrive throughout every stage of their lives. With a reach of more than a billion people every day, there&rsquo;s no limit to the impact you can make here. Are you ready to reimagine healthcare? <br>   Here, your career breakthroughs will change the future of health, in all the best ways. And you&rsquo;ll change, too. You&rsquo;ll be inspired, and you&rsquo;ll inspire people across the world to change how they care for themselves and those they love. Amplify your impact. Join us! <br>   J&amp;J Design, part of the Johnson &amp; Johnson Family of Companies, is recruiting for 2021 Summer Design Interns. <br>   The J&amp;J Design Studio works globally across the Company&rsquo;s business segments: Consumer, Pharma, Medical Device and Corporate. By utilizing the power of design, we optimize the user experience for consumers, employees, healthcare providers and patients. <br>   Our work includes packaging, patient journeys, delivery system creation, app development, communication systems, content planning and information architecture. But that&rsquo;s really just a fraction of what we do. <br>   If you have the desire and talent to advance health and wellness, we at J&amp;J Design look forward to seeing your work and hearing your story. <br>   J&amp;J Design is looking for talented Interns. Throughout the Internship Program students will gain hands-on, real world experience in all aspects of the design development process. Interns will also have numerous opportunities presented to them that supplement this singular educational experience such as networking, mentoring opportunities and cross-functional exposure.<br>    We are committed to creating an authentic and inclusive environment where you will thrive both personally and professionally. <br>   Above all else we seek those who are friendly, thoughtful, and perpetually curious; humble to your core with a sharp emotional intelligence; and able to build trust, even when communicating a dissenting point of view. <br>    We currently have opportunities in the following areas:<br>      Brand Design (BXD)   As a BXD Intern, you will gain invaluable experience across the Consumer, Healthcare and Corporate Branding teams. You will help create integrated visual systems, execute brand expressions, contribute to graphic standards across the Enterprise and deliver projects and solutions that include packaging, communications, product and spatial design. Please include personal projects and any special design skills, such as illustration, in your portfolio. <br>    Digital Design (DXD)   As a DXD intern, you will influence and design digital products and services across the J&amp;J businesses by applying skills in UX research, interface design, design thinking and information architecture. From concept testing and prototyping to developing interactions and applying visuals, you will support a variety of J&amp;J touch points including websites, human-machine interfaces, mobile apps and wearables. <br>    Insights Experience &amp; Strategy (IXS)   As an IXS intern, you will work across brand strategy, design research, service design, and business innovation to generate fresh insights from novel methods and sources to inspire. You will apply skills in design strategy, ethnography, research synthesis, storytelling and iterative prototyping to solve problems and develop new ideas.  Portfolio not required  <br>    Spatial Design and Retail   This intern will help develop compelling employee, patient, and customer experiences for Spatial Design and Retail. The work includes ideating, developing journey maps, and sketching out concepts to bring ideas/stories to life for J&amp;J workplace, retail, and healthcare applications. Using the J&amp;J global signage guidelines as a foundation, you will develop signage programs and help design retail merchandising vehicles and graphics. <br>    Communications Design   As a Communications Design Intern, you will gain invaluable experience across the Consumer, Healthcare and Corporate Branding teams. You will support the verbal and visual brand expressions for the Studio across multiple channels through presentation and information design, while using your strong writing skills to advance concise communications. You will have the opportunity to engage with teams cross-functionally to discover and then deliver your projects.<br>     In addition to your design portfolio, writing samples are also required for this role.   A portfolio link   must   be included in the resume or we cannot consider the candidate and will be disqualified.  <br>  Qualifications <br>  Ideal candidates should possess:  A portfolio link included in their resume  Permanent work authorization in the U.S. and will not require work visa sponsorship now or in the future.  A cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher, reflective of all college coursework.  A current status as an actively enrolled student and pursuing a Bachelors or Masters degree.  The ability to work a full-time 40-hour week, from June 14th &ndash; August 20th and in a remote environment. Work hours will be based on Eastern Daylight Time (EDT) <br>    We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. <br>   #JNJDesign #JNJIntern <br>  Primary Location <br> United States-New York-New York-<br> Organization <br> Johnson &amp; Johnson Consumer Inc. (6101)<br> Job Function <br> General Administration<br> Requisition ID <br> 2953200916

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> If you are a current Motorola Solutions employee, please click this link to apply through your Workday account.  </h2>  <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Company Overview  </h2> At Motorola Solutions, we create technologies our customers refer to as their lifeline. Our technology platforms in communications, software, video and services help our customers work safely and more efficiently. Whether it&rsquo;s helping firefighters see through smoke, enabling police officers to see around street corners, or reliably keeping the lights on in homes and businesses around the world, our work supports those who put their lives on the line to keep us safe. Bring your passion, potential and talents to Motorola Solutions, and help us usher in a new era in public safety and security.<br> <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Department Overview  </h2>Motorola Solutions is a world leader in the field of professional mobile communications systems with an impressive heritage of technological innovations and a global base of installed systems. The group's main business is the design and implementation of mission critical digital mobile communication systems for Government &amp; Public Safety Communications customers. <br><br> The NYC Engineering Team, primarily supports State and Local Government <br> Public Safety infrastructure and subscriber design and implementation for projects in New York City. Our office is conveniently located at downtown Brooklyn, steps from major subway hubs. <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Job Description  </h2> Our Company has an outstanding track record of success and strives to build long term relationships with our customers. Customer satisfaction is given great emphasis and we strive to build a trusted advisor relationship with every customer. Motorola Solutions Inc. internship students assist Systems Engineers in all aspects of their work. We start out with the basics with small project assignments. We gradually give you larger projects with more responsibilities. Our goal for our student program is to develop excellent candidates for full time system engineering positions upon graduation.     Our Communication Systems Engineers design radio communication solutions, from the conceptual phases through to implementation that meet customer's requirements. They consult with the customer to determine their requirements to design the best solution to meet their needs. In cooperation with the sales, product development, and project management they develop technical strategies and generate proposals to customers presenting Motorola's solution. They provide coordination with the design and planning of the customer solutions using advanced technologies and provide technical support throughout the pre-sales phase of the project. This involves coverage and antenna site selection, frequency planning, interference analysis, design of system architecture, equipment selection, proposal generation, and presentations of proposed solutions to customer. System Engineers are then engaged in the implementation of these solutions as originally conceived. They take responsibility for all technical aspects of the assigned project from award until system acceptance. This involves implementation planning, system acceptance testing, coverage testing, and system staging. Travel is required for customer meetings, system staging, system implementation, and training.     Our engineers also work to ensure that the our sales professionals and customers are kept up to date on the latest technology offerings from Motorola Solutions and their relevance to customer needs. Our Senior Engineers support their colleagues to enhance both individual and group competencies, including mentoring junior system engineers. We expect our engineers to operate as professionals and take responsibility for their development including professional and technical skills needed for their success as an engineer.      Specific Knowledge/Skills:    Currently pursuing a Bachelors or Masters Degree. Preferred emphasis in Wireless, Electrical, System or Computer Engineering or Computer Science   Excellent communications skills and the ability to present complex topics to non-technical audiences   Self-motivated and able to maintain focus in a pressured environment   Experience working with customers is desirable   Experience/ Knowledge in radio systems, radio propagation, RF, wireless, broadband, microwave, and/or networking is desirable.   Experience/ Knowledge of communications networks (MPLS, Ethernet, TCP/IP) is desirable   Certifications through CCNA, CompTIA, and/ or Amateur Radio/ HAM is desirable   <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Basic Requirements  </h2> Must be pursuing a Bachelors or Masters Degree   Graduation date must be on or after September 2021<br>    <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Travel Requirements  </h2>Under 10% <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Relocation Provided  </h2>None <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Position Type  </h2>Intern <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"><br> Referral Payment Plan  </h2>No<br> <br><br> EEO Statement    Motorola Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran's status, or, any other protected characteristic. 

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Virtual Software Engineer Internships, Summer 2021 </h1> Location  New York, New York   Business:  HBO   Position Type:  Intern  Job ID  180425BR    Company Overview <br><br> WarnerMedia is a leading media and entertainment company that creates and distributes premium and popular content from a diverse array of talented storytellers and journalists to global audiences through its consumer brands including: HBO, HBO Max, Warner Bros., TNT, TBS, truTV, CNN, DC Entertainment, New Line, Cartoon Network, Adult Swim, Turner Classic Movies and others.<br><br> HBO is one of the most respected and innovative entertainment brands in the world, serving iconic, award-winning programming to 140 million subscribers globally. A subsidiary of WarnerMedia, HBO is the world&rsquo;s most successful pay TV service with an extensive array of programming that includes some of the most notable titles to be on television, including drama series Succession&reg;, Watchmen&reg;, Westworld&reg;, Big Little Lies&reg;, Game of Thrones&reg;, The Sopranos&reg;, Band of Brothers&reg; and The Wire&reg;, as well as comedy series Barry&reg;, Insecure&reg; and Sex and the City&reg;. HBO is committed to retaining and recruiting skilled and motivated employees, placing a priority on qualified team players who contribute to the diversity of their workforce. HBO offers competitive benefits to include medical, dental, vision, a matched 401(k) plan, flexible spending, a commuter benefit program and tuition reimbursement. 

  Vimeo has billions of videos on its platform and millions of people performing searches on that content every month. The Search and Recommendations team surfaces the most relevant content to users, from their own assets to millions of public videos. Powering the very best search experience will require thoughtfulness about the user experience, a lot of data, and cutting edge machine learning. Your task will be to leverage data and algorithms to improve the search experience for our users. You might boost query understanding with NLP, use computer vision techniques to enrich how we index our videos into Elasticsearch, or explore ways to provide personalized search results. The possibilities are endless.    What you'll do:   Write clean, portable, and well-documented code  Work with various machine learning algorithms to boost our search systems' ability to provide relevant, personalized results in any context  Gain experience using docker, kubernetes, and Google Cloud technologies for deployments of models  Iterate on your implementations and designs in a data driven environment  Gain domain knowledge related to Search by working with experienced search relevance engineers.  Grow technically by learning from talented full stack engineers    What we're seeking:   Some familiarity, interest, and experience with Data Science and Machine Learning (bonus for anything search related, NLP, computer vision, or recommendation systems)  You have an understanding of Web services and REST APIs  You are problem-solver who is interested in scale, efficiency, and performance optimization  You dream big with solutions but also have a strong practical streak in evaluating whether they can and should be implemented  You're driven towards projects that have an impact on user experience    Bonus points:   You are familiar with PHP, Python, Go, or Java  You have strong opinions about how Vimeo search can be improved and are interested in search as a problem  You have public code viewable on Github, Bitbucket, etc.    About us:    Vimeo is the world's leading all-in-one video software solution. Our platform enables any professional, team, and organization to unlock the power of video to create, collaborate and communicate. We proudly serve our growing community of over 200 million users &mdash; from creatives to entrepreneurs to the world's largest companies.

Software Management Information Systems Intern (NYC) <br><br> What You Will Do:  Retensa's Technology Interns will work in a fast-paced and forward-thinking environment to assist in the design, architecture, and deployment of cloud-based Software as a Service applications, new websites and mobile application programs. While gaining true hands-on experience, you will engage in real-world cross-functional technology problem solving from the ground up. In addition, the internship provides insight on innovative solutions to help us respond to changing markets with speed and flexibility. <br><br> This is not a filing and copying internship. <br><br> The internship is for focused individuals with previous software skills desiring real-world experience to expand your knowledge and develop your career in a short period of time. <br><br> _______________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ <br><br> Who We Are:  Retensa is internationally recognized as a thought leader by ABC News, Forbes, the Wall Street Journal, BusinessWeek, and the New York Times as a leader and innovator of Employee Retention Strategies and Workforce Technology. Retensa provides talent management solutions to mid-size and large firms on 5 continents in 15 languages with a mission of creating workplaces where every employee is engaged by what they do, and inspired by who they work for. Retensa helps employers reduce staff turnover, improve morale, and mine HR data for predictive analytics. <br><br> What We Believe:  Retensa views internships as a way to enhance your career and personal growth while we achieve collaborative innovation. As an intern with us, you will be at the forefront of Management Consulting, Cloud Technology, and Rapid Application Development. <br><br> What You Are:  Candidates should be hard working, enthusiastic, and resourceful Seniors or Graduate students in CS, CIS, Web Tech, IT, or MIS. Candidates must have experience in any TWO of the following: <br><br> 1) Web app development 3) Application Testing 5) Amazon Cloud (AWS) <br><br> 2) Mobile app development 4) Ecommerce/Merchant Services 6) Software Documentation <br><br> Required:  Strict Minimum 3.0 GPA. Prior web technology skills of any kind are required. Automation testing experience is preferred. <br><br> Responsibilities: <br> Reviewing and supporting application standards  Supporting implementation of automation testing and bug testing  Updating software tools  Updating product development methodologies and processes  R&D research on the newest technologies and best practices   The ideal software engineering intern applicant should be proficient in English and possess good written and verbal communication skills. This person should be a strong team player with a positive attitude. <br><br> Time:  Min 24 -32 max hours. Minimum of 3 days/week, part-time/flexible hours available. <br><br> To apply, please submit your application to our Careers Site <br><br> Due to the high volume of applicants, we may only be able to contact qualified candidates.*  

     Now&rsquo;s our time to inspire the future of healthcare together.      At Siemens Healthineers, we are passionate about enabling healthcare professionals to deliver high quality patient care, and to do so affordably. A leading global healthcare company, Siemens Healthineers continues to strengthen our portfolio of medical imaging and laboratory diagnostics, while adding new offerings such as managed services, consulting, and healthcare IT services &ndash; as well as further technologies in the growing market for therapeutic and molecular diagnostics.     Siemens Healthineers develops innovations that support better patient outcomes with greater efficiencies, giving providers the confidence, they need to meet the clinical, operational and financial challenges of a changing healthcare landscape. Join our team now at Siemens Healthineers as an  Industrial Design Intern .      This is a role well suited to an ambitious professional, looking for the next step in their career. As an Industrial Design Intern, you will be responsible for :<br>  Build full scale prototype mock-ups using foam core and 3D printed parts for usability and ergonomic studies, to evaluate functional layouts, volume studies and product design concepts   Develop design concepts and solutions for products and product features using a variety of media and tools from hand sketches to 3D CAD models   Compile design research including creating visuals to support industry trends, ergonomic data, Interaction Design analysis, etc.   Assist designers to generate product color studies and product graphics (branding and labeling artwork) using graphics software   Support designers with converting CAD data to use with the Virtual Reality tool for prototyping concepts to evaluate design, user and service access   Collaborate with designers and cross functional team members including UX, Interaction Design, Graphic Design, Mechanical Engineering and Marketing       Required skills to have for the success of this role      Must have a minimum GPA of 3.2 or higher   Must be currently enrolled in a Bachelor&rsquo;s (rising junior/senior) or Master&rsquo;s Industrial Design program    Please provide link to portfolio samples        Start Date: Summer 2021; 3-month duration      At Siemens Healthineers, we value those who dedicate their energy and passion to a greater cause. Our people make us unique as an employer in the med-tech industry. What unites and motivates our global team is the inspiration of our common purpose: To innovate for healthcare, building on our remarkable legacy of pioneering ideas that translate into even better healthcare products and services. We recognize that taking ownership of our work allows both us and the company to grow. We offer you a flexible and dynamic environment and the space to move beyond your comfort zone to grow both personally and professionally.      If you want to join us in transforming the way healthcare is delivered, visit our career site at  https://usa.healthcare.siemens.com/careers     If you wish to find out more about the specific before applying, please visit: https://usa.healthcare.siemens.com/about.     As an equal-opportunity employer we are happy to consider applications from individuals with disabilities. 

 Way Creative House is looking for a web development intern to learn from and work within our WordPress division. The right intern will work closely with our team to develop client projects that align with their customer goals. This role is perfect for a student or early-stage developer that appreciates the ability to work on their own time and is a self-starter.   **Please respond with links to your work with WORDPRESS/portfolios and  a cover letter detailing your abilities, work history, and why you'd be a great fit for the position. This role is fully remote. Submissions without cover letters and completed assessments will NOT be considered.     Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:    Hone WordPress development skills  Participate in additional agency initiatives: app dev, software dev, etc.  Bugfix, QA, problem solve.  Maintain, update, and improve existing company websites.  Implement websites, landing pages, and applications from concept through deployment, with a responsive, mobile-first approach.  Working closely with other team members in the development team.  Knowledge of JavaScript, jQuery, HTML, HTML5, CSS, CSS3, GIT are a huge plus   The right candidate will be a self-starter and able to work on their own just as well as with the team.  Thank you!  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Benefits:  Professional development assistance   Schedule:  Day shift   Shift Availability:  Day Shift (Required)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Hours per week:  10-19   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   This Company Describes Its Culture as:  Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused  Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking  Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture  People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused  Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

    Job ID: 230985  <br> Callanan Industries, Inc., a CRH Company, was founded in 1883 as an aggregate mining company. Over a century later, Callanan Industries, Inc. continues to be a leading supplier of paving materials and construction services, providing a complete range of high quality aggregates, asphalt paving, and ready mix concrete products to state, federal, municipal, commercial, and private customers with operations throughout New York State and Western Massachusetts. Callanan Industries, Inc. was purchased by CRH Americas in 1985.   <br>   Job Description Summary <br> We are looking for Interns for our Quality Control Department at our stone and asphalt quarries for Summer 2021 . Our paid internship program provides a rich and rewarding hands on learning experience and the opportunity to make a contribution to our organization. Our interns work in their course of study under close direction of an experienced supervisor/manager. Our quality control interns work in our quarries and test aggregate and ashalt building materials to ensure they meet our high quality standards.   <br>  Locations: Albany, Sullivan, Oneida, Montgomery and Ulster counties  <br>  Requirements/Competencies    Computer Skills: To perform this job successfully, an individual should be able to type and use keyboards accurately and be skilled in Microsoft Office Suite and Database software   Ability to work in a fast paced environment   Monitor and test process functions and materials daily to ensure products meet or exceed requirements of the appropriate agency or customer   Correct any deviations in these processed or materials from the requirements   Follow quality control plans or guidelines as assigned   Evaluate data for deviations or trends away from accepted standards   Maintain test result database; input data   Assist internal and external customers in any quality related matters   Drug screen required before being employed by Callanan Industries, Inc.   Regular and predictable attendance at assigned times is required   Ability to build partnerships and to work with others to meet shared objectives   Demonstrate strong communication skills   Ability to create new and better ways for the organization to be successful   Actively seeks new ways to grow and be challenged using both formal &amp; informal channels of development   <br>  Education/Experience    High School Diploma or equivalent   Qualified undergraduate student enrolled in one of the following degrees or related programs: Quality Control, Mechanical, Heavy Equipment Operations, Civil Engineering, Operations Management.    <br>   What CRH Americas Offers You    <br>  A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion   Highly competitive base pay   Group retirement 401(k) savings program    <br>   About CRH Americas    <br>  CRH Americas has a long and proud heritage as one of North America&rsquo;s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the CRH Americas family. CRH Americas operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise.   <br>  CRH Americas is a great place to grow! If you&rsquo;re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the CRH Americas family!   <br>  Callanan Industries, Inc is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.    EOE/Vet/Disability-If you want to know more, please click on this link. 

  We are looking for outstanding intern engineers who are interested in the challenges of building high scale systems using current and robust technologies. Our ideal candidates are engineers who can apply Computer Science principles to solve challenging problems and expand Tapad's product offerings.   We are a small, talented team of pragmatic, productive software engineers. We have created a culture of transparency and accountability, which minimizes bureaucracy to maximize developer freedom, autonomy, and creative development time. We are looking for interns who are creative and innovative thinkers. You will experience what it is like to be an engineer in a fun, technology-first startup atmosphere. You will be paired with an engineering mentor for guidance and advice throughout the program.    We are looking for candidates who meet some of the following qualifications:   Studying to finish a BS, MS, or Ph.D. in a technical major  Understanding of concurrent and parallel programming  Knowledge of algorithms and data structures  Bonus: SQL and functional programming experience, specifically Scala    A day in the life as a Software Engineer Intern:   Designing, implementing, and running big data pipelines that canvas over petabytes of data  Contributing to real production projects that constitute Tapad's core offering  Collaborate with your team of engineers, and contribute to product, account, and business development functions to create new products and features    Technologies we use at Tapad:   Google Cloud Platform (GCP)  Scala, Cats, SBT, Play!, Akka,  Spark, Python  Kubernetes, BigTable, BigQuery  TypeScript, Angular, Node.js, Hapi.js, Postgres, MySql    In this role, you will be using  (don't worry, we'll teach you) :   Google Cloud Platform (GCP)  Scala, SBT, Play!, Akka  Spark, Python, SQL, BigQuery    Tapad Intern Perks:   Gain valuable experience working in a cutting edge and data-driven environment using state of the art technologies  Dynamic and fast-paced well-established start-up  A designated mentor to help guide you through the 10-week internship program  Ongoing training, which will include Scala School, access to Coursera, peer-led professional development, and an abundance of resources to help guide you through your internship  Catered lunches and unlimited in-office snacks and beverages  Leadership lunches - sit with the CEO, CTO, and CPO, and ask them anything your heart desires  Foosball, ping pong, diversity and inclusion group, book club, and tons of other extra-curricular activities that will make you feel like part of the Tapad family    Additional Perks if remote:   Virtual game nights, diversity and inclusion group, book club, and other extra-curricular activities that will make you feel like part of the Tapad family  Leadership lunches over zoom. We'll deliver food to your doorstep!    About Tapad:    Founded in 2010, Tapad cracked the code on cross-device marketing technology. Our groundbreaking, proprietary technology assimilates trillions of data points to find the relationship between smartphones, desktops, laptops, tablets, connected TVs, and gaming consoles. Ten years later, we are processing data at petabyte scale, with an engineering team that comprises roughly half of our entire organization. When you work with us, you matter, and your work matters.   We use Scala, in combination with large-scale data processing and open-source technologies, to build our device graph. Across our engineering teams, we also use Scala, GCP, Spark, Kubernetes, Python, TypeScript, Angular, and anything else that helps us get the job done. We're open-minded about new technologies, we're passionate about what we do, and we make time for everyone to learn and grow as the industry changes. Engineers at Tapad are approachable and ambitious people who think outside the box and solve big problems collaboratively. Are you up for the challenge? <br>    Tapad is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and will consider all qualified applicants regardless of age, sex, race, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or family status, disability, or any other legally protected status. Tapad does not accept resumes from unsolicited search firms nor recruiters. In no event shall fees be paid to any unsolicited search firms nor recruiters, regardless of whether the candidate is made an offer or accepts a placement at Tapad. All resumes received through any channels will be considered the sole property of Tapad.   -   #LI-DNP 

     Location:  Painted Post, NY, US, 14870    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43439 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&amp;D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.<br><br> Corning&rsquo;s Environmental Technologies segment manufactures ceramic substrates and filter products for emissions control in mobile and stationary applications around the world. <br>     Scope of Position:    The individual will work with Engineering in the development of process controls technology to improve and optimize Corning's manufacturing processes.<br>     Day to Day Responsibilities:    Work with cross functional teams on process improvements through the specification, development, and implementation of process controls solutions   Evaluate existing controls strategies and propose enhancements   Develop and apply process controls skills to implement controls solutions ranging from PID to multivariate model predictive control and other classic and non-classic controls schemes.   Work with process experts and apply process data analysis skills to gain fundamental understanding of manufacturing processes.   Generate technical documentation of designs and implementations.   Identify potential issues within existing systems.<br>      Travel Requirements:    You can expect less than 5% travel<br>      Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:    Your typical work schedule will be 8-5, with some off hours support or overtime<br>      Required Education and Experience:    You should be a rising Sophomore or Junior in Electrical or Computer Engineering   Basic knowledge of control theory   Knowledge of a programming language   Ability to work with minimal supervision   Proficient in Microsoft Office   Technical Curiosity with desire to learn advanced controls techniques such as adaptive, multivariate, nonlinear, model-based, and multivariate<br>      Desired Skills:    Ability to work with minimal supervision   Proficient in Microsoft Office   Experience with PID based closed loop control   Use of tools like MATLAB to perform data analysis, signal processing, control design, controls system performance analysis and tuning, and plot generation   Strong communications skills that span from non-technical to very technical interactions<br>      Soft Skills:    Your verbal and written communication skills as well as attention to detail and ability to handle ambiguity will be significant skills for success.   We value a positive teammate who is customer-focused, open and approachable to effectively collaborate in teams in a multi-cultural environment and across all levels of our organization.<br>     Are you able to lead and influence others (suppliers, commercial partners, etc.)?<br>    Are you a self-starter with the technical curiosity to learn new things and bring forth new ideas?<br>    Does your flexibility and dedication to succeed support a positive can-do attitude?<br>    This position does not support immigration sponsorship. <br>   We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status. <br>   We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

                       IT Programmer - Internship:   SearchEffects.com &ndash; IT Programming Internships  SearchEffects.com is seeking IT programming interns in New York City to work on new and existing projects. Some knowledge of .NET / C# and SQL/Store Procedure, XML feeds, and database management is preferred. Website design and development skills are necessary.  Preferred Technical Requirements:  .NET  SQL   Store Procedure  C#  MultiThreading Model and Architecture  Data Model / ER Diagrams  Data Flow Diagram  XML Feeds  XML Handler  Server setup and website development   Best location and working environment. Please send your resume today! 

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43760 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> At Corning, our growth is fueled by a commitment to innovation. We succeed through sustained investment in research &amp; development, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges. We are a four-time National Medal of Technology winner thanks to our technology leadership and R&amp;D environment, which attract and enable the best scientific minds in the world. This pipeline of talent has brought life-changing innovation to your fingertips for more than 160 years.   Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills. As our Intern, you will be responsible for analyzing data to solve problems and/or quantify behaviors in the field of materials science. This position requires good communication and interpersonal skills for collaboration with remote team members.<br>    The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for immediate and future needs.<br>    To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale). <br>   Shape your future; apply with us today! <br>    Program Benefits:   Competitive salaries  Housing assistance  Travel reimbursement<br>      Intern Activities:   Social and networking events  Volunteer opportunities  Community Involvement<br>      Day to Day Responsibilities:   Gather existing data and/or generate physics-based information to solve technical problems in a material&rsquo;s focused research facility  

  Summer Research Training Program in Biomedical Big Data Science   The Ma’ayan Laboratory of Computational Systems Biology at the Icahn School of Medicine at Mount Sinai in New York City is currently accepting applications for the 2021 Summer Research Training Program in Biomedical Big Data Science. This is a research intensive ten-week training program for undergraduate and graduate students interested in participating in cutting edge research projects aimed at solving data-intensive biomedical problems. Summer fellows training in the Ma’ayan Laboratory conduct faculty-mentored independent research projects in the following areas: data harmonization, machine learning, cloud computing and dynamic data visualization.  Students majoring in Computer Science, Informatics, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering, Chemistry/Chemical Sciences or Biological Sciences and have an interest in Biomedical Big Data Science are encouraged to apply.  Salary: Students will earn a $8,000 salary for the ten-week training period.  The application deadline is February 1, 2021 at 5:00 PM Eastern Time.  Program details and how to apply can be found here: http://labs.icahn.mssm.edu/maayanlab/summer-research-program/  Job Type: Internship  Pay: $800.00 per week  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Work Location:  One location   Company's website:  https://labs.icahn.mssm.edu/maayanlab/summer-research-program/   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Personal protective equipment provided or required  Social distancing guidelines in place  Virtual meetings  Sanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place  

    Job Description 

     About this role:    We are seeking an exceptional engineering intern to help us build the most joyful and fun shopping experience for parents. This is an incredible opportunity to join our lean Product team - we build and ship at great speed, and you will play a crucial role in helping us improve and implement our processes, customer interactions and data analysis.   You will learn best practices and agile software development and how to deliver high quality products while working and communicating in a fast-paced team environment.   Please note that this role can be based in San Francisco, CA, New York, NY or remotely.    Your responsibilities will include:     Assist on the design and implementation of new and existing features for our unique e-commerce platform.     Contribute on the implementation of our internal tools that drive the entire business flows from operations to business intelligence.     Work closely with the design and product teams to deliver top of the line visual experiences to increase customer retention and attract new ones.     Integrate and visualize custom build data queries provided by our data scientists into our platform.     Participate in code reviews and QA of other team member's contributions.      The ideal candidate will exceed the following requirements:     Programming experience, including a basic knowledge of key CS concepts (basic data structures, memory management, basic algorithms)     Experience with Python (preferred Django or any other web framework experience as well)     Experience with Javascript (preferred ReactJS or any other modern frontend framework as well)     Some basic knowledge of databases and the SQL language     Experience with distributed version control systems, specially Git, is a plus.     Knowledge and/or experience with TDD and DDD is a big plus.      About Dopple:    Dopple is reimagining kids&rsquo; retail, creating the most joyful shopping experience for parents! We are the premier children's clothing subscription service, offering the world's coolest kids styles in a convenient try-on-at-home model. Parents simply tell Dopple what they want and need via a short quiz and Dopple does the rest, curating a unique &ldquo;Drop&rdquo; of the coolest kids&rsquo; clothing and accessories selected for each customer&rsquo;s budget, style and size.   Our team is passionate about leveraging data, customer feedback and our incredible selection of the world&rsquo;s best childrenswear brands to curate and deliver personalized styles at amazing prices.   We are a close-knit team of hardworking, creative builders and problem solvers in San Francisco, California; New York, NY; North Bergen, New Jersey and distributed around the world.    We are an equal opportunity employer who celebrates diversity. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.     To apply, please send a copy of your resume and brief cover letter to joinus@thedopple.com. We can&rsquo;t wait to hear from you!  

     Who We Are:  New York Air Brake has been serving the rail industry since 1890 with innovative train control systems. Headquartered in Watertown, New York, with operations in Nixa &amp; Kansas City, Missouri; Irving, Texas; West Chicago, Illinois and a brand new, state-of-the-art manufacturing facility in Salisbury, North Carolina. Known for innovation, quality, customer focus, and safety, NYAB continues to grow and offer career opportunities in a people-first environment. <br>    This is your opportunity to make a big impact on the next generation of electronic controls and braking safety systems. The Co-op opportunity is for students with a GPA of 3.0 or higher in any of the following disciplines: Software Engineering, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering. You can expect challenging work and an insiders view into your future profession. You will work as an individual and as part of a project team, while receiving regular feedback in preparation for a final presentation to company leaders. <br>     Opportunity to work with Software Engineers on any of the following tasks:   Investigate software bug reports, change requests  Design, code, modify, debug, test and document software  Author documents (Design, Interface control, Functional, etc...)  Provide task breakdown and effort estimates  Unit tests - Design, document, execute and result recording  Integration tests - Design, document, execute and result recording  Report issues including timely escalation  Use software configuration management (SCM) tools  Work under supervision/guidance of other Systems Engineers, Project Managers, Customer support, Test Engineers and Software Engineers  Perform any other duties assigned by the management  <br>     What We Offer:  Our internships are not all work. NYAB is located in Watertown, New York. When not working, spend your free time hiking the Adirondack Mountains, kayaking the many waterways, enjoying the beaches of Lake Ontario or exploring the history, food and fun the Thousand Islands Region has to offer. You are just a short drive to World Class Casino&rsquo;s, Golf, Shopping and the award winning Finger Lakes Wine Country. Our interns begin work as early as the end of May and work up until the middle of August. Expect 40 hours per week and a competitive salary (based on experience and position) of up to $20 per hour. You will take part in special events, &amp; outings, take advantage of wellness &amp; workout programs in our fitness facility or join the lunchtime kickball league. There is something for everyone as a summer intern. <br> Required Skills<br> C/C++ programming, Real-time/Embedded Systems  UNIX/Linux, QNX, Windows  MS office suite  Familiarity with OOAD  <br>     The successful candidate will have the following skills:   Detail oriented  Good problem-solving skills  Good communication and team skills  Ability to work in a cross-functional team in a dynamic working environment including international team members  <br><br> Required Experience<br> Previous relevant internship, co-op, course, or work experience    Education:    GPA of 3.0 or higher in any of the following disciplines: Software Engineering, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering. You will work within the Software Engineering group. <br>     Offers of employment are contingent on pre-employment drug testing and criminal background screening results  <br>     New York Air Brake is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to excellence through diversity: EOE/AA/M/F/D/V  

 Looking for a career with purpose? ...one that challenges your mind, grows your skills and makes a difference in our world? Do you pride yourself on solving problems that others think are impossible? If you answered yes to these questions, then please consider joining Lockheed Martin Rotary and Mission Systems in Owego, NY. We are seeking an energetic, enthusiastic candidate striving to succeed in a career that develops new skills while performing a variety of tasks to include analysis, problem solving, and critical thinking. This employment opportunity with Lockheed Martin includes on-the-job mentorship by some of the brightest engineers in the defense industry who will challenge you to grow your skills in computer systems, software development, integration and/or testing.<br> An intern in this position will work closely with a team of engineers in a technical application area such as military aircraft avionics, mission systems, sensor subsystems or mail handling systems, unmanned vehicles, mission planning, simulation or automation. Assigned Software Engineering tasks may include: requirements analysis, design, code, software unit test, documentation review and update, testing of recent engineering releases, analysis &amp; documentation of problem trouble reports found during testing, providing written and verbal status of testing progress to the engineering team and providing suggestions for problem trouble report resolution.<br> Candidates that have a strong desire to engage, and understand the fundamentals of engineering are encouraged to apply.<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Positive attitude and a willingness to learn a variety of new skills &amp; tools  Excels in both team &amp; individual work  Good working knowledge of Windows and Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel)  Some programming using languages such as Python, C, C++, or Java  2.5 GPA or higher preferred, but not required (Cumulative or Major GPA)  Ability to obtain an interim secret clearance prior to start  Ability to obtain and maintain secret clearance once in role    Desired Skills: <br> Experience with embedded or Linux operating systems, shell scripting  Experience with software installation and testing  High School course work or lab experience in one or more of the following is highly desirable: design, software, robotics or other competition teams related to engineering projects  Strong Math background    BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern

     Interested in an   outstanding opportunity   to become part of a team with a stellar reputation as a community engaged Employer of Choice?  <br>     Established in 1905, Consigli has grown over the last 100 years from a local fourth generation family business into one of the largest construction managers and general contractors in the Northeast and Mid-Atlantic regions that has now transitioned to   100-percent employee-ownership  .  <br>     Ranked as one of the Best Places to Work by the Boston Globe, the Boston Business Journal, the Hartford Business Journal, and MaineBiz, our culture draws raw talent from college intern to seasoned veteran with substantial years of experience in their field. We credit empowerment, innovation and &ldquo;thinking great&rdquo; for our continual growth and success. Most importantly, we are thankful for our employees and are proud to have one of the most exciting project portfolios in the business.  <br>    This Intern position reports directly to a Project Superintendent on assigned special projects. The role will assist the Project Superintendent and Assistant Superintendent with managing all construction activities on the project site.    Additional Duties/Responsibilities include:   Help administer project safety program to maintain a safe and healthy work environment  Helps provide technical assistance on the project, interprets contract drawings and submittals  Assist assistant superintendent, project superintendent, and project manager with daily and weekly tasks including daily reports, daily safety walks, weekly quantity reports, and weekly schedule updates  Understand the project schedule and the critical path  Review content for the short term plan  Participate in the quality program including attending meetings, performing inspections, and verifying materials  <br>    This is an internship position. Standard work hours are Monday through Friday, 7 a.m. to 4 pm. Interviews will be conducted throughout the fall of 2020 <br> Required Skills<br> Pursuing a bachelor&rsquo;s degree in a relevant field with a demonstrated interest in the construction management industry.  Strong preference given for students studying Civil Engineering or a Construction related field <br>      An Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer <br> Consigli provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. <br> Required Experience

 Engineer Internship <br/>Our company client has one of the most economically influential platforms to launch in 2021.  We're Looking forFullStack Engineers living in the New Jersey or New York area.  Engineers looking to earn a full time executive position within 6-8 months AFTER interning (unpaid) under the Lead Backend Security Engineer for Spotify and Venmo/Paypal.  This is an economically sustainable on-demand platform, which was evaluated at $125 Million during Forbes Summit '2019. The platform had up to six offers up to $25 Million, PRE-revenue and Pre-Launch.  It will be the first economically sustainable on-demand platform to generate up to seven streams of income, and host up to seven markets that generate up to 900 Billion in revenue annually; profitable within a pandemic or recession.  Our Lead Engineer (Advisor) Credentials and Background:  NJIT Master's Degree, Data Science, 4.0  NJIT Bachelor Degree, Web & Information Systems, 3.89  Coursera: Verified Certificates (Computational Investing)  Udacity: NanoDegree, Deep Learning  The Data Incubator: Scholar, Deep Learning with BigDL  Chief Technical Advisor: Movement Vault  Platform Lead Backend Engineer: Venmo  Mentor: Techstars  Computer Science Teacher: Outco Inc.  Engineering: Spotify - Present  Raritan Valley College, Associate of Science, Web Developer, 3.56 Cum Laude   -  CREDENTIALS TO JOIN:<br/> Engineers (frontend or backend) MUST be fluent and experienced with using the following to build an APP; NO EXCEPTIONS:   React Native (frontend) and Django (Backend), Github, AWS, and Slack.   FrontEnd engineers must be fluent and experienced in React Native.   Backend Engineers must be fluent and experienced in Django.    Engineers must also be experienced in 3 or more of the following:  password encryption + salt  backend server  build token service for login and registration (open api)  build and query database  the api gateway and amazon web services  JSON language (formats / sends data)  Java Script (backend) using node js  writing in Unity engine + C sharp language  backend security; Firewalls and encryption    Minimum Requirement of 15-20 hrs a week.  <br/> Starting in December 2020    This platform has a lot of backend data; geographic, gps, sales, and more.<br/>Engineers can be in school or have a job currently. All engineers are guaranteed permanent positions with their desired position (salary to match position) once the app goes to market (scheduled) in Spring 2021; provided quality work and hours are met. There are currently 6 engineers on the team working remotely from various states, and 45 team members with advisors who are managers at Ernst & Young (DC and NYC), Spotify, Venmo/Paypal, and Madison Square Garden.  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Contract, Internship  Pay: $0.00 per hour  Benefits:  Flexible schedule  Professional development assistance   Schedule:  Monday to Friday  Weekends   Contract Length:  7 - 11 months   Full Time Opportunity:  Yes   Work Location:  Multiple locations   Hours per week:  10-19   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:  People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects  Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction  Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture  Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity  High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment   Company's website:  www.fashionentertainmentmedia.com   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  

 <h1 class="jobSectionHeader"> Virtual HBO Max Data Science Intern &ndash; Summer 2021 </h1> Location  Burbank, California | New York, New York   Business:  Turner   Position Type:  Intern  Job ID  180077BR   The WarnerMedia Story <br> WarnerMedia is a leading media and entertainment company that creates and distributes premium and popular content from a diverse array of talented storytellers and journalists to global audiences through its consumer brands including: HBO, HBO Now, HBO Max, Warner Bros., TNT, TBS, truTV, CNN, DC Entertainment, New Line, Cartoon Network, Adult Swim, Turner Classic Movies and others.<br><br> The Job <br> The HBO Max Data Science team is responsible for designing and executing end-to-end data science solution to transform data into actionable insights, and help our business stakeholder to decide how to create, market, and distribute our content &amp; service.<br> We are looking for an eager and analytical individual who has strong data science background and wants to create an impact on our business.<br><br> The Essentials   Familiar with a variety of machine learning and/or deep learning techniques.   Hands-on experience using Python.   Experience in data processing using SQL.   Passionate to apply the ML algorithm to real business challenges.   Motivation to learn new skills, tools, and analytics techniques.   Detail-oriented   Effective written and verbal communication skills   Interest in media &amp; entertainment, and LOVE watching new shows on HBO Max.  <br>  Internship Program   Students must be currently enrolled in a college degree program for full duration of the internship.   Summer 2021 program dates are June 7th - August 13th; must be available for full program duration.   Full-time schedule (35-40 hours/week) designed for full program immersion.   Fully remote/virtual experience; company owned laptop provided for the duration of the internship program.   Salary based on office location; relocation is not provided.   This position is targeted toward upperclassmen and graduate students.  <br>  The Perks   Hands-on work with passionate, talented team members in your field   Networking opportunities with industry-leading professionals   Engaging events including executive speakers sessions, professional development workshops, and more   Opportunity to join the WarnerMedia family of powerhouse brands  <br> Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers. Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.

  The Data Science Summer Intern at Lazard will work within the Data Analytics Group. The primary responsibility is to help analyze large-scale data sets in finance and extract insights that add value to our Financial Advisory business. The Data Science Summer Intern will have the opportunity to work closely with data scientists, investment bankers and senior management across the Firm.   Successful candidates should have a strong quantitative background, including solid statistical modeling skills and hands-on programming experiences.   The summer internship will begin in late early June and will run for 10 weeks, concluding in early August.     Qualifications   Advanced degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, Quantitative Finance or equivalent  Strong statistical/econometric modeling skills or knowledge in machine learning algorithms  Ability to query and analyze data from large scale databases. Prior experience in big data engineering preferred  Strong programming skills in Python, R or MATLAB  Experience with object-oriented programming preferred  Experience with data visualization or BI tools: D3, Power BI, Tableau, Qlik or equivalent  Ability to work both independently and as a team player  Strong interest or previous experience in finance preferred  

   Location:  Central Administration - 900 Watervliet Shaker Road   Start Date:  March 1, 2021 (Hours are part-time depending on availability.)   Basic Function:   An Information Security Intern (BOCES) works under direct supervision, undertaking a variety of projects as they relate to the information security and systems architecture of the Capital Region BOCES/Northeastern Regional Information Center (NERIC) Data &amp; Network Operations Center. Projects carried out by persons in this position are part of the regular routine of the department and are of an in-service training nature designed to provide maximum exposure to experience in a designated field. Information Security Intern (BOCES) positions provide an on-the-job training situation through work based learning. Supervision is not a responsibility of this position. Does related work as required.   Responsibilities:   1. Specific duties will vary with each project assignment, all relating to the information security and systems architecture of the Capital Region BOCES/Northeastern Regional Information Center (NERIC) Data &amp; Network Operations Center.<br> 2. Ability to learn the principles and practices of networking, information security and operating systems.<br> 3. Ability to learn sources of information and technological developments in the field of information security and systems architecture.<br> 4. Ability to learn about the organization of a BOCES.<br> 5. Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing.<br> 6. Ability to understand and follow oral and written instructions.<br> 7. Ability to carry out project assignments of a broadly defined nature.<br> 8. Physical condition commensurate with the demands of the position. <br>  Job Qualifications <br>  A. Current enrollment at a regionally accredited college or university or one accredited by the New York State Board of Regents with completion of at least sixty (60) credits in a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree program in information security, information systems, computer science, information resources management, information technology or a closely related field. <br>  Position Start Date: 03/01/2021<br> Application Deadline: 01/29/2021<br> Civil Service Title:  Information Security Intern (BOCES)<br> Job Number:  2021-124

    Share: 

Welcome to Kodak Alaris. Kodak Alaris is a company born from one of the world's most iconic brands, Kodak. Kodak Alaris is passionate about using technology to transform organizations and improve people's lives across the globe. Our digital scanners and intelligent state-of-the-art software services manage data in some of the world's largest companies, and our photographic paper production, printing kiosks and suite of consumer apps help people capture and connect with the emotional moments that define all our lives. <br><br> Our mission at Kodak Alaris remains crystal clear; to transform and improve the profitability of the portfolio of businesses that make up Kodak Alaris, to create further value in a culturally renewed values-driven Company; a Company that invests in growth businesses, systematically and reliably delivers on its financial commitments, operates within an efficient, cost-effective infrastructure and based on a cultural foundation of innovation, transparency, discipline and accountability. <br><br> Our vision for each one of our businesses remains constant:  to be recognized by the market as the leading provider of products and services in each of the segments we participate in. We want to lead in each key industry we participate in through better products, better quality and reliability, better customer service, the best and the brightest employee talent, along with world class partners around the globe. <br><br> Our well-established Kodak Alaris values that we live and breathe by can be defined by the acronym I-ACT: <br><br> Innovation as the core of Kodak Alaris as a technology company * Accountability to deliver on our commitments * Customer Satisfaction in all aspects of our business * Teamwork in how we resolve issues and grow our portfolio <br><br> These are all underpinned by four foundational strategic pillars that drive our action plans, priorities and investments: <br><br> Financials, Growth, Transformation & Simplification and People. <br><br> Kodak Alaris -- Kodak Moments Software Development Intern <br><br> Position Summary: <br> The ideal candidate will assume an active role on an application development team that supports one of our Kiosk products for creating photo products from a user's images. You will work with team members to develop, test and deliver field updates to resolve customer issues and/or new feature functionality. You will work from detailed requirement to develop or modify complex application software in a modern object oriented development environment. The development team follows agile methodologies. <br><br> This is a paid internship program. The candidate must be willing to work five days a week and fulfill a minimum eight to ten week block. We do not provide transportation or housing. <br><br> Roles and Responsibilities: <br> Design, coding, unit testing, debugging and documentation of programs. <br><br> Clearly and actively communicate status of work and projects to stakeholders as needed. <br><br> Work closely with senior developers to successfully anticipate, identify and resolve issues/concerns internally. <br><br> Diagnose and resolve software defects and problems. <br><br> Meets time requirements for assignments, with minimal reminders. <br><br> Provide work breakdown using standardized estimation techniques. <br><br> Participate in work product reviews (e.g. code design). <br><br> Required Skills: <br> Successful candidate must be familiar with distributed computing environment, modern computer software architectures and advanced software practices. <br><br> Ability to understand and adhere to established software architecture and programming conventions. <br><br> Candidate must be a highly motivated self-starter who can work effectively in a dynamic environment where goals and specifications are constantly changing. <br><br> Understanding of Object Oriented Application architecture and programming. <br><br> Working knowledge of C#, Java, JavaScript, HTML5 and/or CSS. <br><br> Work independently or as part of a larger team. <br><br> Familiarity with all phases of the software development life cycle (analysis, design, development, testing, defect tracking/resolution, deployment), including Agile methodology. <br><br> Desired Skills: <br> Working knowledge of Microsoft's Visual Studio .NET, including Windows Forms based graphical user interface. <br><br> WCF, WPF, HTTP/HTTPS, REST or web develop knowledge. Familiarity with XML. <br><br> Good understanding of database systems using SQL, SQLExpress or MySQL a plus. <br><br> Familiarity with the React user interface library <br><br> js and libraries such as Restify, Express <br><br> Familiarity with the REST architectural style, JSON <br><br> Sound knowledge and experience in modular programming methodologies. <br><br> Qualifications: <br> Current enrollment in an accredited college or university obtaining a BS degree in Computer Science or a related area of study <br><br> At least 3rd year student <br><br> 3.0 GPA or higher <br><br> Kodak Alaris provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

 We are on a mission to make the world smaller with one Gesture at a time. Being one of the newest on-demand companies in the market, we live out our company mission by helping to provide the solution to the age-old problem of overpriced “gifting.” With Gesture, anyone can easily send flowers, wine, champagne and so much more from all across the nation starting at $20, with free delivery and no surprise fees.  Helping you stay connected one Gesture at a time.  We are looking for a Remote UI-UX / Graphic Design Intern to join our team immediately! You will be a part of turning our current projects into an easy-to-use product for our users, and will work directly with the creative, tech and marketing teams to understand user requirements, design graphic elements and build navigation components. Ultimately, you’ll create both functional and appealing features that address our clients’ needs and help us grow our customer base.   Responsibilities:    Brainstorming and collaborating with the creative, tech and marketing teams to come up with UI ideas   Producing UI-UX design solutions through visual and graphic designs, wireframes, flow diagrams, etc.   Assisting in user experience design requirements for our suite of digital assets   Developing and conceptualizing a comprehensive UI-UX design for the brand    Qualifications:    Proven work experience as a UI-UX Designer or similar role   Portfolio of design projects  *Please provide an email for a Dropbox to be shared with you to upload portfolio when prompted.*    Knowledge of wireframe tools (e.g. Wireframe.cc and InVision)   Up-to-date knowledge of design software like Adobe Illustrator and Photoshop   Team spirit; strong communication skills to collaborate with various stakeholders   Excellent time management skills   Ongoing education including bootcamp and/or college/university aiming towards BSc in Design, Computer Science or relevant field   We encourage you to visit yourgesture.com at your earliest convenience.  We look forward to meeting you soon.  Job Type: Internship  Pay: $0.01 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Application Question:  Please provide a personal email where we can share a Dropbox folder with. You will receive an email from people@yourgesture.com with instructions on uploading a portfolio to this Dropbox if we select your application for the next round.   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  College Credit  

   Job Summary   We are on the lookout for the best and brightest students to help us continue to excel as a leader in media and technology! As part of the Comcast Summer Internship Program, you will have an opportunity to work on innovative, thought-provoking projects alongside a team of supportive, full-time employees. The summer program will also provide you with a chance to gain new technical and professional development skills, participate in a wide range of mentorship and networking opportunities and have a lot of fun along the way   Job Description     Department and Position Overview    The Tools &amp; Infrastructure team focuses on delivering production quality engineering tools to global engineering team to support daily development efforts, testing, building, and deploying of the production code. This team works in parallel with development team to ensure every part of software development lifecycle is met with repeatable automation, consistency, and scalability. This team also works with compliance team to make sure all processes meet industry standard compliance and security requirements. Furthermore, this team facilitates Agile Scrum Methodology by providing necessary tools and automation.      Job Description    The Engineer for Tools &amp; Infrastructure focuses on automating repeated tasks done by developers during the course of software development cycle while removing manual work so that developers can focus more on actual coding and development. Also, this engineer works with development team to ensure high quality of production code without regression by supporting and implementing continuous integration with automated testing of high code coverage. Furthermore, this engineer can recommend and build engineer tools necessary to support the goal of automation.      Intern Roles &amp; Responsibilities   Improve and maintain CI/CD infrastructure for FreeWheel Linear TV and API platform.  Build and enhance engineering tools and support engineering team with automation.  Build dashboards to organize and display key engineering metrics including build success rates and code coverage.  Implement monitoring to support high production quality of engineering tools.  Regular, consistent and punctual attendance. Must be able to work nights and weekends, variable schedule(s) and overtime as necessary.  Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.       Preferred Skills and Qualifications:   Hands on experience with use of git as source control, build, and automated testing including unit test  Very hands-on with test case design, implementation and execution, comfortable with Linux and CLI  Familiar with software best practices and good coding style  Experience with Python, Bash, Golang, NodeJS, PgSQL and MySQL is a good plus  Experience with Jenkins, AWS, Docker and Kubernetes is a big plus  Strong organizational, interpersonal and communication skills  Ability to work on a team.  Authorized to work in the United States of America.       Job Specification:    Education Level &ndash; University Bachelors   Field of Study &ndash; Computer Science   Years of Experience &ndash; Classroom <br>   Salary:    Base Pay: $30.00 

 We are on a mission to make the world smaller with one Gesture at a time. Being one of the newest on-demand companies in the market, we live out our company mission by helping to provide the solution to the age-old problem of overpriced “gifting.” With Gesture, anyone can easily send flowers, wine, champagne and so much more from all across the nation starting at $25, with no surprise fees.  Helping you stay connected one Gesture at a time.  We are looking for a skilled Corvid by Wix web developer to join our team! You will be responsible for developing and maintaining the Corvid website and delivering a user friendly interface to our customer base.   Job Responsibilities:    Build web applications using Corvid by Wix (JavaScript)   Deliver creative ideas for content marketing along with designing and modifying website   Code efficiently using best software development practices to add custom functionality and interactions   Create and develop website layout by using standard JavaScript coding   Integrate data from various back-end services in APIs   Enhance website specifications based on technical and design needs   Other duties may be assigned.    Qualifications:    Proven proficiency in JavaScript and recommended proficiency in Corvid by Wix   Should be able to troubleshoot common issues that may cause complications   Knowledge and experience working with JavaScript & databases   Experience working with APIs   We encourage you to visit yourgesture.com at your earliest convenience.  We look forward to meeting you soon.  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.01 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  JavaScript: 1 year (Preferred)  Corvid by Wix: 1 year (Preferred)   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

    BorgWarner Morse Systems in Ithaca, New York has multiple opportunities for engineering co-ops. The Co-op Program is dedicated to fostering fulfilling experiences that develop each student&rsquo;s talent; transforming them into the outstanding professionals of tomorrow. We value each co-op&rsquo;s creativity, depend on their passion to succeed and believe in the difference they can make. Above all, The Co-op Program provides the opportunity for each person to perform as a valuable player in their department&rsquo;s team, within a stimulating, challenging and supportive environment.   Employment blocks typically vary from 6-9 months based on performance and company needs. Applicants must be fulltime students studying within an applicable engineering field and available to work fulltime hours on the Ithaca, NY campus.   Typical Positions Available:     Manufacturing Engineering   Product Engineering   Test Engineering   Product Quality   Applications Engineering   Systems Engineering   Safety Health &amp; Environment Engineering      Required Experience/Qualifications:     Fulltime enrollment in a 4 year college or university with a major in engineering   Ability to work fulltime hours for the duration of the co-op position   Ability to work on the Ithaca, New York campus   Ability to work well in a team environment      EEO Statement:     BorgWarner is an equal employment opportunity employer such that all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. 

 StudioLabs is a full-service creative technology and digital production shop that operates without limits. No idea is too small to love, and no project is too big to be handled with detail-oriented care.<br>   For over 16 years, StudioLabs has served direct clients and agencies, as well as funded startups and software shops. We understand the digital landscape; navigate it; and collaboratively release thoughtful, stellar work into the real world.<br>   While they represent only the tip of the iceberg, StudioLabs&rsquo; clients include direct relationships like Estee Lauder, Crunch Fitness, and M&amp;T Bank, as well as agencies like Momentum Worldwide, 360i, and Young &amp; Rubicam, and SaaS companies like Zype and Synacor.<br>   At StudioLabs, we love our Developer Interns and it shows. As an intern on the development team, you&rsquo;ll get hands-on experience working alongside a highly-skilled development team utilizing current web technologies on real client projects.<br>   This is an awesome opportunity for a student in computer science to gain great career experience working alongside a talented team of developers. Your responsibilities would include translating Photoshop design files and Sketch files to pixel perfect HTML/CSS/JS, tag-teaming the QA/testing process for various client projects, documenting your code, taking part in team brainstorms and other team meetings, and other tasks/responsibilities based on your individual skill set. This position is open to candidates in our Buffalo, NY and our NYC locations.<br>  <h5 class="jobSectionHeader"> Requirements: </h5> HTML5/CSS3 experience (All coding must be done in a text editor or IDE, no WYSIWYG editors)  Experience with JavaScript and JavaScript frameworks  Command line experience  Examples of class work or freelance/side projects  Experience working with Photoshop files or Sketch files  Good organization skills&ndash;must be self-motivated and able to organize your daily and weekly tasks  Ability to hit deadlines  Strong Attention to detail  Good communication skills and the ability to work closely in a team environment  <br><br>  <h5 class="jobSectionHeader"> Extras: </h5> Experience with GIT  Experience with WordPress or Drupal  Experience with PHP and PHP frameworks  Experience with C#, C++, Java or other web development languages  Experience with ObjectiveC, Java, React Native, or other mobile development languages/frameworks  Understanding of OOP  

 Gesture has combined an age old gifting process with some of the coolest tech in the industry. We made sending gifts sociable and fun. Being one of the newest on-demand delivery services on the market, we live out our company mission by providing a user-friendly platform and streamlined logistics that make the experience of gifting simple, fast, and enjoyable. With Gesture, anyone can easily send flowers, wine, champagne, and so much more from all across the nation, starting at $25 with free delivery and no surprise fees.  We are looking for a great JavaScript developer Intern who is proficient with React.js to join our team! Your primary focus will be on developing user interface components and implementing them following well-known React.js workflows. You will ensure that these components and the overall application are robust and easy to maintain. You will coordinate with the rest of the team working on different layers of the infrastructure. A commitment to collaborative problem solving, sophisticated design, and quality products is important.   Responsibilities:    Developing new user-facing features using React.js   Building reusable components and front-end libraries for future use   Translating designs and wireframes into high-quality code   Optimizing components for maximum performance across a vast array of web-capable devices and browsers   *<br/> Qualifications:    Thorough understanding of React.js and its core principles   Ability to understand business requirements and translate them into technical requirements   Experience with popular React.js workflows (such as Flux or Redux)   Strong proficiency in JavaScript, including DOM manipulation and the JavaScript object model   Experience with data structure libraries   Knowledge of modern authorization mechanisms, such as JSON Web Token   Familiarity with modern front-end build pipelines and tools   Experience with common front-end development tools such as Babel, Webpack, NPM, etc   Ability to understand business requirements and translate them into technical requirements   Familiarity with code versioning tools {such as Git, SVN, and Mercurial}   Must have a go-getter and self-sufficient type of perspective   Knowledge of GSuite, Slack, and Zoom or similar applications   We encourage you to visit yourgesture.com at your earliest convenience.  We look forward to meeting you soon.  *  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $0.01 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Education:  Bachelor's (Preferred)   Experience:  JavaScript: 1 year (Preferred)   Internship Compensation:  College Credit   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Virtual meetings  

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for a full-time summer intern on the Enterprise Architecture team.   This intern will conduct research on innovative and disruptive technologies and produce a whitepaper on their potential future impact on NYISO&rsquo;s operations or the on the energy industry. Research will be performed on one or more emerging technologies such as artificial intelligence, machine learning and quantum cryptography to help guide future strategies and investments that could be important to the NYISO.   The research would involve an assessment of the current state of the technology and general use cases, as well as identification of potential specific application of the technology for the NYISO. <br>  <br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Current enrollment in Computer Science or other Technology Degree Programs   Individual must be able to perform independent research and have good communication skills with the ability to interview technical and non-technical staff to gain an understanding of NYISO specific applications of the technologies<br>     The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check. The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

   Summary of Internship    The Quality Assurance (QA) internship position provides an opportunity for engineering students who are currently pursuing a degree in engineering to get hands on experience working with Quality Assurance in a fast-paced manufacturing facility. The Quality Assurance intern will contribute to cross-functional projects that are in the functional areas of Quality Engineering, Metrology, and / or Quality Laboratory in order to improve the associated production and process controls within a regulated industry (for medical devices) utilizing engineering and quality best practices. In addition, the individual will gain insight into the activities that the Quality Assurance team is responsible for from a day to day perspective. This will be accomplished by shadowing the functions within the Quality Assurance team in order to understand the role that Quality Assurance plays within the business. The position starts in June, paid working 40 hours per week through August.    Essential Functions    Ability to work independently and as a member of a cross-functional team.   Willingness to learn about manufacturing processes and quality assurance through daily activities.   Willingness to learn, be mentored, and improve by accepting candid feedback Identify areas of opportunity to reduce waste and gain efficiencies through implementation of process improvements   Support a variety of Quality Assurance activities and may be assigned to a variety of tasks throughout the department that will be tailored to your experience level and abilities.   Willing to provide feedback on quality processes   Exceptional customer focus.   Desire to teach other Quality Assurance individuals about technology in area of expertise.   Performs other duties as needed.   Skills and Abilities     Must be able to work well with others in a team environment.   Able to adjust to changing operating conditions quickly and efficiently and vary pace as required   Knowledge of computer applications and current software is desirable.   Excellent oral and written communications skills required.   Qualifications:     Currently pursuing a degree in Chemical Engineering, Engineering Management, Industrial Engineering, Industrial and Systems Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or like engineering field.   General chemistry or greater science knowledge preferred.   Process and quality knowledge.  

  Corporate Overview:

     Job Description:       3M HIS Software Engineer Intern       Collaborate with Innovative 3Mers Around the World      An internship at Health Information Systems allows you to be part of an organization that's on the forefront of innovation in health care software solutions. 3M Health Information Systems is producing intelligent software that simplifies management of health information, medical coding, payment and other important functions for our customers. With a diversity of people, global locations, technologies and products, 3M is a place where you can collaborate with 93,000 other curious, creative 3Mers.     &quot;The whole innovation process here is awesome. My team came up with a patent they are trying to push through because they wanted to, not because 3M asked them to. 3M provides that culture that allows them to innovate, think for themselves and helps them take it to the next level. We weren&rsquo;t afraid to redesign the tools from how they were in the past.&quot; Shinjin, medical informatics intern      This position provides an opportunity to transition from other private, public, government or military environments to a 3M career.<br> <br>   The internship position is a temporary position within 3M. Interns typically work a full-time schedule of 40 hours a week throughout a 10-14-week assignment starting in May of 2021.       The Impact You&rsquo;ll Make in this Role      As a Software Engineer Intern, you will have the opportunity to tap into your curiosity and collaborate with some of the most innovative and diverse people around the world. Here, you will make an impact by:   Assists with the design and creation of software applications as a member of an agile team of software developers   Performs triage and resolution of software defects   Assists with the creation of enhancements to software in accordance with feature specifications   Conducts software tests in adherence with quality standards   May participate in the design and planning of new features   Keeps team members apprised of project status   Performs other duties as assigned       Your Skills and Expertise      To set you up for success in this role from day one, 3M is looking for interns who must have the following qualifications:   Currently pursuing a Bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher from(completed and verified prior to start) from an accredited institution   Experience with Python, SQL, Java, Cloud Development (AWS, etc.) to include course work or previous internship experience      Additional qualifications that could help you succeed even further in this role include:   Strong interpersonal skills and judgment in order to interact effectively with a broad spectrum of people, both individually and in groups is required   Must be a creative and original thinker   Must have the ability to work effectively with close supervision   The successful candidate will exhibit professionalism, initiative, sound judgment, dependability, and a strong work ethic       Relocation Assistance: May be  authorized     Must be legally authorized to work in country of employment without sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H1B, Curricular Practical Training (CPT) or Optional Practical Training (OPT))      Supporting Your Well-being      3M offers many programs to help you live your best life &ndash; both physically and financially. To ensure competitive pay and benefits, 3M regularly benchmarks with other companies that are comparable in size and scope.      Resources for You      For more details on what happens before, during and after the interview process, check out the Insights for Candidates page at 3M.com/careers.    Learn more about 3M&rsquo;s creative solutions to the world&rsquo;s problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M.   Responsibilities of this position include that corporate policies, procedures and security standards are complied with while performing assigned duties.   3M is an equal opportunity employer. 3M will not discriminate against any applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.     Please note: your application may not be considered if you do not provide your education and work history, either by: 1) uploading a resume, or 2) entering the information into the application fields directly.       3M Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement<br>   <br> Carefully read these Terms of Use before using this website. Your access to and use of this website and application for a job at 3M are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms. 

   Konrad Group    Konrad Group is a next generation digital consultancy. We are dedicated to solving complex business problems for our global clients with creative and forward-thinking solutions. Our employees enjoy a culture built on innovation and a commitment to creating best-in-class digital products in use by hundreds of millions of consumers around the world. We hire exceptionally smart, analytical, and hard working people who are lifelong learners.    Associate Consultant, Intern    We're looking for an energetic and dynamic candidate to serve as an Associate Consultant Intern in our New York office. In this multifaceted role you will be collaboration with our Strategy, Project Management, User Experience (UX) Design, and Technology teams. You will support senior team members on our projects as you build up your experience in the role.   You enjoy solving complex business problems by creating smart, intuitive, and human-centered experiences. You have an excellent eye for detail, you love to learn, and you enjoy new challenges. Technology excites you and you're on top of emerging trends.    Responsibilities:   Assist in the creation of digital solutions for a variety of clients and verticals  Gain expertise as a design and technology thought leader in a number of industries  Support the broader team in understanding and interpreting our client's business challenges and goals  Collaborate with our Design and Technology teams to deliver elegant user experiences  Gather information on our client's business processes, critical success factors, marketplace, and competitive standing through interviews and research  Coordinate and participate in user experience design thinking workshops, technology architecture workshops, and project planning and delivery activities  Structure presentations, documentation, request for proposal responses, and other collateral    Successful candidates will have:   Previous experience in consulting, user experience and/or software development is an asset  A demonstrable passion for and understanding of great user experiences and technology  Excellent writing competency and communication skills  A constant desire to learn more about the latest technology trends  Strong problem-solving ability  Self-motivated individual with a desire to do his/her best every day  Ability to work in a team environment and independently  Comfortable with presenting and public speaking is an asset  High GPA    Bonus Points:  Have you taken any courses at BrainStation? Many of our design and technology best practices and processes are taught during our courses - make sure to highlight this experience in your cover letter if you have!   Konrad Group is committed to maintaining a diverse work environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status will receive consideration for employment. If you have any accessibility requirements or concerns regarding the hiring process or employment with us, please notify us so we can provide suitable accommodation.   While we sincerely appreciate all applications, only those candidates selected for an interview will be contacted. 

GLOBAL <br><br> FOUNDRIES <br><br> is seeking an Manufacturing Shift Engineer Intern in Malta, New York. Along with a team of engineers, process technicians and maintenance technicians, you will be responsible for maintaining the equipment performance of a highly automated, wafer fabrication facility. <br><br> Provides on shift technical and sustaining engineering support in a manufacturing area. Recommends and i <br><br> mplements equipment and process modifications to improve production efficiencies, manufacturing <br><br> techniques and production yields for existing products. Design, support and conducts statistical analysis such <br><br> as Design of Experiments (DOE) and Statistical Process Control (SPC) targeting physical cause of failure for <br><br> yield loss and improving quality. <br><br> GLOBAL <br><br> FOUNDRIES <br><br> is a 24/7 manufacturing facility providing support across all shifts. This Position is for Night Shift within the Etch organization <br><br> . <br><br> In your role as a Manufacturing Shift Engineer (Process Bias) you are responsible to provide technical expertise <br><br> . <br><br> This responsibility includes, but is not limited to: <br> Work with equipment, process engineers, and manufacturing teams to ensure production wafer quality (e.g. achieve Cp/Cpk targets, eliminate yield systematics and meet line/wafer yield targets) and on time delivery <br><br> Provide 24/7 startup, volume ramp and operations support for all respective semiconductor process equipment <br><br> Act as on shift technical resource, troubleshooting and responding to equipment and process issues; s <br><br> upport technician team with maintaining 24/7 coverage <br><br> Continue to improve process robustness for high volume manufacturing using statistical tools, DOE techniques, data driven decision making and systematic problem solving skills; use lean manufacturing and six sigma processes <br><br> Interpret and respond to Statistical Process Control charts <br><br> Create process recipes based on set specifications <br><br> Responsible for process runpath management <br><br> Provide initial response to abnormal tool down events <br><br> Support and execute structured problem documentation consistency <br><br> Responsible to investigate holds and blocked lots and address with appropriate departments <br><br> Responsible for helping with key activities to address problem areas and drive tactical and strategic improvements that will improve cycle time <br><br> Perform projects to meet Manufacturing indices <br><br> Support engineering projects on shift <br><br> Participate in troubleshooting task forces as need and help develop and execute solutions that prevent recurrence <br><br> Support process and technology transfer from customers and other GLOBALFOUNDRIES fabs <br><br> Support the efforts of the internal technology development team <br><br> Create/update Standard Operating Procedures to increase efficiency and tool uptime <br><br> Coordinates information exchange and build working relationships with manager and coworkers to accomplish work steps and to solve problems <br><br> Provides informal technical support and on-the-job training on specific tasks to new team members <br><br> Interacts outside of the immediate department to exchange information and accomplish tasks (e.g. with internal customers/suppliers) <br><br> Drive equipment planning and equipment configuration with the area process/equipment engineers <br><br> Flexible schedule to allow for training with Engineers across the module <br><br> Ability to run effective and efficient daily shift pass down as needed <br><br> Perform all activities in a safe and responsible manner and support all Environmental, Health, Safety & Security requirements and programs <br><br> Required Qualifications <br><br> : <br><br> Enrolled in a BS degree in Chemical Engineering, Materials Science, Chemistry, Physics or other relevant engineering degree. <br><br> Preferred Qualifications: <br> Etch process and equipment operation experience <br><br> Understanding and knowledge of Statistical Process Control (SPC) and Design of Experiments (DoE) <br><br> Experience running operational manufacturing floor <br><br> Demonstrated management/supervisory experience without authority <br><br> Equipment focused/tool maintenance experience <br><br> Demonstrated prioritization experience <br><br> Self-motivated and driven to work with minimal supervision <br><br> If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please contact us by email at usaccommodations@globalfoundries.com and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information. Requests for accommodation will be considered on a case-by-case basis. Please note that only inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address. <br><br> An offer of employment with GLOBALFOUNDRIES is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background check and drug screen, as applicable and subject to applicable laws and regulations. <br><br> GLOBALFOUNDRIES is fully committed to equal opportunity in the workplace and believes that cultural diversity within the company enhances its business potential. GLOBALFOUNDRIES goal of excellence in business necessitates the attraction and retention of highly qualified people. Artificial barriers and stereotypic biases detract from this objective and may be illegally discriminatory. <br><br> All policies and processes which pertain to employees including recruitment, selection, training, utilization, promotion, compensation, benefits, extracurricular programs, and termination are created and implemented without regard to age, ethnicity, ancestry, color, marital status, medical condition, mental or physical disability, national origin, race, religion, political and/or third-party affiliation, sex, sexual orientation, <br><br> gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other characteristic or category specified by local, state or federal law.

   Description   At Exelon, we've got a place for you!

 Overview:   Calspan takes great pride in our ability to attract, recruit, and develop extraordinary talent. We are currently looking for exceptional students to fill our 2021 Summer Internship Program. Calspan&rsquo;s interns will contribute to exciting projects in both the aerospace and automotive industries and have the opportunity to participate in professional development sessions led by subject matter industry leaders. We are looking for a motivated student to join our team as a Software Engineering Intern!

 Candidates pursuing bachelors or master&rsquo;s degrees in computer science or software, computer or electrical engineering or related disciplines should explore the opportunities available in the Owego Software Engineering organization. <br><br> An intern in this position will work closely with a team of engineers on a formal government fixed or rotary wing aircraft contract or internal investment efforts in one or more of the following areas: military aircraft avionics, mission systems, sensor subsystems or mail handling systems, mission planning, simulation or automation.<br><br> Software Engineering tasks include: requirements analysis, design, code, software unit test, documentation review and update, testing of recent engineering releases, analysis &amp; documentation of problem trouble reports found during testing, providing written and verbal status of testing progress to the concurrent engineering team and providing suggestions for problem trouble report resolution.<br><br> Must be able to obtain an interim secret clearance prior to start, and must be able to obtain and maintain a security clearance.<br><br> 2.5 GPA or higher preferred, but not required (Cumulative or Major GPA).<br> Basic Qualifications: <br> Currently pursuing a BS or MS degree in Computer Science or Software, computer or electrical Engineering or related discipline<br><br> Must be able to obtain an interim secret clearance prior to start, and must be able to obtain and maintain a security clearance.<br><br> 2.5 GPA or higher preferred, but not required (Cumulative or Major GPA).<br> Desired Skills: <br> C/C++/C#, Java, Ada, LabView/LabWindows and/or Teststand.<br><br><br><br> Experience with embedded or Linux operating systems desired. Familiarity with object-oriented analysis/design and agile development is beneficial.<br> BASIC QUALIFICATIONS: <br> job.Qualifications<br><br> Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. <br> Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. They&rsquo;re dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.<br><br> As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martin&rsquo;s vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers&rsquo; toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.<br> EXPERIENCE LEVEL: <br> Co-op/Summer Intern 

   We&rsquo;re looking for entrepreneurial software engineer interns who are motivated by our mission to simply healthcare. We&rsquo;re building an API layer that powers the workflows of healthcare providers, care navigation platforms, health plans, and emerging digital health companies. You&rsquo;ll be involved throughout the product lifecycle and collaborate closely with technical and non-technical stakeholders to understand our customers&rsquo; use cases and challenges, and build products to solve them.

 Job Descriptions:  · Tech writing  · Online stores such as Amazon  · Tech support, webpages and datasheets developments, writing  · Digital Marketing, SEO  · Participate in a team to organize virtual(online) global conferences  · Use social media platforms such as LinkedIn to invite conferences and events and our products  · Agenda preparation, care of speakers, attendees and sponsors, events coordination  Contract length: 3 months  Part-time hours: 20 per week  Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship  Salary: $0.00 per year  Schedule:  Monday to Friday   Work Remotely:  Yes  

  Bright Power works with forward-thinking owners and developers to identify, design, and implement custom energy and water solutions on a wide variety of systems. Our team is comprised of a diverse, talented, and hard-working group of individuals committed to growing this industry and to making a positive impact on the environment.   <br>   Join Us    Bright Power has been a transformative player in clean energy and sustainable housing for 16 years. Our Clients include affordable housing owners and developers, Fortune 1000 financial and real estate investors, privately held firms, and some of the nation&rsquo;s largest property managers.   <br>  We are passionate about reducing energy and water usage through the implementation of energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies. Our goal is to improve the health, comfort, and value of our client&rsquo;s buildings, while cultivating a sustainable future. We believe deeply in doing well by doing good and come to work every day seeking to change the world.   <br>   The Role    The Strategic Initiatives Business Unit of Bright Power is seeking detail-oriented and motivated interns to join our Access Team. Bright Power works with property owners who have loans through the Fannie Mae Green Loan program and helps them meet their utility data reporting requirements.   <br>  The Benchmarking &amp; Compliance Owner Data Intern will review, store, and integrate property owner-paid utility data required for compliance. This position plays a crucial role in ensuring the success of the entire program.   <br>   Responsibilities    Conduct quality assurance of utility data sources from external clients   Troubleshoot and communicate issues relating to data access and quality   Transfer and store documents to ensure high standard of organization   Follow detailed protocols to enable accurate and efficient integration of utility account data into our systems   Collaborate with team members to improve workflow processes   Contribute to other Strategic Initiatives projects as needed    <br>   What you get out of working at Bright Power    Opportunity to learn about energy management, working with utilities and utility data, and sustainable buildings   Training in utility benchmarking and industry-standard software tools   Networking with leaders across Bright Power&rsquo;s business units, and connections to leaders in the building and energy industry   8 hours of paid time off per month   Be part of a team that is hard-working and driven, but does not take itself too seriously    <br>   Qualifications    Self-motivated and self-organizing direction - this position works with an end deliverable for a client that has many moving pieces   Strong attention to detail   Analytical and problem-solving skills   Experience with spreadsheet based programs - Microsoft Excel or Google Sheets   Experience with utility bill data   Ability to work well in a team-oriented environment providing ideas and open feedback   Graduated college or university in the last year   A New York State resident OR graduate of a school in New York State    <br>   Preferred Qualifications    Candidates with a bachelor&rsquo;s degree in science, engineering or similar technical field are preferred, but an equivalent level of industry experience is also accepted   Experience in the real estate, energy efficiency, renewable energy, sustainability or building operations world   Intermediate knowledge of Excel   Experience with cloud-based CRM platforms - Salesforce   Experience with Energy Star Portfolio Manager, especially for Multifamily Buildings and Commercial   Willingness to learn SQL     EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES  <br>Bright Power provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, Bright Power complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.   Bright Power expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of Bright Power&rsquo;s employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.   Powered by JazzHR   lsgUEcVjnt 

  PLEASE READ THE DESCRIPTION ENTIRELY!!!!    Jump-start your new career in less than 6 months  with an entry-level career-track position in Information Technology!    No experience necessary ; 7 weeks paid internship or direct-hire opportunities with ongoing job placement assistance! Short term placements alongside industry professionals will result in expedited learning and immeasurable experience. If you are looking for a way to get your foot in the door and launch a career in IT then this is the opportunity for you!   *Training begins February 22, 2021, and positions open in June!*    Internship training  will help you develop the  following entry-level skills:    Hardware & Software   Troubleshooting   Configuring client operating systems   Identity & Access Management   Network Administration   Cloud Computing   IT Service Management   and more!    Requirements:    Possess a High School Diploma or equivalent  Authorized to work in the United States without sponsorship  NYC resident   Willing and able to fully commit to this internship opportunity and the mandatory 16-week unpaid training that precedes it.    Training will be Monday-Friday from 9am-1pm or 2-6pm (first four months) followed by paid internship (last two months).   Submit direct application to www.npower.org/apply    We will not respond to messages via Indeed. Please visit our website npower.org/apply to learn more!   Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Internship, Contract  Pay: $15.00 - $22.00 per hour  Schedule:  Day shift  Monday to Friday  Night shift   Location:  Brooklyn, NY 11238 (Preferred)   Work authorization:  United States (Preferred)   Shifts:  Morning (Preferred)  Mid-Day (Preferred)   Contract Length:  5 - 6 months   Contract Renewal:  Possible   Work Location:  Fully Remote   Typical start time:  9AM   Typical end time:  6PM   Internship Compensation:  Pay   Company's website:  npower.org   Company's Facebook page:  https://www.facebook.com/npower.org/  

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for a full-time summer intern on the Web Integrations Technology team.   This intern will work closely with a Java developer to begin to modernize existing NYISO custom software. This will include eliciting and documenting system requirements for the desired software changes, researching new technologies and techniques for addressing the gathered requirements, refactoring existing code and write new code to implement the desired changes, and preparing unit tests to validate the function of the code implemented. <br><br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Current enrollment in Computer Science or related technical degree program  Experience with Java development, technical analysis, and technical writing skills  Strategic thinking, creative problem solving skills are desired  <br>   The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check.   The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

   Summary:  <br>   Tetra Tech Company is an engineering and environmental science firm specializing in services to the solid waste industry and environmental consulting to commercial, industrial, and municipal entities. <br>   Being leaders in our fields of practice by providing the highest quality environmental and engineering from project conception to completion.  <br>   Developing and maintaining relationships for life with our clients by focusing on superior client service, responsiveness and cutting-edge technical expertise.  <br>   Developing relationships for life with our employees by providing a rewarding and challenging work environment that encourages innovation and a strong passion for their profession.  <br>   Our professionals are well known for their experience assisting clients in solid waste management, including organics management, remediation, hydrogeology, commercial real estate, investment banking, pulp and paper, chemical manufacturing, to name a few. Tetra Tech was founded on the principle of providing excellent, client-based services. The firm&rsquo;s strength is built on extensive experience with both large and small companies.<br>  Our services include:<br>  Air Quality  Biogas &amp; Landfill Gas  Environmental Planning &amp; Compliance  Hydrogeology  Landfill Engineering &amp; Design  Operations &amp; Maintenance  Remediation  Site &amp; Civil Design  Transfer, Recycling &amp; Processing Facilities  Organics Management<br>    Responsibilities : <br>   Under direct supervision, performs engineering and/or scientific tasks of a routine nature. Works on a wide variety of technical projects from design through investigation. <br>   Compile data for project reports.  Collect and compile field data as required.  Assist in proposal efforts as directed.  Document technical data for management review.  Assist with the preparation of labor/material estimates and design/permitting packages for clients.  Provide other office duties as assigned.  <br>    Requirements:  <br>   Pursuit of Bachelor&rsquo;s Degree. Recommended in an engineering or science discipline.  Strong verbal and written communications skills.  Knowledge of Microsoft Office programs (Word, Excel, etc.).  Positive attitude and willingness to learn.  Basic AutoCAD knowledge, FE certification (as applicable).  Must have or quickly develop good inter-personal skills to interface with team members. Must be able or very quickly learn how to work on project teams.    About Tetra Tech:  <br>

   Make your mark<br>   <br> At Clorox, we build big brands that make everyday life better, every day. We value our differences, and challenge each other to think and act boldly. We try new things, succeed, fail and keep learning. We work hard, and have busy personal lives. And we&rsquo;re all able to make a positive impact &ndash; at Clorox, in our communities, and in the lives of millions of people who invite us into their homes. Make your mark and help us drive Good Growth &ndash; growth that is profitable, sustainable and responsible.    <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Overview/Summary  </h3>About Clorox DTC: <br> Clorox DTC (direct-to-consumer) is the owned &amp; operated e-commerce arm of Clorox where daily interactions and conversations with customers translate into high growth and continuous learnings. The agile, growing team, well-positioned in the New York, San Francisco, and D.C. areas, is made up of cross-functional professionals who launch and grow DTC wellness brands, while simultaneously mobilizing the online presence of Clorox&rsquo;s well-loved and established retail brands. Clorox DTC is where a start-up&rsquo;s appetite for innovation, efficiency, and speed meets the stability and resources of a Fortune 500. Functions, similar to any scaled e-commerce company, are wide and varied across R&amp;D; operations; product/experience; marketing; creative; data science/analytics and technology/engineering. <br><br> Data Analytics, Internship <br> This is an exciting opportunity for someone eager to learn about and dive into data science and analytics within a fast-paced e-commerce setting. As part of the growing DTC Data Science &amp; Analytics Team, this role will focus on supporting brands that span a retail and direct-to-consumer presence and working on strategic, customer-focused analytics initiatives. You&rsquo;ll be a pivotal member of our team, working with cross-functional partners in order to prioritize and translate complex business questions into a long-term strategic analytics roadmap. You will collaborate with other functional teams across Marketing, Product, Merchandising, Business Intelligence, Data Engineering and Data Science groups to identify analytics initiatives with the biggest potential to impact customer experience and drive revenue growth. You will work to unlock insights and provide input to the business from tactical site optimizations to broad strategic direction that is grounded in data, analytical rigor, and customer behavior. <br> The ideal candidate will have broad experience across marketing and product with a strong understanding of and experience in DTC/e-commerce roles. You have a healthy balance of technical expertise in analytics and the ability to make relevant recommendations to business stakeholders at multiples levels of seniority that tell persuasive, relevant stories with data. You love customer analytics, site experience, and experimentation. A good day is one where you feel like you&rsquo;ve had a real impact on the business and the teams you collaborate with. You ask critical questions, use data to develop and communicate a strong point of view, and consistently seek creative solutions to data challenges. Ideally, this person will have a passion for health and wellness and embodies our vision of making lives healthier. <br><br> Our hope is that while helping our team achieve its goals you&rsquo;ll gain exposure to several parts of the data analytics and science projects as you hone and develop your personal career path under the mentorship of our team members. <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Key Responsibilities  </h3>  Key Responsibilities    Apply advanced modeling to large and complex data to generate actionable insights, answer strategic questions, and provide recommendations that will influence business decisions   Contribute to all the stages of data projects: from data mining to translating complex technical concepts into successful business solutions   Own end-to-end analytics and data science projects that can be productionized in scale   Work collaboratively with Growth, Product, and Engineering teams to effectively scope the requirements and implement data projects   Identify and prioritize projects by forecasting their business impact and accurately estimating the workload   Work with Data Engineering &amp; BI teams to ensure tracking, maintaining, and troubleshooting of data tables and data pipelines and to support optimization of analytics workflows   Create repeatable, reproducible work processes to contribute to the library of analytics capabilities that can be used across our portfolio of brands   Support designing and visualization of new strategic metrics &amp; KPIs for tracking the health of the customer base, growth, and business performance   Proactively dig into data to surface insights and tie results to actionable business recommendations   Build out insights about customer behaviors that feed into hypothesis generation for Product and Marketing testing agendas   Consult with Growth &amp; Product on experimental design and provide support on test evaluation deep dives as needed   Suggest improvements in the tools and techniques to help scale the team by keeping up-to-date on the latest trends and innovations in the space     Key Skills, Abilities and Experience Required   <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Qualifications  </h3> Bachelor&rsquo;s Degree   Graduating with Master&rsquo;s Degree in Data Science, Analytics, Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, or related technical field December 2020 or Spring 2021, or recent Graduate.   Minimum 2 years of experience in a data role, some experience in a CPG company is preferred   Advanced SQL skills   Experience in programming languages (Python, R, and/or Java)   Strong problem-solving abilities along with an analytical aptitude, inquisitive nature, and a passion to turn data into insights and algorithms   Previous experience in running end-to-end data science / analytics projects (defining data requirements, ingestion, transformation, statistical modeling, implementation, impact measurement)   Excellent understanding of statistics and probability fundamentals, data structures, and core algorithms   Experience using web analytics tools (Adobe Omniture, Google Analytics, etc.) and BI platforms (Looker, Tableau, etc.)   Entrepreneurial spirit that is effective working both independently and collaboratively   Self-motivated and strategic thinker with a bias towards action while also being a strong team player   Strong collaborator&mdash;ability to work across multiple teams and personalities to drive towards a common goal   Strong attention to detail, enjoys organizing and creating process   Flexibility and agility to adapt to changing and evolving business objectives   Strong sense of urgency, and ability to meet deadlines    Required Education  Bachelor&rsquo;s Degree, College Diploma, or Equivalent (Required)  More About Clorox   The Clorox Company (NYSE: CLX) is a leading multinational manufacturer and marketer of consumer and professional products with approximately 8,800 employees worldwide and fiscal year 2020 sales of $6.7 billion. Clorox markets some of the most trusted and recognized consumer brand names, including its namesake bleach and cleaning products;   Pine-Sol&reg; cleaners   Liquid-Plumr&reg; clog removers   Poett&reg; home care products   Fresh Step&reg; cat litter   Glad&reg; bags, wraps and containers   Kingsford&reg; charcoal   Hidden Valley&reg; dressings and sauces   Brita&reg; water-filtration products; Burt's Bees&reg; natural personal care products   RenewLife&reg; digestive health products   Rainbow Light&reg;, Natural Vitality&trade; and NeoCell&reg; dietary supplements.      The company also markets industry-leading products and technologies for professional customers, including those sold under the CloroxPro&trade; and Clorox Healthcare&reg; brand names. Nearly 80% of the company's sales are generated from brands that hold the No. 1 or No. 2 market share positions in their categories.     Please apply directly to our job postings and do not submit your resume to any person via text message. Clorox does not conduct text-based interviews and encourages you to be cautious of anyone posing as a Clorox recruiters via unsolicited texts during these uncertain times. 

  Are you passionate about improving the world through design and making technology accessible to more people? MongoDB is looking for a product design intern to help us create designs that are not only easy to use, but that are beloved by our customers.   Working with other team members, you will be responsible for determining user needs and preferences to create designs that will blend those needs with business objectives, continuously advocating for the user throughout the development process.    What we are looking for in you...   You are in the process of receiving a Bachelor's or Master's degree in Human Computer Interaction, Interaction Design, Cognitive Psychology, Digital Media Design, and/or related fields  You are interested in prototyping, designing, testing, implementing, and evaluating user experiences for web based applications  You are familiar with usability heuristics and best practices in UX design  You have strong prototyping skills and are able to create wireframes and process flow diagrams  You are able to plan and administer usability tests  You have a portfolio of work or projects that includes case studies of design that highlight your process and your role on the project    What you'll find at MongoDB...   You will help define user needs and create designs that lead to great product experiences for MongoDB customers  You will collaborate with other designers and stakeholders to design and develop user interfaces for MongoDB products and services, partnering with engineers for design and implementation  You will partner with software engineering interns in making products more user friendly   *MongoDB, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.* 

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> About Us </h2>  Splice is evolving the way people create, connect, and collaborate. From our browsable library of samples to our pioneering rent-to-own payment model for creative software, our products power the creativity of today's musicians. Over two million musicians - from Top 40 hitmakers to bedroom producers - come to Splice to get started or unstuck, move forward and make progress on their music.    Why Splice?    As advocates for artists everywhere, we're building a creative ecosystem for music producers. With this ecosystem, we're cultivating a global community of creators that fosters inspiration, connection, focus, and growth.   Our work environment is no different. We encourage inclusion, collaboration, big ideas, helping where we can and asking for assistance when we need it. We aim for steady, measured expansion through experimentation and iteration. We encourage optimism, respect, accountability, and transparency in the workplace. We're trailblazers who aren't afraid to stumble, because every stumble offers an opportunity to continuously improve our processes, products, strategies, and even ourselves.   We value inclusion and diversity - your uniqueness makes us stronger.    The Role:    The Splice Engineering Team builds and maintains customer facing software with a shared architecture direction and delightful developer experience. We have teams that focus on Quality, SRE, Platform Engineering, as well as teams that focus on customer facing features and functionality.   As a software engineer intern, you will be embedded into one of our engineering teams. You will be expected to learn and build your skills by integrating directly into one of our teams' agile processes. We will pair you with a mentor, a technical lead, and you will have support from an engineering manager to help you navigate the organization, and set you up for a successful time with Splice, and a successful career in software engineering.    What you'll do:    We expect that a software engineer at this level will:  Learn diligently, be willing to try new things, and take direction from other engineers on the team.  Make progress on well-defined tasks with a clear outcome that may require working with other engineers to complete  Ask questions, and create a strong relationship with your mentor.  Avoids surprises by sharing progress or roadblocks early and often  Embraces a growth mindset and stretches current skills and knowledge.  Learn to work effectively on a distributed agile team    What we're looking for:   You have some experience building and maintaining software using Typescript, Golang or any other strongly typed language.  You have contributed to projects hands on in code, and experienced the lifecycle of build, deploy, and bug fixing.  You share our vision to advocate for artists and become the most iconic company in music.  You're self-directed towards learning, and building your skills in software engineering.  You have a bias towards action and experimentation.  You care about quality. It drives you.  You are comfortable, or even prefer working across technical stacks.  You are scientific and avoid failing the same way twice.    Bonus Qualifications   Experience programming in Angular, Typescript, Golang, or MySQL.  Experience with Electron Apps  Experience with GraphQL  Experience with Jenkins, AWS ECR, AWS Codebuild and other infrastructure related to CI/CD  Experience working within a design system and component library    Equal Opportunity Employer:    Splice is an equal opportunity employer, committed to diversity and inclusion. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age. 

 Overview:   GrammaTech&rsquo;s internship program offers students the opportunity to gain real experience in a friendly, open, and supportive environment. We choose projects based on real needs, and interns work closely with engineers to make sure that projects are completed successfully.

    Position Description 

     Location:  Corning, NY, US, 14831    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 43979 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> At Corning, our growth is fueled by a commitment to innovation. We succeed through sustained investment in research &amp; development, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges. We are a four-time National Medal of Technology winner thanks to our technology leadership and R&amp;D environment, which attract and enable the best scientific minds in the world. This pipeline of talent has brought life-changing innovation to your fingertips for more than 160 years. <br>    Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills. As our intern, you will be involved with Research and Development within Corning&rsquo;s Scientific &amp; Technologies (S&amp;T) segment. <br>   The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for our immediate and future needs.<br>    To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale).<br>    Shape your future; apply today!<br>     Program Benefits:    Competitive salaries   Housing assistance   Travel reimbursement<br>      Intern Activities:    Social and networking events   Volunteer opportunities   Community Involvement<br>      Travel Requirements:  We do not anticipate travel<br>     Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:    M-F 8am &ndash; 5pm   Some scheduling flexibility available   Duration: Summer 2021, 8-12 weeks<br>      Scope of Position:   This position is a summer internship in the area of Materials Informatics and Machine Learning applied in the general area of materials discovery. The position involves both experimental work and modeling to build and explore material informatics. Machine learning models will be built to identify new materials. The candidate will be assigned to work closely with one or more scientists and expected to conduct laboratory experiments, set up new measurement, process and analyze data, and report out results to the larger project team. <br>    Day to Day Responsibilities:  Practical day-to-day responsibilities are as follows:  Work with a scientist to design and execute experiments including forming of ceramic specimens, operation of laboratory equipment such as furnaces, and preparation of samples for characterization.  Coordinate laboratory and characterization activities  Build databases of material properties and machine learning models  Strong verbal and written communication  <br>    Education and Experience  (minimum required for consideration):  Candidates should be bachelor&rsquo;s or graduate students enrolled in Ceramics, Materials Science, Chemistry, Physics, or Engineering program.  <br>    Required Skills:   Basic chemistry, math, and technical writing  Motivated to do scientific research  Experienced with use of MS Office and Python Detail-oriented  <br>    Desired Skills:   Understanding of materials science  Prior experience working in a laboratory  Machine learning and other advanced software skills  <br>    Soft Skills  (Communication/Team/Leadership):  Good communication skills and flexibility in coordination of project work  <br>   This position does not support immigration sponsorship. <br>   We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status. <br>   We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

Seeking full stack developers for summer internship to add new features to current walking apps and improve existing real estate API. Must have strong knowledge and experience in front and back end app development including use of navigation software.

 Excellent programming skills in C++ and Python   Very comfortable with Object-Oriented concepts   Knowledge of various database and datastores is a must (SQL, NoSQL)   Knowledge of markets is a plus  

     Role/Responsibilities    2021 Engineering and Tech Internship <br> Our Engineering &amp; Technology Internships deliver real world work experience. Through our Engineering &amp; Technology internships, you will gain hands-on experience as a developing software engineer while working at the intersection of finance and technology. We leverage current and emerging technologies to help our clients manage risk and meet regulatory requirements. Our Engineering &amp; Technology internships can also lead to full time opportunities within our Moody&rsquo;s Analytics Technology Rotation (MATR) program. Most importantly, you&rsquo;ll have the opportunity to work with smart, innovative, energetic, and fun people who will be committed to seeing you grow and succeed.<br><br> We Want You   We seek curious problem solvers who enjoy learning new things, working with others, and continuously growing their interpersonal and technical skills.   Be passionate and curious about learning and working with any or all of the following: Java, .NET, Scala, Apache Spark, Hadoop, AngularJS, React, Python, Amazon Web Services, and Microsoft Azure.   Moody&rsquo;s is currently seeking students from diverse STEM backgrounds with a strong focus on Computer Science, Mechanical Engineering, and Software Engineering.  <br>  What Does This Program Offer?   Collaboration with purpose. You&rsquo;ll collaborate in small groups with other talented thinkers including both interns and senior staff.   You&rsquo;ll help support the ratings process. Your work will have direct impact.   You&rsquo;ll work with a diverse group of people who care about your growth. Our teams are made up of committed professionals who take pride in both their work and your development.  <br>  Training and Development <br> During the approximate 10 week internship you will be provided technical training, including personal branding, Microsoft Office Suite, corporate presence and more. You will also have access to online training modules to further develop your soft and technical skills. Internship Programming In addition to networking and community service opportunities, you&rsquo;ll also be partnered with a mentor for the duration of your internship to provide you with opportunities to understand more about Moody&rsquo;s and our corporate culture. You will also have the chance to connect with and learn from senior leaders and advisors as you take your first steps towards a successful professional career.<br><br> How to Apply <br> Our interns are academic achievers with outstanding potential, so when you submit your application you should be able to demonstrate this along with your curiosity and the strength of your interest in your chosen field. To start your application, follow the link below to find out about our current internships.

     Location:  Painted Post, NY, US, 14870    Company:  Corning    Requisition Number: 42902 <br>   Corning is one of the world&rsquo;s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people&rsquo;s lives.<br><br> Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&amp;D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.<br><br> Corning&rsquo;s Environmental Technologies segment manufactures ceramic substrates and filter products for emissions control in mobile and stationary applications around the world. <br>   Corning&rsquo;s summer internship experience is rich with hands-on learning. You&rsquo;ll live, work, and experience the communities in which Corning operates, while building on-the-job skills. As our intern, you will be involved with Corning&rsquo;s Environmental Technologies (CET) segment which manufactures ceramic substrates and filter products for emissions control in mobile and stationary applications around the world.<br>    The purpose of our Intern Program is to raise the bar on talent by strengthening our pipeline for entry level roles for our immediate and future needs.<br>    Shape your future; apply today!<br>     Program Benefits:    Competitive salaries   Housing assistance   Travel reimbursement<br>      Intern Activities:    Social and networking events   Volunteer opportunities   Community Involvement<br>      Travel Requirements:    We do not anticipate travel<br>      Hours of work/work schedule/flex-time:    M-F 8am &ndash; 5pm   Some flexibility available   Duration: Summer 2021, 8-12 weeks<br>      Scope of Internship:    In this role you will work with a team to support engineering and technology projects, including: Improve existing manufacturing processes and capabilities, develop methods and processes for the manufacture of new products, develop methods, measurements and processes to improve existing products, support manufacturing improvement initiatives, including variability reduction, defect reduction, process control improvement, 6-Sigma, MEE.<br>     Education and Experience    Enrolled in an Undergraduate or Graduate Level engineering program   To be considered for an internship at Corning Incorporated, you must be actively enrolled at a college or university as a full-time student seeking a bachelor&rsquo;s degree or higher. You must also have a current cumulative GPA of 3.00 or higher (on a 0.00 to 4.00 scale).<br>      Required Skills    Project leadership Skills   Excellent critical analysis, and logic/reasoning skills.   Excellent written and verbal communication skills and people skills; ability to interact with management, team members and external vendors.   Working knowledge of basic statistics and process engineering principles.   Problem solving and troubleshooting skills<br>      Desired Skills:    Problem-solving skills   Demonstrated communication and interpersonal skills   Experience with Six Sigma DMAIC principles   Collaboration in a multicultural environment<br>      Soft Skills:    Communication/Team/Leadership   Open and engaging to effectively collaborate with others   Strong attention to detail   Able to handle ambiguity to get results   Strong verbal and written communication skills   Technical curiosity   Flexibility<br>     This position does not support immigration sponsorship.<br>    We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status. <br>   We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation. <br> <br> Nearest Major Market:  Corning 

  Guidepoint Qsight identifies, gathers, acquires and delivers high-value data that offers clients unparalleled quantitative insight into company and sector performance. With over a decade of experience in collecting and analyzing primary data on hard-to-access markets, Guidepoint Qsight offers clients some of the most differentiated and powerful data available.   The Quantitative Data Intern will help with the development of Guidepoint's Qsight offerings including building new products from proprietary data and purchased data.    Responsibilities:   Work with raw and complex data to find statistically significant signals  Apply various modeling and analysis techniques to build top-line, company specific metric predictions that will consistently beat analyst consensus  Research various sector and company controversies to help qualitatively inform and interpret models  Analyze and understand the disparate sources of industry data  Utilize a diverse array of technologies and tools as needed, to deliver insights, such as R, SAS, Python, MetLab, SQL  Conduct quantitative analytics and modeling projects in addition to developing new models, analytic processes and systems approaches    Qualifications:   Pursuing a degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Econometrics, or related fields, graduating by May 2020.  Relevant experience and strong knowledge in at least one of the following fields: statistics, data mining, machine learning, statistics, operations research, econometrics, natural language processing, and/ or information retrieval.  A hunger for solving complex, difficult big data problems with a sense of urgency  Ability to work with team to assess needs, provide assistance, and resolve problems, using excellent verbal/written communication to non-technical audiences  Experience with industry standard risk analytics and stress testing methods  Excellent problem solver willing to work independently  Strong focus on quality and on addressing client needs  

 <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Summary </h3>  As the Network/System Administration Intern, you will be responsible for assisting in the day to day administration and support for a Windows Active Directory and SharePoint environment, as well as the supporting network, with special attention to security. You will likely explore and implement new technologies, as well as support our existing technologies.   You will report to the Network Services Manager and work side by side with several Network Administrators. We will rely on you to support IT projects, and we hope you bring a fresh perspective to our ongoing needs. <h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  Responsibilities </h3> Help with the daily administration of Window Server, Active Directory, SharePoint, VMware environment  Support the daily administration of the infrastructure supporting this environment (LAN/WAN/SAN).  Perform support activities to support the mission of the Information Technology Department.  Assist with the upgrade of systems software and hardware as needed to ensure secure, reliable, and stable operation of servers and related equipment.  Assist the Application Support and Development groups for application troubleshooting and support.  Assist the IT Security Team as needed.  Help schedule assigned support tickets. Escalate problems (when needed) to the appropriately experienced technician or manager. Promptly update ticketing system with all work completed.  Assist with all areas of network and system administration, across all levels of support, from HelpDesk through resolution.  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Qualifications </h3> Students who have completed at least three years of a degree program with a concentration in Applied Networking and System Administration or related field, with a record of academic achievement  System administrator experience in a Windows/Active Directory/SharePoint/VMWare environment, or core networking a plus  Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within the IT field  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> About Manning &amp; Napier </h3>  Manning &amp; Napier is a wealth and investment manager that prides itself on helping our clients meet their financial goals. For nearly fifty years, we have developed deep relationships with our clients and have employed a research-driven approach to wealth management. Whether we are helping a non-profit grow its endowment, an individual retire with confidence, or an advisor develop their practice, we maintain a focus on real-world results.   Our culture rewards curiosity and an entrepreneurial attitude. We are always looking for passionate individuals to join our team.    Apply  

    The Renew Democracy Initiative (RDI) is a non-partisan, not-for-profit organization dedicated to renewing and advancing the values of liberal democracy in the U.S. and around the world. We promote intellectual humility and an empathetic approach to disagreement.   We have a small, tight-knit executive team, so interns will have the unique opportunity to learn all aspects of how to run an organization and make a personal impact on America&rsquo;s democratic landscape. Because we are a start-up organization, interns should also be ready to play multiple roles as we have an &ldquo;all hands on deck&rdquo; mentality. All roles will have a mix of substantive and administrative responsibilities.   Interns will have unprecedented access to our Board of Directors through our lunch &amp; learns and other events&mdash;including renowned chess grandmaster &amp; Putin critic Garry Kasparov, Senator Heidi Heitkamp, Lt. Col Alexander Vindman, Pulitzer Prize winner Bret Stephens, former head of the Republican National Committee, Michael Steele, and many others. Check out our website for more info!   Academic Credit: Offered upon the school department&rsquo;s approval    About the role    This is an absolutely critical role managing RDI&rsquo;s contacts database and executing our community management priorities. This role will involve working on some combination of the below:   Running a CRM (EveryAction), which will entail the following:  designing emails,   segmenting audiences,   creating and managing events   fundraising   audience performance and analytics analysis   injecting CRM forms into our website to collect signups;   basic HTML knowledge     Create and manage Zoom webinars for live events;   Google Analytics knowledge;   Google Search Console knowledge;   HTML, CSS, or any other relevant coding experience (preferred, not required)  <br>   Qualifications of an ideal candidate:    Exceptional undergraduates, graduate students, and recent grads are encouraged to apply;   Detail-oriented to a fault;   Deep belief in RDI&rsquo;s mission and values;   Problem-solving skills and high levels of intuition;   Excellent verbal and written communication skills;   Open-minded and willing to interact with a broad range of often-conflicting political points of view;   Social, articulate, and a self-starter unafraid to take initiative;   Experience with Google Suite (especially Google Sheets), Customer Relationship Management (CRM) tools (especially EveryAction), Zoom, and other development databases strongly preferred;   Experience in the fundraising and development space is a plus.  <br>   Logistics &amp; Benefits    An ability to work remotely due to the current crisis and, if/when it&rsquo;s safe to return to the office, an opportunity to work at an exciting start-up with unlimited snacks, coffee, and other perks;   Our internships last 3-6 months. Interns can either work full time (40 hours/week) or part time (25+ hours/week); but can be flexible depending on applicant&rsquo;s circumstance;   Hours are flexible and we are willing to work around your academic schedule;   An opportunity to work closely with senior organizational leadership, including the Executive Director, as well as access to members of the Board of Directors, and other individuals from RDI&rsquo;s extended network;   This is an unpaid internship;   A typical day could include spending a few hours updating the website and doing various CRM related tasks; segmenting audiences and running reports; participating in a lunch-and-learn with a prominent political figure, a world champion poker player, or a business leader; and coordinating with the Newsletter and Event teams to put together digital content.  <br>  We are recruiting on a rolling basis. Please send a  resume, brief cover letter covering relevant experience and interest in the role, and either a portfolio or examples of your web development and management experience to   apply@rdi.org.  Please also indicate your desired hours per week and start date in your cover letter.  Only complete applications will be reviewed.  

         This is not work experience, this is an opportunity to experience work. 

  Undergraduate / Graduate Student Job Opportunities in   Advancing a Sustainable Carbon Economy   Dimensional Energy (Ithaca, NY), a revolutionary leader in the Sustainable Carbon Economy has several openings for Graduate and undergraduate student  interns  for the following positions:   Engineering:   Working on chemical reactors, machining of components, calculations/design   Chemistry/Materials Science:   Developing of thermal/photocatalyst materials and testing   Business:  Business modeling and technoeconomic analyses   Data Analytics:   Organizing and finding correlations and conclusions in broad data sets for future algorithms and technology development.   Additional Details    Job title:  Intern   Job Type:  Part Time / Full Time   Location:  Ithaca, NY or remote*   Timeframe:  Immediate hiring. Job duration based on availability of state funding.   Areas of interest:  Engineering, chemistry, materials science, data analytics, business, economics, and others.   Requirement:  Must meet requirements and be accepted into state-funded internship program  https://www.nyserda.ny.gov/All-Programs/Programs/Clean-Energy-Workforce-Development/NYS-Clean-Energy-Internships   Pay:  $14-18/hr depending on experience   What to expect <br/>This is not your typical internship. Dimensional Energy is a place to learn, grow, and provide a substantial contribution to the Team. Your work will be recognized, valued, and utilized. If you’ve ever wanted to make a difference in the world, this is the place to start. Help us Save the World.  The start-up environment is exciting and fast-paced. The ideal candidate is someone who can immediately contribute, deliver on planned goals, motivate, and infect others with a passion. Everyone on the team will have the option of wearing many hats, so this internship will entail continuous skills development and the ability to take on new roles as the need arises.  *The internship could be remote for work involving techno-economic analyses and data analytics.*  Job Types: Part-time, Internship  Pay: $14.00 - $18.00 per hour  License/Certification:  set of requirements according to NYSERDA (Required)   Hours per week:  Less than 10  10-19   Company's website:  www.dimensionalenergy.com   Work Remotely:  Temporarily due to COVID-19   COVID-19 Precaution(s):  Remote interview process  Personal protective equipment provided or required  Social distancing guidelines in place  Virtual meetings  Sanitizing, disinfecting, or cleaning procedures in place  

 <h2 class="jobSectionHeader"> Job Description  </h2>  Requirements    &middot; Undergraduate (rising junior or senior) or graduate student working towards a degree in business, finance, computer science, quantitative analysis or a related field   &middot; Strong communication skills   &middot; Strong analytical skills   &middot; Strong knowledge of Excel   &middot; Working knowledge of other Microsoft Office products   &middot; Working knowledge of Tableau   &middot; Working knowledge of Python   &middot; Attention to detail   &middot; Ability to handle multiple assignments     #LI-HF1   Cboe Global Markets is an Equal Opportunity Employer. For more information, please click the following links:<br>    Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law (in English)   Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law (in Spanish)   Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law (Supplement)   E-Verify Participation Poster (English &amp; Spanish)   Right to Work Poster (English)   Right to Work Poster (Spanish) 

   We&rsquo;re BCG Digital Ventures. Adventure awaits you.    We are an ever-growing global team of the world&rsquo;s most remarkable entrepreneurs, designers, engineers, venture architects, product experts and investors. Our ventures create a strategic advantage for the most important global companies.    Experience Design at BCGDV    Our experience designers are tasked with developing product and service solutions that consider all the complexities of delivering business and customer value. With immense attention to detail and forward-thinking leadership, they bring together the best of strategy, design, and technology development. This skillful choreography of venture ideas, brands, people, and emotions allows our XD team to impact millions of lives for the better.    Program Overview <br> We are looking for students currently pursuing Graduate degrees, graduating December 2021 or May/June 2022 . The 10-week internship program will allow interns to gain valuable experience working on our current Ventures.    In this role you will:   Participate in concept sessions leveraging ethnographic research and design thinking  Introduce trends and exemplars across a variety of emerging technologies like AI, IoT, VR, and AR  Balance customer frictions and needs with our client&rsquo;s business goals, market viability, and technical feasibility  Hands on delivery of concepts, personas, user journeys, storyboards, system maps, user flows, wireframes, visual design comps, and prototypes with Sketch, Adobe CS, InVision, and other tools  Incorporate user research and usability testing to iterate on product solutions  Collaborate effectively with multi-disciplinary teams including management consultants, product managers, engineers, marketers, and corporate executives  Communicate the product&rsquo;s vision and articulate design decisions and trade-offs to partners and clients, both verbally and visually  Partner with Engineering to ensure designs are properly implemented  Work with Marketing to develop brand guidelines, online advertising, and websites  Contribute to the Design cohort through knowledge-sharing and presentations with other designers    You should have:   Currently pursuing a MA degree in Graphic Design, Interaction Design, UX Design, Service Design or a related subject from an accredited University  1+ years of relevant professional experience  An updated, online portfolio  Working experience with Sketch, Adobe CS, and InVision  Proven experience delivering concepts, personas, user journeys, storyboards, user flows, wireframes, prototypes, etc.  Exceptional communication skills and presentation skills  Excellent people management skills to collaborate with colleagues and cross-functional teams  Abilities planning, prioritizing and organizing work effectively and efficiently within a team  Creative problem solving skills  <br>    Interested applicants may apply through the careers section of the website at https://www.bcgdv.com/. Interviews will take place after resumes have been screened for minimum requirements. Please note that this position is not restricted solely to the responsibilities listed above and that the job scope and responsibilities are subject to change.   BCG Digital Ventures is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under federal, state or local law. 

 PURPOSE: <br><br> The focus of this position is to support ongoing engineering testing and validation activities such as hardware, firmware, GUI on unit, mobile and web applications for Watts&rsquo; commercial condensing boilers and high efficiency water heaters.    PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES:     Support design validation and reliability testing of complex embedded systems    Create detailed verification plans for hardware and software testing coving general product test and specific feature test    Assemble and verify test setups and test jigs with unit under test prior to test   Perform rigorous tests to ensure system performance and endurance including electrical noise, temperature limits and extremes, voltage/current limits and extremes, and user-interface testing and user experience   Debug hardware and firmware at component level &amp; integrated system level to arrive at root cause under guidance of senior engineers. Ability to sort hardware from software failures   Generate detailed test reports comparing observed behavior against expected behavior that is derived from specifications   Rework/soldering of small sized components    Experience with benchtop HW validation and test equipment (oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, power supplies &amp; loads, DAQs, Network analyzers) and reading schematics and board layout files    EDUCATION:       Candidates must be a current junior or senior student pursuing a Bachelor's or Master's in Electrical / Software / Computer Engineering or Science degree    Must have a GPA of 3.0 or higher.    EXPERIENCE AND REQUIRED SKILLS:       Must be authorized to work in the U.S., and not require sponsorship now or in the future   Understand technical principles and concepts in Electrical Engineering; familiarity with signal integrity    Knowledge of modern analog and digital electronics and electronic circuits; familiarity with power systems, and UI/UX including mobile and web applications   Communication interface experience such as Wi-Fi, serial communication like RS485, and Arduino   Exceptional programming and debugging skills &ndash; LabView, C/C++, or other test software a plus   Ability to take initiative and be resourceful    Ability to communicate and work with colleagues/teams in different departments professionally and effectively    PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:     While performing the duties, the employee will be working in an office environment with exposure to the plant floor as well as the Engineering Test Facility. The employee is required to sit, stand walk, use hands to handle objects and other tools. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision depth perception and the ability to adjust focus. Employee may be required to lift up to 40 pounds.      WORK ENVIRONMENT:        Work in office environment or work in a manufacturing environment    May occasionally be required to perform job duties outside the typical office setting.    *As required by the Americans Disabilities Act (ADA)       EMPLOYEE CORE COMPETENCIES: <br> 1. Collaborate Across Workgroup <br> 2. Initiate Positive Change <br> 3. Deliver High Quality Results <br> 4. Focus on the Customer   5. Develops Self &amp; Others   6. Accountability      By linking this application to your LinkedIn profile, you agree that you consent to Watts and any of its affiliates, divisions, and/or third party service providers accessing and using the information on your LinkedIn profile for the purposes of assessing your application.     Watts is committed to equal employment opportunity. We follow a policy of administering all employment decisions and personnel actions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, national origin, sexual orientation, age, physical or mental disability, genetic disposition or carrier status, marital status, military or veteran status, minorities, or any other category protected under applicable federal, state, or local law. Consistent with the obligations of state and federal law, Watts will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities. Any employee who needs a reasonable accommodation should contact Human Resources.

 <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Summary </h3>  As an Information Security Intern, you will work on the design, implementation and maintenance of security technology solutions, policies, and governance programs. We hope to give you an experience that develops your skills as an Information Security professional, so your responsibilities will be heavily rely on your interests and skills.   Our IT Security team provides technical advice and support on information security concerns- our mission being to support the growth and profitability of the firm through security and protection of our technology to meet our client&rsquo;s needs.   You will report to the IT Security Manager, and work closely with IT Security Administrators. We will rely on you to support IT projects, and we hope you bring a fresh perspective to our ongoing needs. <h3 class="jobSectionHeader">  As the ideal candidate, you will exemplify the following: </h3> Taken coursework in Information Security  Understanding of hardware, software, and networking concepts  Looking for CISSP certification (Certified Information Systems Security Professional)  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Qualifications </h3> Students who have completed at least three years of a degree program with a concentration in Computing Security (preferred), Computer Science or related field with a strong record of academic achievement  Familiar with standard concepts and procedures within the IT field  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> Perks </h3>  In addition to projects that leave you feeling accomplished over your 10 weeks with us, we also provide the following (and more):  Hourly pay  Invitations to monthly forums focusing on personal and professional growth  <h3 class="jobSectionHeader"> About Manning &amp; Napier </h3>  Manning &amp; Napier is a wealth and investment manager that prides itself on helping our clients meet their financial goals. For nearly fifty years, we have developed deep relationships with our clients and have employed a research-driven approach to wealth management. Whether we are helping a non-profit grow its endowment, an individual retire with confidence, or an advisor develop their practice, we maintain a focus on real-world results.   Our culture rewards curiosity and an entrepreneurial attitude. We are always looking for passionate individuals to join our team.    Apply  

 Overview: <br> Neenah Inc. (NYSE:  NP) is a multi-national technical products and premium paper company with over $1 billion in annual revenue. Headquartered in Alpharetta, Georgia, Neenah has manufacturing, distribution, and service centers in Michigan, Wisconsin, New York, Pennsylvania, Massachusetts, Great Britain, Germany and the Netherlands. We have grown significantly in recent years bringing more innovation and customization across all of our key business units. We continually add capabilities that will continue to accelerate our strategy and expand our target growth of Fine Paper & Packaging, Performance Materials and Filtration. We believe in high integrity, high expectations, and high performance, while providing a competitive total compensation and rewards package. Neenah provides the opportunity to make an impact. <br><br> We are actively pursuing an intern with a Process/Paper Engineering degree to complete a 10 plus week internship program at the Brownville Mill in Brownville/ NY starting in May 2021.The internship will provide exposure to many aspects of operations including a multi-functional team setting, real time production, process experience and project work with specific deliverables and exposure to the mill leadership team. Interns will participate in mills and production line operations to learn technical properties and quality issues of paper or paper based materials. <br><br> Ideal candidates will possess high initiative and drive, with a curiosity to perpetually learn and improve our business. Key requirements include the ability to analyze information to find opportunities, effectively communicate, and work collaboratively in a team setting. <br><br> Responsibilities: <br> Work with Technical team on process efficiency improvements, cost savings and/or technology advancement  Work on projects assigned by mill leadership.  Attend meetings with leadership team, reporting out on assigned tasks and present finding from special projects.  Work with engineers and identify paper defects.  Participate in new customer trials.  Work with leadership to modify or create standard operating procedures   Qualifications: <br> Individual must be currently enrolled and working toward a BS in Paper Science, Chemistry or an Engineering discipline is required.  Student will need to have completed a minimum of 2-full years of course work with preference for individuals who have completed 3-full years.  Preference is a minimum 3.0 GPA in your academic field of study.  Ideal candidates will possess high initiative and drive, with a curiosity to perpetually learn and improve our business.  Key requirements include the ability to analyze information to find opportunities, effectively communicate, and work collaboratively in a team setting.  

   About the Role      As an intern in the  Equities  front-end team, you will help us to enhance our internal web sites, which were created to help build and maintain our equities trading application. In addition, you will help to prototype new features in our equities trading front-end.      Responsibilities      Build new features and enhance existing features in our web applications.   Collaborate with colleagues and customers to improve code and design new solutions.   Continuously challenge your work, explore new avenues and learn all you can.       Skills and Experience      Working knowledge of web technologies such as HTML, JavaScript, and CSS.   In addition, it would help if you also know the git source control system and a back-end programming language such as Java or C#.       Person Profile      The ideal candidate should be a good communicator and willing to experiment with new technologies. 

 Description:   Job Title:  Business Analyst (Intern - Rochester, NY)    Job Location:  Rochester, NY<br>    Job ID:  CS20202511-53654 

 Delivering excellence at the intersection of data science, research and industry expertise, our AI and Machine Learning teams go beyond where any bank has gone before. We ask the questions and find the answers to create solutions and technology that help to solve the world's most pressing financial problems, and improve and protect our customer and client experiences every day. Whether you're working with artificial intelligence, blockchain technology, big data, machine learning or robotics, our entrepreneurial team environment challenges you to push the limits of your expertise in the pursuit of impactful and commercial real world applications.   What to expect    Our Summer Associate Internship Program begins in May or June, depending on your academic schedule. Your professional growth and development will be supported throughout the internship program via project work related to your academic and professional interests, mentorship, engaging speaker series with senior leaders and more. Full-time employment offers may be extended upon successful completion of the program.   Our Applied AI and Machine Learning teams work closely together, whether exploring cutting-edge research in partnership with leading academic institutions, applying the latest Machine Learning techniques to J.P. Morgan's unique data assets, or collaborating directly with traders and salespeople to drive the data-led transformation of our businesses.   Our areas of focus include Deep Learning, Reinforcement Learning, Natural Language Processing, Speech/Voice Analytics, Time Series, Computer Vision, Cryptography, Explainability and Interpretability, and Ethics and Fairness of AI.    About you <br> We are looking for innovative problem-solvers with a passion for developing complex solutions that support our   global business.   Key qualifications include:<br><br>  Enrolled in a master's or Ph.D. degree program in math, science, engineering, computer science or other quantitative fields  Knowledge of machine learning / data science theory, techniques and tools  Programming experience with one or more of Python, Matlab, C++, Java, C#  Excellent analytical, quantitative and problem solving skills and demonstrated research ability  Strong communication skills and the ability to present findings to a non-technical audience  No prior experience in financial markets required  <br> Desirable skills include: Experience with big-data technologies such as Hadoop, Tensorflow, Spark, SparkML, et al.  Knowledge in Reinforcement Learning or Meta Learning     Join us    At JPMorgan Chase, we're creating positive change for the diverse communities we serve. We do this by championing your innovative ideas through a supportive culture that helps you every step of the way as you build your career. If you're passionate, curious and ready to make an impact, we're looking for you.    What's next?    We will review summer internship applications as they are received and extend offers on a rolling basis. We strongly encourage that you apply early as programs will close as positions are filled.   JPMorgan Chase is committed to creating an inclusive work environment that respects all people for their unique skills, backgrounds and professional experiences. We strive to hire qualified, diverse candidates, and we will provide reasonable accommodations for known disabilities.   Visit jpmorganchase.com/careers for upcoming events, career advice, our locations and more.   &copy;2020 JPMorgan Chase &amp; Co. JPMorgan Chase is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer Disability/VeteranJPMorgan Chase &amp; Co., one of the oldest financial institutions, offers innovative financial solutions to millions of consumers, small businesses and many of the world's most prominent corporate, institutional and government clients under the J.P. Morgan and Chase brands. Our history spans over 200 years and today we are a leader in investment banking, consumer and small business banking, commercial banking, financial transaction processing and asset management.   We recognize that our people are our strength and the diverse talents they bring to our global workforce are directly linked to our success. We are an equal opportunity employer and place a high value on diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of any protected attribute, including race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, marital or veteran status, pregnancy or disability, or any other basis protected under applicable law. In accordance with applicable law, we make reasonable accommodations for applicants' and employees' religious practices and beliefs, as well as any mental health or physical disability needs.   Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans 

    Do you enjoy working with cutting-edge technology? Are you interested in financial services but want something that looks and feels more like a tech company? That&rsquo;s awesome. We&rsquo;ve been looking for you.     The  Algorithmic Trading Development  team is responsible for our suite of state-of-the-art trading algorithms; providing our clients and agency traders with superior order execution while minimizing their market impact. You will write code in Java, and collaborate with our team on agile requirements analysis, problem resolution and quality assurance.    Responsibilities    Candidate will have deep knowledge of data structures and algorithms, an appetite for solving complex software engineering problems in a global setting, experience writing production quality code, and R&amp;D skills to address tough problems head-on.   Collaborate with a team of global trading experts on agile requirements analysis, problem resolution, and quality assurance.   Develop Algo Infrastructure Development Toolkit to automate configuration, monitor and optimize the reliability and overall health of our development environments to reduce toil and increate insight into trouble spots.     Qualifications    Currently enrolled in a Bachelor&rsquo;s or Master&rsquo;s degree program with a concentration in computer science or a similar field.   Detail oriented, high-energy, positive can-do attitude that considers no job too big or too small.   Proficiency and interest in learning programming languages like Java, python, etc.   Knowledge of financial services (equities in particular) is a plus but not required.  

  Guidepoint Qsight identifies, gathers, acquires and delivers high-value data that offers clients unparalleled quantitative insight into company and sector performance. With over a decade of experience in collecting and analyzing primary data on hard-to-access markets, Guidepoint Qsight offers clients some of the most differentiated and powerful data available.   The Quantitative Data Intern will help with the development of Guidepoint&rsquo;s Qsight offerings including building new products from proprietary data and purchased data.    Responsibilities:   Work with raw and complex data to find statistically significant signals  Apply various modeling and analysis techniques to build top-line, company specific metric predictions that will consistently beat analyst consensus  Research various sector and company controversies to help qualitatively inform and interpret models  Analyze and understand the disparate sources of industry data  Utilize a diverse array of technologies and tools as needed, to deliver insights, such as R, SAS, Python, MetLab, SQL  Conduct quantitative analytics and modeling projects in addition to developing new models, analytic processes and systems approaches    Qualifications:   Pursuing a degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Econometrics, or related fields, graduating by May 2020.  Relevant experience and strong knowledge in at least one of the following fields: statistics, data mining, machine learning, statistics, operations research, econometrics, natural language processing, and/ or information retrieval.  A hunger for solving complex, difficult big data problems with a sense of urgency  Ability to work with team to assess needs, provide assistance, and resolve problems, using excellent verbal/written communication to non-technical audiences  Experience with industry standard risk analytics and stress testing methods  Excellent problem solver willing to work independently  Strong focus on quality and on addressing client needs  

 Job Description:<br>  The New York Independent System Operator (NYISO) applies cutting-edge technology to operating a reliable electricity system, managing competitive markets for wholesale electricity, and planning for the Empire State's energy future. The NYISO invites applications for full-time summer interns on the following teams. <br>    Energy Market Engineering   The NYISO is expecting to incorporate large-scale wind and solar in the near future, which can result in units exceeding current largest contingencies. The Energy Market Engineering team will be carrying out an analysis of benefits in procurement reserves that are dynamic in nature. This analysis will help to compare the benefits of procuring more reserves versus building larger infrastructure. The intern will work on Dynamic Reserve for Flexibility for both the Day-Ahead and Real Time markets. This intern will also assist in simulations using the NM system and prepare reports to study the potential benefits and drawbacks of this project.<br>     Technology Development   The Technology Development team in collaboration with the market design specialists are working on building the Capacity Expansion Model used to study the CLCPA goals that NY State has put out. The intern will work with the Technology Development team to refine the Python code that was developed to complete the benchmarking exercise. The intern will also be responsible for documenting the code and generating a user's guide that will explain the inputs and outputs to the model. <br><br><br> Job Requirements: <br>  Masters or PhD level candidate in power systems, operations research, mathematics or electricity markets preferred. Undergraduate candidates in these areas with strong programming skills will be considered.  Strong Python programming skills are required. Experience using APIs like Gurobipy is preferred.  Familiarity with optimization techniques like linear programming and Mixed Integer programming is preferred.  Experience using MATLAB, GAMS, AIIMS or AMPL to formulate an optimization problem is desired.  <br>   The NYISO takes pride in recruiting, developing and retaining highly talented individuals. Our summer internship programs give young professionals the opportunity to gain a fundamental understanding of New York electricity markets, bulk electricity systems and how we plan for New York State&rsquo;s energy future.  All offers of employment will be made contingent upon the successful completion of a drug screening and background check.   The NYISO is an Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, does not discriminate in its hiring or employment practices. 

    The Computer Engineering Intern will assist the Engineering staff and Department while providing an educational/personal learning experience. The experience will benefit the company and intern while providing additional Computer Engineering capacity to get through a project backlog crunch occurring during the Summer months. The intern will assist with tasks related to software development for projects involving embedded code, GUI , network interface and SNMP communications.    General Functions:    The Computer Engineering Intern will interact with members of the Engineering team to design and test new software and firmware required for new product development. The Intern will perform engineering work under the supervision of a mentoring member of the TXRX Systems R&amp;D Engineering group. Primary responsibilities will be participation with the Engineering team assisting in technical tasks required to complete new product developments, initiate product design improvements, and special R&amp;D assignments.    Specific Responsibilities:   Perform functional tests on electronic products  Develop embedded code for microcontrollers used in new products  Develop graphical user interface and control programs on an embedded Linux platform  Integration and testing of software code modules into a complete system  Validation testing of software-based products  Simple programming of embedded systems  Create software applications to use in the factory to perform product tests  Documentation and annotation of code     Required Qualifications/Skills/Competencies:   Enrolled in a BS or MS education program, Software or Electrical Engineering, (Preferred 3rd or 4th year)  Understanding of the underlying principles of software development  Competence with one or more programming languages (C/C++, Python, etc.)  Knowledge of various microcontrollers, especially Atmel  Embedded application design experience (user interfaces, I/O, and device drivers)  Familiarity with Linux and or uClinux  Familiarity with Beagle Bone single and or Raspberry Pi single board computers  Knowledge of software development processes and process tools such as revision control, design and test documents  

 Company Description<br>   ATTENTION TO ALL APPLICANTS: WE DO NOT OFFER ANY REMOTE POSTIONS AT THE MOMENT. THOSE WHO DO NOT LIVE NEAR NYC AREA, DO NOT APPLY. THANK YOU FOR UNDERSTANDING.    ETech 7 is a Managed IT Service Provider (MSP) servicing business in New York. As a result of our increasing growth, we're seeking an intern who is looking to become an IT professional with a team player personality to help us stay ahead of the curve. You must be bright, articulate, responsible, dedicated and show initiative with a personal interest in your work (limited hand-holding). We can guarantee you a casual, fun, friendly and rewarding work environment along with an amazing opportunity to learn and advance your career.   This position consists of a generous amount of dealing with end users balanced by the benefit of being exposed to many different IT systems and technologies that businesses use. On any given day, you might be expected to accomplish a vast array of tasks from something as simple as resetting a password to configuring and managing servers and networks across multiple client sites. The variety of work will only be limited by your ability and desire to learn new things.   Opportunity to work in an entrepreneurial culture directly with senior management, whose experience ranges from launching new businesses to managing large teams. Potential full-time opportunities will be available for proven candidates. 

   STRUCTURAL integrates technology-driven solutions with specialty contracting services to improve, protect, and enhance the existing infrastructure of owners directly, and in partnership with designers and contractors. STRUCTURAL offers a wide range of specialty repair and maintenance services and is the largest concrete repair contractor in the United States, with roughly 2,500 employees working from locations nationwide and in select international markets. STRUCTURAL is the open-shop contracting division of Structural Group.<br><br> If you are seeking a challenging and rewarding construction internship opportunity with a dynamic, diversified and innovative company, a STRUCTURAL Project Engineer Internship may be for you! We are currently recruiting for a Construction Project Engineer Intern to be based in our Long Island City, NY branch office.   As a Construction Project Engineer Intern, you will apply your knowledge and develop new skills while working on a variety of challenging projects.   As a Project Engineer intern you will assist in:  Project management support  Estimating  Budget preparation  Job cost management  Scheduling  Production rate tracking  Client relations  Safety management  Quality control management  Engineering and design support  Business development   Successful candidates will possess:  A Bachelors degree or will be working toward a Bachelors degree in Construction Management, Civil Engineering or related field of study  Strong verbal and written communication skills  Excellent documentation and organizational skills  Strong computer skills  A positive outlook and a team spirit   STRUCTURAL is proud of a company culture that promotes 24/7 safety and quality. 

   From helping shape entire cities to adapting infrastructure to deal with the climate emergency, a career at Buro Happold presents the chance to make a difference. With a world class reputation, our creativity and our people have delivered positive change to clients, the environment, and communities alike. If you want to be part of something bigger, this is your chance. 

 Overview:   TC Electric, LLC is one of the leading transit electrical system installation contractors in New York City. Founded in 2005, TC Electric has successfully created an organization that values a working environment that embraces learning, transparency, and strong ethical behavior. At TC Electric we believe that our greatest asset is our people and we are committed to establishing a structure for professionals to advance their careers.  

   Position  :  Integration and DevOps Software Engineer Fall 2020 Internship (REMOTE)

   Job Title:  Mechanical Engineering Intern    Department:  Mechanical Engineering    Reports To:  Director, Mechanical Engineering    Status:  Nonexempt   <br>   Job Summary     The Mechanical Engineering Intern will provide engineering support and engage in research and/or product development within the Mechanical Engineering Department. The Mechanical Engineering Intern will gain a unique opportunity to discover strategies for real-world application of engineering theories, as well as skills and experience necessary to prepare for a successful career.    Duties     This job description is not totally inclusive of all the job functions required of the Mechanical Engineering Intern. An employee assigned to this role may have additional, job-related duties.     Essential Functions:    3D design and drafting of mechanical/electrical components and assemblies   Perform engineering analyses   Project and process activities   Work with vendors for component fabrications and cost reduction opportunities   Assist in assembly of equipment   Support equipment debug and troubleshooting operations     Supervisory Responsibilities:    The Mechanical Engineering Intern will not have any supervisory responsibilities.    Systems Used:     Hardware &ndash;  Laptop/desktop computer, printer, copier, scanner, plotter, fax machine, telephone, cell phone, and calculator    Software &ndash;  Microsoft Office Suite &amp; Project, ERP System, Smartsheets, other as necessary    Education, Experience, and Skills      Basic Qualifications    Undergraduate student majoring in: Mechanical Engineering, or related field   Ability to maintain strict confidentiality   Ability to respond to changing situations   Excellent verbal and written communication skills   Attention to detail and high organization skills   High proficiency with computer programs   Strong quantitative and qualitative analytical skills     Preferred Skills    Ability to work in a fast-paced environment   Proficiency in using Microsoft Office applications   Ability to work independently   Results driven    <br>   Physical Activities and Requirements     <br>  Prolonged periods of computer-based work   Ability to lift up to 15 pounds at a time   Ability to travel as necessary    <br>   Work Schedule &amp; Required Availability     This is a nonexempt, hourly position. The intern will work core business hours, 8 am &ndash; 5 pm, Monday-Friday. 

  Want to spend your summer interning at a company that is consistently rated as one of the best places to work in the country? Is this a rhetorical question??   The Motley Fool is a multimedia financial services company that provides financial solutions for investors through various stock, investing, and personal finance services. We've been on the block for about 26 years and have honed a reputation for producing industry-leading work in a nationally recognized workplace. Our mission is to help the world become happier, smarter, and richer and the backbone supporting this global mission is our top-notch tech team. If you dream of becoming a brilliant and skilled web designer and are ready to work hard on cutting edge technologies alongside awesome coworkers, then step up to the plate, and tell us why you should land a spot among our Foolish ranks. <br>  For eight Foolish weeks as a UX/UI Design Research Intern, you'll be embedded with the Design and Web Technologies teams that support, build, and maintain our Foolish products and websites. You will have hands-on experience working with users and internal teams to investigate existing user mental models and design products that sustainably address our end users' needs. You will gain exposure to the entire UX Design process - from the initial research to design, design testing, as well as the hand off to development! You'll also collaboratively shape what success looks like for the changes you propose. The projects you could work on may be team-level or span our entire tech organization. <br>  You'll be challenged and mentored by some of our greatest designers all summer, and in turn, you'll develop the skills it takes to cultivate a user first mindset that will set you apart from your peers. We're excited to open our doors for Summer 2021 Design Intern applicants, so send us your most Foolishly written cover letter and your ultra-impressive resume. We're prepared to be wowed! <br>  What you need to succeed:   Excellent problem-solving skills with the ability to analyze situations, identify existing or potential opportunities, and recommend solutions.   Ability to present complex qualitative and quantitative data to diverse audiences in an understandable format via excellent verbal and written and/or visual communication skills.   Flexibility and ability to learn quickly.   Extraordinary critical thinking skills.   High-performing problem solving and collaborative skills.   Ability to communicate clearly and demonstrate emotional intelligence.   Ability to think quickly, resolve problems, and multi-task across numerous projects and teams.   Ability to keep a calm and pleasant demeanor under tight, evolving, and sometimes unpredictable timeframes and priorities.   Ability to translate insights into workable prototypes for testing and future iteration.    <br>  What would be really cool of you to have, but not required:   Experience applying qualitative research methods.   Experience with full-life cycle research and inspection methods which occur from ethnography all the way to statistically-based user testing.   Experience working on enterprise-level experiences that span multiple channels such as web, mobile, and offline interactions.   Experience with quantitative, behavioral analysis, and statistical concepts.   Experience managing digital product analytics with tools such as Google Analytics, Tableau, Airtable, or Spaghetti and Meatballs.   Experience using design methods and user research data to influence business strategy and leadership.   Familiarity with basic concepts of investing and finance.  